Privacy Policy for MyTherapy
MyTherapy is provided by smartpatient GmbH, Neumarkter Str. 87, 81673 Munich, Germany (“smartpatient” or “we”). We are the data controller for the processing of your personal data via MyTherapy.
When you use MyTherapy, you are trusting us with your personal data. We are committed to keeping that trust, which is why our policy as a company is to take steps to ensure that individual users’ data and privacy rights are protected and to provide transparency about our data practices.
The purpose of our Privacy Policy is to explain what data we process, how it is used and shared, and how you can control it. We never share health related personal data with third parties without your consent.
1. MyTherapy’s Basic Functionality
Using the basic functionality of MyTherapy requires the processing of your health data. The legal basis for processing your personal data for the Basic Functionality is your consent (Article 6 para. 1a) and Article 9 para. 2a) GDPR). You will not be able to use MyTherapy anymore if you withdraw this consent.
a) MyTherapy user account
You can use MyTherapy with or without registering a user account (“Account”). If you do not register an Account, you will not need to enter personal data like email address and, accordingly, we will solely process the technical identifiers necessary to provide the service.
However, without an Account you can use MyTherapy on one smartphone only and if you lose your smartphone, you will not be able to restore this data.
To register an Account, you must enter your email address and a password. The legal basis for processing your personal data in both cases is your consent (Article 6 para. 1a) and Article 9 para. 2a) GDPR).
b) Running MyTherapy
When using MyTherapy, your smartphone automatically transmits date and time of access, operating system, type of smartphone, quantity of data transmitted and IP address to us. Processing this data is a technical requirement for using MyTherapy.
c) Supporting your treatment
You can use MyTherapy to manage and document your treatment by entering e.g.:
Treatment schedules for medication
Medication supply for refill reminders
Measurements like blood pressure
Injection site tracking
Well-being or symptoms
Activities like walking, running, or swimming
Information such as weight, height, gender, year of birth, country, and postal code
Doctor appointments and contact information
You can import health data from other applications, such as step count from a fitness tracker via Apple HealthKit or Google Fit and add them to your treatment documentation, if you technically allow Apple and Google to do so. We use Apple HealthKit or Google Fit data only for this purpose.
We never use your Apple HealthKit or Google Fit data for advertising and similar services or for use-based data mining. We do not disclose information gained through fitness trackers to any third party or sell it to advertising platforms, data brokers, or information resellers, and we do not permit our users to do any of the above.
d) Selecting your medication
You can add medications to your treatment using a medication database. MyTherapy preselects the database using the region or language settings of your smartphone. If this fails, we use your IP address to determine your country.
e) Receiving personalized content
We use your usage data, health data and information about installed partner apps to show you personalized content and send you reminders and notifications for this content. This content may be smartpatient content or partner content. Partner content includes information about the partner. The personalized content can be e.g.
instructions on how to make best use of MyTherapy and all its functionalities
educational content on administering particular medications for which patients may use MyTherapy
information regarding potential interactions between drugs administered through MyTherapy
information about research or surveys for which users may be eligible to participate
f) Temporarily sharing progress with others
You can choose to share your progress with a second person using a one time code that can be entered in a web dashboard. This person can view your progress for 45 min. The code expires automatically after use. Please only share the one time code with trusted persons.
g) Scanning Medication plans
You can scan your medication plan and import the data to MyTherapy. We are keeping the data we process to the minimum necessary to help you create reminders and are discarding any personal data. Availability of this functionality and if we need to use third party APIs for decoding the scan depends on the country and the system the medication plan was issued in.
h) Caregiver Feature
You can invite a trusted person to follow your treatment journey and get updates about your progress by entering their email address and adding them as a ‘caregiver’. Your caregiver will get emails with educational material and updates on your treatment (e.g. first month of treatment completed). The nickname you choose for yourself will appear in emails. We process the caregiver’s email address and nickname at your request. By inviting a caregiver, you represent that you have their consent to provide their information. By inviting a caregiver, you consent to the disclosure of your own personal information about medications and compliance with your medication regimen to the caregiver. You can remove a caregiver at any time and thereby stop the sharing.
2. Analytics and External Services
a) Application tracking, error reporting and debugging
When you use MyTherapy we collect your app usage data e.g., which functionality is used, what it is used for and when it is used. We analyze this usage data statistically to improve MyTherapy.
For application tracking, error reporting and debugging we use Crashlytics and Sentry. We do not share any identifiable data.
For gathering insights on usability like screens visited, interaction patterns (such as screen actions, gestures: taps, scrolls), and Device details (Type, Version, Model, Operating System) we use UXCam. Personal data is discarded.
The legal basis for this is our legitimate interest (Article 6 para. 1f) GDPR).
b) Analytics using Google Analytics and AppsFlyer
With Google Analytics (Google LLC) we collect MyTherapy usage data, e.g. time and duration of app use and interactions. Google does not log or store the IP address transmitted by your smartphone. The collected usage data is analyzed on Google servers in the United States. For further information please refer to
https://policies.google.com/privacy
.
We use AppsFlyer to receive analytics data about your MyTherapy usage linked with MyTherapy marketing campaigns. We collect data about the technical device (device type, operating system and version, screen resolution, etc.), the anonymized IP address and internet service provider, pages visited in the app and items clicked by the user, and mobile advertising ID. We use this data to promote MyTherapy to other users who can benefit from its features. Place of processing are United States of America & European Union. For more information, see
https://www.appsflyer.com/services-privacy-policy/
.
The legal basis for processing your personal data for this purpose is your consent (Article 6 para. 1a) GDPR). You can withdraw your consent under ‘Settings’.
c) Surveys and Questionnaires
Based on your usage of MyTherapy we may ask you to participate in surveys and questionnaires to better understand whether you like MyTherapy and our pharmacy partner services (like the eRx medication ordering), what you like about it and how we could improve it. This is optional and additional consents will be obtained in case personal data is processed in the survey.
The legal basis for this is our legitimate interest (Article 6 para. 1f) GDPR).
d) Sending Notifications using Leanplum
With Leanplum (Leanplum Inc.) we send reminders or content notifications to MyTherapy users. This may be based on MyTherapy usage data (e.g. time of account creation or date of joining a particular partner module) and is part of the Basic Functionality of MyTherapy. The collected information is stored by Leanplum in the United States. The IP address is discarded. Leanplum cannot attribute the data to a natural person. For further information please refer to
https://www.leanplum.com/platform/security-privacy
.
The legal basis for processing your personal data for this purpose is your consent (Article 6 para. 1a) GDPR).
3. Aggregated information
We may aggregate, anonymize or de-identify your personal data so that it cannot reasonably be used to identify you. Such data is no longer personal data. We may share such data with our partners or research institutions or use it for statistical purposes, for example, we may share or use general age, demographic information and aggregate statistics about certain activities or symptoms from data collected to help identify patterns across users. Our legal basis for processing your data for this purpose is legitimate interest (Article 6 para. 1f) GDPR).
4. Cooperation with pharmacy partner
We cooperate with pharmacy partners to give you access to pharmacy services such as filling your digital prescriptions (“eRx”), participating in pharmacy loyalty programs or receiving pharmaceutical counseling as set out in more detail below (“Pharmacy Functionality”). We will ask you for your specific consent before you can use the Pharmacy Functionality. The consent text will provide you with more information on the specific pharmacy partner in your country. When you consent to the Pharmacy Functionality, we will share your user ID and personal health data with the pharmacy partner and the pharmacy partner will share such data with us, to the extent this is required to provide the Pharmacy Functionality. To use the Pharmacy Functionality to the full extent, it might be necessary to pair your User Account with the account you have created with the pharmacy partner.
The legal basis for processing your personal data for this purpose is your consent (Article 6 para. 1a) and Article 9 para. 2a) GDPR).
a) Pharmacy Functionality: Ordering prescription medication
You can use MyTherapy to fill your digital prescription (eRx) with our pharmacy partner and to set up a medication reminder for this medication in MyTherapy. For this purpose, we exchange your eRx data with our pharmacy partner using the systems and procedures as required in your country (e.g. in Germany we exchange the encoded eRx data codes that contain e.g. medication name and issuing doctor and your name and address with our pharmacy partner via the Telematik infrastructure) so our pharmacy partner can deliver your prescription medication to you. From our pharmacy partner, we receive details on your medication like the medication name and package size that will allow easier setting up your medication reminder and showing you your medication prescription history.
b) Pharmacy Functionality: Requesting a prescription from your physician
When running low on your prescription medication, you can request a refill prescription from your consulting physician. We share your name, required prescription including medication name and package size, as well as the name of your physician with our pharmacy partner, who will forward this request to your physician.
c) Pharmacy Functionality: Participating in Loyalty Program
You may collect pharmacy partner loyalty points for using MyTherapy to manage your treatment, e.g. for confirming a medication intake or for setting up a reminder to take your blood pressure. We share the loyalty points you collect on MyTherapy with our pharmacy partner.
d) Pharmacy Functionality: Pharmaceutical counseling
If you require help from a pharmacy, you can use the chat based pharmaceutical counseling or you can schedule appointments with our pharmacy partner’s pharmaceutical counseling services hotline. We share your contact details with our pharmacy partner to allow our pharmacy partner to contact you. For the drug safety check, we share your medication reminder information with our pharmacy partner.
e) Pharmacy Functionality: Importing partner medication purchases
You can import the medication you have ordered from the pharmacy partner into MyTherapy which allows you to simplify setting up your medication reminders. We import your medication purchase information like medication name, dosage, and package size from our pharmacy partner.
f) Pharmacy Functionality: Exporting MyTherapy medication reminders and inventory
We share your medication and inventory information with our pharmacy partner. This will allow you to trigger refill reminders in MyTherapy and purchase medication with low inventory from our pharmacy partner. Also, this may allow you to monitor your medication inventory on our pharmacy partner’s website and app.
g) Joint data controllership
We together with the pharmacy partner may qualify as “joint data controller” in terms of Art. 26 GDPR with regard to single Pharmacy Functionality. We have entered into a respective arrangement with the pharmacy partner. We will make the essence of the arrangement available to you upon your request.
If you withdraw your consent with regard to the Pharmacy Functionalities, we do not longer share personal data with the pharmacy partner and delete any related data that we do not need for providing other functionality in MyTherapy. Please note that the pharmacy partner may still retain and process the shared data for other purposes in the pharmacy partner’s sole responsibility. Please refer to the pharmacy partner’s privacy policy.
5. Personalized recommendations from pharmacy partner
We may partner up with pharmacy partners to provide personalized product or service recommendations based on your app usage, personal information, including health data. We will ask you for your specific consent for that purpose. In the consent text, we will provide you with more information on the specific pharmacy partner in your country. We will never use data imported from Apple HealthKit or Google Fit for this purpose.
The legal basis for processing your personal data for this purpose is your consent (Article 6 para. 1a) and Article 9 para. 2a) GDPR).
a) Personalized recommendations: Service and product recommendations
We may send you personalized recommendations based on your health data, e.g. your medications or your treatment plan or your app usage. These personalized recommendations can be invitations for drug safety checks, pharmaceutical counseling and other pharmacy or doctor services as well as editorial content by our pharmacy partner on non-prescription medication and other pharmacy goods suitable for your medication management.
6. Pharmacy partner
Depending on your location we may collaborate with different pharmacy partners as listed below.
Shop-Apotheke B.V.
Erik de Rodeweg 11-13
NL - 5975 WD Sevenum
The Netherlands
7. Adverse events and protection of rights
In case you report a suspected adverse event by contacting the MyTherapy Support we may be obliged to report such adverse event. smartpatient will always get your consent before sharing personal information for reporting an adverse event to a Partner or authority such as the European Medicines Agency (EMA).
In order to enforce or to protect the rights of smartpatient, smartpatient may process your personal data.
Legal basis for this data processing in these cases is legal obligations according to Article 6 (1) c) GDPR, Article. 9 (2) i) GDPR) and defense of legal claims Article 9 (2) f GDPR).
8. Data storage
a) Duration of data storage
We keep your personal data for no longer than is necessary for the purposes for which your personal data is processed. If you delete your Account, we delete any personal data contained in the Account. We also delete any personal data contained in the Account if you have not logged in for 3 years. This cannot be reversed.
b) Location of data storage
When your smartphone connects to the Internet, MyTherapy transmits your data using data encryption to a centralized database located in the European Union provided by the technical service provider Amazon Web Services, Inc. The technical service provider may access the data for the maintenance, operation or administration of the technical infrastructure.
9. Non-EU service providers
We may rely on third-party service providers from outside the European Union, but we take all steps to ensure that your data is adequately protected according to the requirements of the data protection laws of the European Union and adequacy decisions by the EU Commission. We only use US providers taking part in the EU-U.S. Privacy Framework and implement Standard Data Protection Clauses where needed to ensure appropriate protection of your personal data.
10. General security measures
We implement technical and organizational measures in an effort to protect personal data from loss, theft, misuse and unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration and destruction, taking into account the nature of the personal data that we process and risks associated with it. These measures include pseudonymization where possible, including encrypting of personal data in transit and at rest, systematic vulnerability scanning and penetration testing, diligently choosing our suppliers and keeping shared data to a minimum, backups and incident management procedures. We are regularly audited and certified for ISO 27001 (Information Security Management), including Data Protection measures.
11. Data protection rights
You have the right to request from us access to and rectification or erasure of personal data or restriction of processing concerning you or to object to processing as well as the right to data portability. We do not process your personal data for automated decision-making. You are free to withdraw any consent you have given at any time.
If you have any questions or wish to exercise your rights, please contact us e.g. at support@mytherapyapp.com.
The data protection officer responsible for smartpatient and MyTherapy is Dr. Sebastian Kraska, IITR Datenschutz GmbH, Marienplatz 2, 80331 München, Germany, email@iitr.de.
You have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority.
12. Amendments
We reserve the right to amend this Privacy Policy. You can find the latest version on our website
mytherapyapp.com
.
This Privacy Policy was last changed on 12/09/2024.
Datenschutzrichtlinie für MyTherapy
MyTherapy wird von der smartpatient GmbH, Neumarkter Str. 87, 81673 München, Deutschland („smartpatient“ oder „wir“) bereitgestellt. Wir sind der Datenverantwortliche für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten über MyTherapy.
Wenn Sie MyTherapy benutzen, vertrauen Sie uns Ihre persönlichen Daten an. Wir schätzen dieses Vertrauen und verpflichten uns, Maßnahmen zu treffen, um Ihre Daten zu schützen, Ihre Datenschutzrechte zu wahren und Transparenz über die Datenverarbeitung herzustellen.
Der Zweck unserer Datenschutzrichtlinie besteht darin, Sie zu informieren, welche Daten wir verarbeiten, wie sie verwendet und weitergegeben werden, und wie Sie die Verarbeitung gestalten können. Wir geben gesundheitsbezogene persönliche Daten niemals ohne Ihre Zustimmung an Dritte weiter.
1. MyTherapy Grundfunktionen
Die Nutzung der Grundfunktionen von MyTherapy erfordert die Verarbeitung Ihrer Gesundheitsdaten. Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten für die Basisfunktionalität ist Ihre Einwilligung (Artikel 6 Abs. 1a) und Artikel 9 Abs. 2a) der DSGVO). Wenn Sie diese Einwilligung widerrufen, können Sie MyTherapy nicht weiter nutzen.
a) MyTherapy Benutzerkonto
Sie können MyTherapy mit oder ohne Registrierung eines Benutzerkontos („Konto“) nutzen. Wenn Sie kein Konto registrieren, müssen Sie keine personenbezogenen Daten wie E-Mail-Adresse angeben. Daher verarbeiten wir lediglich die technischen Daten, die für die Verarbeitung und Übertragung von Informationen notwendig sind.
Allerdings können Sie MyTherapy ohne ein Konto nur auf einem Smartphone nutzen, und wenn Sie Ihr Smartphone verlieren, können Sie diese Daten nicht wiederherstellen.
Für die Registrierung eines Kontos müssen Sie Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und ein Passwort angeben.
Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten in beiden Fällen ist Ihre Einwilligung (Artikel 6 Abs. 1a) und Artikel 9 Abs. 2a) der DSGVO).
b) Ausführen von MyTherapy
Bei der Nutzung von MyTherapy übermittelt Ihr Smartphone automatisch Datum und Uhrzeit des Zugriffs, Betriebssystem, Art des Smartphones, übertragene Datenmenge und IP-Adresse an uns weiter. Die Verarbeitung dieser Daten ist eine technische Voraussetzung für die Nutzung von MyTherapy.
c) Unterstützung Ihrer Behandlung
Sie können MyTherapy nutzen, um Ihre Behandlung zu verwalten und zu dokumentieren, indem Sie z. B. Folgendes eingeben:
Behandlungspläne für Medikamente
Medikamentenvorrat für Nachfüllerinnerungen
Messwerte wie Blutdruck
Verfolgung von Injektionsstellen
Wohlbefinden oder Symptome
Aktivitäten wie Gehen, Laufen oder Schwimmen
Informationen wie Gewicht, Größe, Geschlecht, Geburtsjahr, Land und Postleitzahl
Arzttermine und Kontaktinformationen
Sie können Gesundheitsdaten aus anderen Anwendungen importieren, wie z. B. die Schrittzahl eines Fitness-Trackers über Apple HealthKit oder Google Fit, und diese Ihrer Behandlungsdokumentation hinzufügen, wenn Sie Apple und Google dies technisch erlauben. Wir verwenden die Daten von Apple HealthKit oder Google Fit nur zu diesem Zweck.
Wir verwenden Ihre Apple HealthKit oder Google Fit Daten niemals für Werbung und ähnliche Dienste oder für nutzungsbasiertes Data Mining. Wir geben die über Fitness Tracker gewonnenen Informationen nicht an Dritte weiter und verkaufen sie auch nicht an Werbeplattformen, Datenmakler oder Wiederverkäufer von Informationen und erlauben unseren Nutzern auch keine der aufgeführten Aktivitäten.
d) Auswahl der Medikamente
Über eine Medikamentendatenbank können Sie Medikamente zu Ihrer Behandlung hinzufügen. MyTherapy trifft eine Vorauswahl der Datenbank anhand der Regional- oder Spracheinstellungen Ihres Smartphones. Wenn dies nicht gelingt, verwenden wir Ihre IP-Adresse, um Ihr Land zu ermitteln.
e) Empfangen von personalisierten Inhalten
Wir verwenden Ihre Nutzungsdaten, Gesundheitsdaten und Informationen über installierte Partner Apps, um Ihnen personalisierte Inhalte zu zeigen und Ihnen Erinnerungen und Benachrichtigungen für diese Inhalte zu senden. Hierbei kann es sich um smartpatient- oder Partnerinhalte handeln. Partnerinhalte enthalten Informationen zu den Partnern. Personalisierte Inhalte können z. B. sein:
Anleitungen zur Nutzung von MyTherapy und all seiner Funktionen
Schulungsanleitungen für den Gebrauch bestimmter Medikamente, für die Patienten MyTherapy nutzen können
Informationen über Wechselwirkungen zu den über MyTherapy verwalteten Medikamenten
Informationen zu Umfragen und Studien, für die Nutzer als Teilnehmer in Frage kommen
f) Temporäres Teilen des Fortschritts mit anderen
Sie können Ihren Fortschritt mit einer zweiten Person teilen, indem Sie einen einmaligen Code verwenden, der in ein Web-Dashboard eingegeben werden kann. Diese Person kann Ihren Fortschritt 45 Minuten lang sehen. Der Code verfällt automatisch nach Verwendung. Bitte teilen Sie den Einmalcode nur mit Vertrauenspersonen.
g) Scannen von Medikationsplänen
Sie können Ihre Medikationspläne einscannen und die Daten in MyTherapy importieren. Wir beschränken die Datenverarbeitung, auf das Minimum, das notwendig ist, um Sie bei der Erstellung von Erinnerungen zu unterstützen, und verwerfen alle personenbezogenen Daten. Die Verfügbarkeit dieser Funktion und ob wir APIs von Drittanbietern zur Dekodierung der Scans verwenden müssen, hängt von dem Land und dem System ab, in dem der Medikationsplan ausgestellt wurde.
h) Pflegeperson Feature
Sie können eine Vertrauensperson einladen, Ihre Behandlung zu verfolgen und Updates zu Ihrem Fortschritt zu bekommen, indem Sie sie mit deren E-Mail-Addresse als „Pflegeperson“ hinzufügen. Ihre Pflegeperson wird E-Mails mit Infomaterial und Updates zu Ihrer Behandlung bekommen (z.B. erster Monat der Behandlung absolviert). Der Nickname, den Sie ausgesucht haben, wird in den E-Mails aufscheinen. Wir verarbeiten die E-Mail-Adresse der Pflegeperson und deren Nickname auf Ihren Wunsch. Wenn Sie eine Pflegeperson einladen, bedeutet das, dass Sie das Einverständnis haben, um deren Informationen bereitzustellen. Sie willigen ebenfalls ein, dass persönliche Daten zu Ihren Medikamenten und dem Fortschritt der Behandlung mit der Pflegeperson geteilt werden. Sie können eine Pflegeperson jederzeit löschen und somit das Teilen unterbinden.
2. Analytik und Externe Services
a) Application Tracking, Error Tracking und Debugging
Wenn Sie MyTherapy nutzen, sammeln wir Daten zu Ihrem App-Nutzungsverhalten z.B. welche Funktionalitäten genutzt werden, zu welchem Zweck, und wann. Wir analysieren Ihr App-Nutzungsverhalten statistisch, um MyTherapy zu verbessern.
Zum Application Tracking, Error Tracking und Debugging benutzen wir Crashlytics and Sentry. Wir teilen keine persönlichen Daten.
Um die Benutzerfreundlichkeit der App zu analysieren, sammeln wir Daten zu Interaktionen (z.B. zu besuchten Screens, Interaktionsmustern wie Gesten und Scrolling) und Details zu den benutzten Geräten (Gerätetyp, App Version und Betriebssystem) mit der Hilfe von UXCam. Wir teilen keine persönlichen Daten.
Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten in diesen Fällen ist unser berechtigtes Interesse (Artikel 6 Abs. 1f) DSGVO).
b) Analytik mit Google Analytics und AppsFlyer
Mit Google Analytics (Google LLC) sammeln wir MyTherapy-Nutzungsdaten, z. B. Zeit und Dauer der App-Nutzung. Google protokolliert oder speichert die von Ihrem Smartphone übermittelte IP-Adresse nicht. Die gesammelten Nutzungsdaten werden auf Google-Servern in den USA analysiert. Weitere Informationen finden Sie unter
https://policies.google.com/privacy
.
Wir verwenden AppsFlyer, um Analysedaten über Ihre MyTherapy-Nutzung in Verbindung mit MyTherapy-Marketingkampagnen zu erhalten. Wir sammeln Daten über das technische Gerät (Gerätetyp, Betriebssystem und Version, Bildschirmauflösung usw.), die anonymisierte IP-Adresse und den Internetdienstanbieter, die in der App besuchten Seiten und die vom Benutzer angeklickten Elemente und die ID für mobile Werbung. Ort der Verarbeitung sind die Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika und die Europäische Union. Für weitere Informationen, siehe
https://www.appsflyer.com/services-privacy-policy/
.
Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu diesem Zweck ist Ihre Einwilligung (Artikel 6 Abs. 1a) der DSGVO). Sie können die Einwilligung jederzeit in den App Einstellungen widerrufen.
c) Umfragen und Fragebögen
Basierend auf Ihrem Nutzungsverhalten, können wir Sie einladen, an Umfragen und Fragebögen teilzunehmen, um besser zu verstehen, ob Ihnen MyTherapy und unsere Partnerdienste für Apotheken (wie die eRx-Medikamentenbestellung) gefallen, was Ihnen daran gefällt und wie wir es verbessern können. Die Teilnahme ist optional. Zusätzliche Einwilligungen werden eingeholt wenn nötig.
Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten in diesen Fällen ist unser berechtigtes Interesse (Artikel 6 Abs. 1f) DSGVO).
d) Versenden von Benachrichtigungen mit Leanplum
Mit Leanplum (Leanplum Inc.) senden wir Erinnerungen oder Benachrichtigungen über neue Inhalte an MyTherapy-Nutzer. Dies kann auf MyTherapy-Nutzungsdaten beruhen (z.B. Zeitpunkt der Kontoerstellung oder Datum der Teilnahme an einem bestimmten Partnermodul) und ist Teil der Basisfunktionalität von MyTherapy. Die gesammelten Informationen werden von Leanplum in den Vereinigten Staaten gespeichert. Die IP-Adresse wird nicht gespeichert. Leanplum kann die Daten keiner natürlichen Person zuordnen. Weitere Informationen finden Sie unter
https://www.leanplum.com/platform/security-privacy
.
Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten ist Ihre Einwilligung (Artikel 6 Abs. 1a) der DSGVO).
3. Aggregierte Daten
Wir aggregieren und anonymisieren Ihre persönlichen Daten, sodass sie keinen Personenbezug mehr haben und verarbeiten sie zu statistischen Zwecken z.B. um Durchschnittalter, demografische Informationen oder statistische Werte zu Symptomen und Aktivitäten von unseren Nutzern zu ermitteln. Diese Auswertung hilft uns Muster und Zusammenhänge zu erkennen. Wir teilen diese aggregierten Daten mit Partnern oder wissenschaftlichen Einrichtungen.
Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten in diesen Fällen ist unser berechtigtes Interesse (Artikel 6 Abs. 1f) DSGVO).
4. Zusammenarbeit mit Apothekenpartnern
Wir arbeiten mit Apothekenpartnern zusammen, um Ihnen den Zugang zu Apothekendiensten zur Verfügung zu stellen, wie z. B. das Einlösen Ihrer digitalen Rezepte („eRx“), die Teilnahme an Apotheken-Treueprogrammen oder die pharmazeutische Beratung, wie unten näher beschrieben („Apothekenfunktionalität“). Wir fragen Sie nach Ihrer ausdrücklichen Zustimmung, bevor Sie die Apothekenfunktionalität nutzen können. Im Einwilligungstext finden Sie weitere Informationen über den jeweiligen Apothekenpartner in Ihrem Land. Wenn Sie der Nutzung der Apothekenfunktionalität zustimmen, werden wir Ihre Benutzer-ID und Ihre persönlichen Gesundheitsdaten an den Apothekenpartner weitergeben und der Apothekenpartner wird diese Daten an uns weitergeben, soweit dies für die Bereitstellung der Apothekenfunktionalität erforderlich ist. Um die Apothekenfunktionalität in vollem Umfang nutzen zu können, kann es erforderlich sein, Ihr Benutzerkonto mit dem Konto zu koppeln, das Sie bei dem Apothekenpartner angelegt haben.
Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu diesem Zweck ist Ihre Einwilligung (Artikel 6 Abs. 1a) und Artikel 9 Abs. 2a) der DSGVO).
a) Apothekenfunktionalität: Bestellung von verschreibungspflichtigen Medikamenten
Sie können MyTherapy nutzen, um Ihr digitales Rezept (eRx) bei unserem Apothekenpartner einzureichen und eine Medikamentenerinnerung für dieses Medikament in MyTherapy einzurichten. Zu diesem Zweck tauschen wir Ihre eRx-Daten mit unserem Apothekenpartner über die in Ihrem Land vorgeschriebenen Systeme und Verfahren aus (z. B. tauschen wir in Deutschland die verschlüsselten eRx-Datencodes, die z. B. den Namen des Medikaments und des ausstellenden Arztes sowie Ihren Namen und Ihre Adresse enthalten, mit unserem Apothekenpartner über die Telematik-Infrastruktur aus), damit unser Apothekenpartner Ihnen Ihre verschreibungspflichtigen Medikamente liefern kann. Von unserem Apothekenpartner erhalten wir Details zu Ihren Medikamenten, wie z. B. den Medikamentennamen und die Packungsgröße, die es uns ermöglichen, Ihre Medikamentenerinnerung einfacher einzurichten und Ihnen Ihre Medikamentenverschreibungshistorie zu zeigen.
b) Apothekenfunktionalität: Anfordern eines Rezepts Ihres Arztes
Wenn Ihr Vorrat an verschreibungspflichtigen Medikamenten aufgebraucht ist, können Sie ein Nachfüllrezept bei Ihrem behandelnden Arzt anfordern. Wir geben Ihren Namen, das benötigte Rezept, einschließlich des Medikamentennamens und der Packungsgröße, sowie den Namen Ihres Arztes an unseren Apothekenpartner weiter, der diese Anfrage an Ihren Arzt weiterleitet.
c) Apothekenfunktionalität: Teilnahme am Treueprogramm
Sie können für die Nutzung von MyTherapy zur Verwaltung Ihrer Behandlung Treuepunkte bei Apothekenpartnern sammeln, z. B. für die Bestätigung einer Medikamenteneinnahme oder für die Einrichtung einer Erinnerung zur Messung Ihres Blutdrucks. Wir teilen die Treuepunkte, die Sie auf MyTherapy sammeln, mit unseren Apothekenpartnern.
d) Apothekenfunktionalität: Pharmazeutische Beratung
Wenn Sie Hilfe von einer Apotheke benötigen, können Sie die Chat-basierte pharmazeutische Beratung nutzen oder Termine mit der Hotline unseres Apothekenpartners für pharmazeutische Beratungsdienste vereinbaren. Wir geben Ihre Kontaktdaten an unseren Apothekenpartner weiter, damit dieser Sie kontaktieren kann. Für die Überprüfung der Arzneimittelsicherheit teilen wir unserem Apothekenpartner Ihre Informationen zur Medikamentenerinnerung mit.
e) Apothekenfunktionalität: Importieren von Medikamentenkäufen von Partnern
Sie können die Medikamente, die Sie beim Apothekenpartner bestellt haben, in MyTherapy importieren, was Ihnen die Einrichtung Ihrer Medikamentenerinnerungen erleichtert. Wir importieren die Informationen zu Ihrem Medikamentenkauf wie Medikamentenname, Dosierung und Packungsgröße von unseren Apothekenpartnern.
f) Apothekenfunktionalität: Exportieren von MyTherapy Medikationserinnerungen und Vorräten
Wir teilen Ihre Medikamenten- und Vorratsinformationen mit unseren Apothekenpartnern. Dadurch können Sie in MyTherapy Nachfüllerinnerungen anfordern und Medikamente mit geringem Vorrat bei unserem Apothekenpartner kaufen. Außerdem können Sie so Ihren Medikamentenvorrat auf der Website und in der App unseres Apothekenpartners überwachen.
g) Gemeinsame Datenkontrolle
Wir können zusammen mit dem Apothekenpartner als „gemeinsamer Datenverantwortlicher“ im Sinne von Art. 26 DSGVO in Bezug auf eine einzelne Apothekenfunktionalität sein. Wir haben eine entsprechende Vereinbarung mit dem Apothekenpartner getroffen. Wir werden Ihnen den Inhalt dieser Vereinbarung auf Ihre Anfrage hin zur Verfügung stellen.
Wenn Sie Ihre Zustimmung zu den Apothekenfunktionen widerrufen, geben wir keine personenbezogenen Daten mehr an den Apothekenpartner weiter und löschen alle damit verbundenen Daten, die wir nicht für die Bereitstellung anderer Funktionen in MyTherapy benötigen. Bitte beachten Sie, dass der Apothekenpartner die gemeinsam genutzten Daten weiterhin für andere Zwecke in seiner alleinigen Verantwortung aufbewahren und verarbeiten kann. Bitte beachten Sie die Datenschutzrichtlinien des Apothekenpartners.
5. Personalisierte Empfehlungen vom Apothekenpartner
Wir können mit Apothekenpartnern zusammenarbeiten, um Ihnen personalisierte Produkt- oder Serviceempfehlungen auf der Grundlage Ihrer App-Nutzung und Ihrer persönlichen Informationen, einschließlich Gesundheitsdaten, zu geben. Wir werden Sie für diesen Zweck um Ihre ausdrückliche Zustimmung bitten. Im Einwilligungstext werden wir Ihnen weitere Informationen über den jeweiligen Apothekenpartner in Ihrem Land geben. Wir werden niemals von Apple HealthKit oder Google Fit importierte Daten für diesen Zweck verwenden.
Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu diesem Zweck ist Ihre Einwilligung (Artikel 6 Abs. 1a) und Artikel 9 Abs. 2a) DSGVO).
a) Personalisierte Empfehlungen: Service- und Produktempfehlungen
Wir können Ihnen auf der Grundlage Ihrer Gesundheitsdaten, z. B. Ihrer Medikamente oder Ihres Behandlungsplans oder Ihrer App-Nutzung, personalisierte Empfehlungen senden. Bei diesen personalisierten Empfehlungen kann es sich um Empfehlungen für Wechselwirkungschecks, pharmazeutische Beratung und andere Dienstleistungen von Apotheken oder Ärzten sowie um redaktionelle Inhalte unseres Apothekenpartners zu nicht verschreibungspflichtigen Medikamenten und anderen Apothekenartikeln handeln, die für Ihre Arzneimittelverwaltung geeignet sind.
6. Apothekenpartner
Je nach Ihrem Standort arbeiten wir mit verschiedenen Apothekenpartnern zusammen, wie unten aufgeführt:
Shop-Apotheke B.V.
Erik de Rodeweg 11-13
NL - 5975 WD Sevenum
Niederlande
7. Nebenwirkungen und Rechtsschutz
Wenn Sie im Falle einer mutmaßlichen Nebenwirkung eines Medikaments den My Therapy-Support kontaktieren, sind wir unter Umständen dazu verpflichtet, dies zu melden. Wir werden stets Ihre Zustimmung einholen, bevor wir personenbezogene Daten zur Meldung einer mutmaßlichen Nebenwirkung an einen Partner oder an Behörden, wie z. B. die Europäische Arzneimittelagentur (EMA) weitergeben.
Zur Durchsetzung oder zum Schutz der Rechte von smartpatient kann smartpatient Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verarbeiten.
Rechtsgrundlage in diesen Fällen sind Art. 6 (1) c) DSGVO, Art. 9 (2) i) DSGVO)  bzw. Art. 9 (2) f DSGVO).
8. Datenspeicherung
a) Dauer der Datenspeicherung
Wir bewahren Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht länger auf, als es für die Zwecke, für die Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verarbeitet werden, erforderlich ist. Wenn Sie Ihr Konto löschen, löschen wir alle in dem Konto enthaltenen personenbezogenen Daten. Wir löschen auch alle personenbezogenen Daten, die in dem Konto enthalten sind, wenn Sie sich 3 Jahre lang nicht eingeloggt haben. Dies kann nicht rückgängig gemacht werden.
b) Ort der Datenspeicherung
Wenn Ihr Smartphone eine Verbindung mit dem Internet herstellt, überträgt MyTherapy Ihre Daten unter Verwendung einer Datenverschlüsselung an eine zentrale Datenbank in der Europäischen Union, die von dem technischen Dienstleister Amazon Web Services, Inc. bereitgestellt wird. Der technische Dienstleister kann auf die Daten für die Wartung, den Betrieb oder die Verwaltung der technischen Infrastruktur zugreifen.
9. Nicht-EU-Dienstleister
Wir nutzen Drittanbieter außerhalb der Europäischen Union, ergreifen aber alle Maßnahmen, um sicherzustellen, dass Ihre Daten gemäß den Anforderungen der Datenschutzgesetze der Europäischen Union und deren Angemessenheitsentscheidungen geschützt sind. Wir nutzen nur Dienstleister, die für das EU-U.S. Privacy Framework registriert sind und implementieren Standarddatenschutzklauseln, wo wir ein angemessenes Datenschutzlevel sicherstellen müssen.
10. Technische und Organisatorische Sicherheitsmaßnahmen
Wir haben technische und organisatorische Sicherheitsmaßnahmen implementiert, um Ihre Daten vor Verlust, Diebstahl, Missbrauch, unrechtmäßigem Zugriff, Offenlegung, Manipulation und Zerstörung zu schützen. Bei der Implementierung der Maßnahmen berücksichtigen wir die Art der Daten, die wir verarbeiten, und die Risiken, die mit der Verarbeitung einhergehen. Die Maßnahmen beinhalten Verschlüsselung von persönlichen Daten im Transfer und in der Speicherung, systematisches Scannen nach Sicherheitsschwachstellen, Penetration Testing, Sorgfalt bei der Auswahl von Dienstleistern und Datensparsamkeit, Backups und Prozesse, um gezielt auf Sicherheitsvorfälle zu reagieren und diese zu beheben. smartpatient ist zertifiziert nach ISO 27001 (dokumentiertes Informationssicherheitsmanagementsystem) und wird daher regelmäßig von Experten überprüft.
11. Datenschutzrechte
Sie haben das Recht, von uns Auskunft über die Sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten, deren Berichtigung oder Löschung, oder die Einschränkung der Verarbeitung zu verlangen, oder der Verarbeitung zu widersprechen, sowie das Recht auf Datenübertragbarkeit. Wir verarbeiten Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht für eine automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung. Es steht Ihnen frei, eine erteilte Einwilligung jederzeit zu widerrufen.
Wenn Sie Fragen haben oder Ihre Rechte ausüben möchten, wenden Sie sich bitte an uns, z. B. unter support@mytherapyapp.com.
Der verantwortliche Datenschutzbeauftragte für smartpatient und MyTherapy ist Dr. Sebastian Kraska, IITR Datenschutz GmbH, Marienplatz 2, 80331 München, email@iitr.de.
Sie haben das Recht, eine Beschwerde bei einer Aufsichtsbehörde einzureichen.
12. Änderungen
Wir behalten uns das Recht vor, diese Datenschutzrichtlinie zu ändern. Die neueste Version finden Sie auf unserer Website
mytherapyapp.com
.
Diese Datenschutzrichtlinie wurde zuletzt am 12/09/2024 geändert.
Politique de confidentialité de MyTherapy
MyTherapy est fourni par smartpatient GmbH, Neumarkter Str. 87, 81673 München, Allemagne (« smartpatient » ou « nous »). Nous sommes le contrôleur de données pour le traitement de vos données personnelles via MyTherapy.
1.	Compte utilisateur MyTherapy
Vous pouvez utiliser MyTherapy avec ou sans enregistrement d’un compte d’utilisateur (« Compte »). Si vous ne créez pas de Compte, vous ne devrez pas saisir de données personnelles et, par conséquent, nous ne traiterons aucune de vos données personnelles. Toutes les données que vous saisirez dans MyTherapy seront des données anonymes.
Cependant, sans Compte, vous ne pouvez utiliser MyTherapy que sur un seul smartphone et si vous perdez votre smartphone, vous ne pourrez pas restaurer ces données.
Pour créer un Compte, vous devez saisir votre adresse e-mail et un mot de passe. La base juridique du traitement de vos données personnelles est votre consentement (article 6, paragraphe 1a) et article 9, paragraphe 2a) du RGPD).
2.	Fonctionnalité de base de MyTherapy
L’utilisation de la fonctionnalité de base de MyTherapy telle que décrite plus en détail ci-dessous (« Fonctionnalité de base ») nécessite le traitement de vos données de santé. La base juridique du traitement de vos données personnelles pour la Fonctionnalité de base est votre consentement (article 6, paragraphe 1a) et article 9, paragraphe 2a) du RGPD). Vous ne pourrez plus utiliser MyTherapy si vous retirez ce consentement.
a)	Fonctionnalité de base : Utilisation de MyTherapy
Lorsque vous utilisez MyTherapy, votre smartphone nous transmet automatiquement la date et l’heure d’accès, le système d’exploitation, le type de smartphone, la quantité de données transmises et l’adresse IP. Le traitement de ces données est une exigence technique pour l’utilisation de MyTherapy.
b)	Fonctionnalité de base : Soutenir votre traitement
Vous pouvez utiliser MyTherapy pour gérer et documenter votre traitement en saisissant par exemple :
•	Programmes de traitement pour les médicaments
•	Approvisionnement en médicaments pour les rappels de renouvellement
•	Mesures comme la tension artérielle
•	Suivi du site d’injection
•	Bien-être ou symptômes
•	Activités comme la marche, la course ou la natation
•	Valeurs de laboratoires importées
•	Informations telles que le sexe, l’année de naissance, le pays et le code postal
•	Rendez-vous chez le médecin et informations de contact
c)	Fonctionnalité de base : Sélection de votre médicament
Vous pouvez ajouter des médicaments à votre traitement en utilisant une base de données de médicaments. MyTherapy présélectionne la base de données en fonction des paramètres de localisation ou de langue de votre smartphone. Si cela échoue, nous utilisons votre adresse IP pour déterminer votre pays.
d)	Fonctionnalité de base : Réception de contenu personnalisé
Nous utilisons les données relatives à votre utilisation et à votre santé pour vous présenter un contenu personnalisé et vous envoyer des rappels et des notifications concernant ce contenu. Ce contenu peut être du contenu de smartpatient ou celui du partenaire. Le contenu du partenaire comprend des informations sur le partenaire. Le contenu personnalisé peut être par exemple
•	des instructions sur la manière d’utiliser au mieux MyTherapy et toutes ses fonctionnalités
•	du contenu pédagogique sur l’administration de médicaments particuliers pour lesquels les patients peuvent utiliser MyTherapy
•	des informations concernant les interactions potentielles entre les médicaments administrés par l’intermédiaire de MyTherapy
•	des informations sur des études ou des enquêtes auxquelles les utilisateurs peuvent participer
e)    Fonctionnalité de base : Partager temporairement vos progrès avec les autres
Vous pouvez choisir de partager vos progrès avec une deuxième personne grâce à un code à usage unique à saisir dans un tableau de bord en ligne. Cette personne peut visualiser vos progrès pendant 45 minutes. Le code expire automatiquement après utilisation. Veillez à ne partager ce code à usage unique qu’avec des personnes de confiance.
3.	Coopération avec le partenaire pharmaceutique
Nous coopérons avec des pharmacies partenaires pour vous donner accès à des services pharmaceutiques tels que l’exécution de vos ordonnances numériques (« eRx »), la participation à des programmes de fidélisation en pharmacie ou la réception de conseils pharmaceutiques, comme indiqué plus en détail ci-dessous (« Fonctionnalité de pharmacie »). Nous vous demanderons votre consentement spécifique avant que vous puissiez utiliser la « Fonctionnalité de pharmacie ». Le texte de consentement vous fournira plus d’informations sur la pharmacie partenaire spécifique dans votre pays. Lorsque vous consentez à la Fonctionnalité de pharmacie, nous partageons votre identifiant et vos données de santé personnelles avec le partenaire pharmaceutique et ce dernier partage ces données avec nous, dans la mesure où cela est nécessaire pour fournir la Fonctionnalité de pharmacie. Pour utiliser pleinement la fonctionnalité de pharmacie, il peut être nécessaire d’apparier votre compte d’utilisateur avec le compte que vous avez créé auprès du partenaire pharmaceutique.
La base juridique du traitement de vos données personnelles à cette fin est votre consentement (article 6, paragraphe 1a) et article 9, paragraphe 2a) du RGPD).
a)	Fonctionnalité de pharmacie : Commande de médicaments sur ordonnance
Vous pouvez utiliser MyTherapy pour exécuter votre ordonnance numérique (eRx) auprès de notre partenaire pharmaceutique et pour configurer un rappel pour ce médicament dans MyTherapy. À cette fin, nous échangeons vos données eRx avec notre partenaire pharmaceutique en utilisant les systèmes et procédures requis dans votre pays (par exemple, en Allemagne, nous échangeons les codes de données eRx codés qui contiennent, par exemple, le nom du médicament et le médecin qui l’a délivré, ainsi que votre nom et votre adresse, avec notre partenaire pharmaceutique via l’infrastructure Telematik) afin que notre partenaire pharmaceutique puisse vous délivrer votre médicament sur ordonnance. Notre partenaire pharmaceutique nous transmet des informations sur vos médicaments, comme le nom du médicament et la taille de l’emballage, ce qui nous permet d’établir plus facilement un rappel de médication et de vous montrer l’historique de votre prescription de médicaments.
b)	Fonctionnalité de pharmacie : Demande d’ordonnance à son médecin
Lorsque votre stock de médicaments sur ordonnance est épuisé, vous pouvez demander une ordonnance de renouvellement à votre médecin traitant. Nous communiquons votre nom, l’ordonnance requise, y compris le nom du médicament et la taille de l’emballage, ainsi que le nom de votre médecin à notre partenaire pharmaceutique, qui transmet cette demande à votre médecin.
c)	Fonctionnalité de pharmacie : Participation au programme de fidélisation
Vous pouvez collecter des points de fidélité des partenaires pharmaceutiques pour l’utilisation de MyTherapy dans le cadre de la gestion de votre traitement, par exemple en confirmant la prise d’un médicament ou en programmant un rappel pour la prise de votre tension artérielle. Nous partageons les points de fidélité que vous collectez sur MyTherapy avec notre partenaire pharmaceutique.
d)	Fonctionnalité de pharmacie : Conseil en pharmacie
Si vous avez besoin de l’aide d’une pharmacie, vous pouvez utiliser le service de conseil pharmaceutique par messagerie instantanée ou prendre rendez-vous avec la ligne d’assistance téléphonique des services de conseil pharmaceutique de notre partenaire pharmaceutique. Nous partageons vos coordonnées avec notre partenaire pharmaceutique pour lui permettre de vous contacter. Pour le contrôle de la sécurité des médicaments, nous partageons vos informations de rappel de médicaments avec notre partenaire pharmaceutique.
e)	Fonctionnalité de pharmacie : Importation des achats de médicaments des partenaires
Vous pouvez importer dans MyTherapy les médicaments que vous avez commandés auprès de la pharmacie partenaire, ce qui vous permet de simplifier la mise en place de vos rappels de médicaments. Nous importons de notre partenaire pharmaceutique les informations relatives à l’achat de vos médicaments, comme le nom du médicament, la posologie et la taille de l’emballage.
f)	Fonctionnalité de pharmacie : Exportation des rappels de médicaments et de l’inventaire de MyTherapy
Nous partageons les informations sur vos médicaments et vos stock avec notre partenaire pharmaceutique. Cela vous permettra de déclencher des rappels de renouvellement dans MyTherapy et d’acheter des médicaments à faible stock auprès de notre partenaire pharmaceutique. De plus, cela peut vous permettre de surveiller votre stock de médicaments sur le site Web et l’application du partenaire pharmaceutique.
g)	Contrôle conjoint des données
Nous pouvons, avec la pharmacie partenaire, être qualifiés de « responsable conjoint du traitement des données » au sens de l’article 26 du RGPD en ce qui concerne la fonctionnalité unique de pharmacie. Nous avons conclu un accord respectif avec la pharmacie partenaire. Nous mettrons l’essence de l’arrangement à votre disposition sur demande.
Si vous retirez votre consentement en ce qui concerne les fonctionnalités de pharmacie, nous ne partageons plus les données personnelles avec la pharmacie partenaire et nous supprimons toutes les données connexes dont nous n’avons pas besoin pour fournir d’autres fonctionnalités dans MyTherapy. Veuillez noter que la pharmacie partenaire peut toujours conserver et traiter les données partagées à d’autres fins, sous la seule responsabilité de la pharmacie partenaire. Veuillez vous référer à la politique de confidentialité de la pharmacie partenaire.
4.	Recommandations personnalisées de la pharmacie partenaire
Nous pouvons nous associer à des partenaires pharmaceutiques pour vous fournir des recommandations personnalisées de produits ou de services en fonction de votre utilisation de l’application, de vos informations personnelles, y compris vos données de santé. Nous vous demanderons votre consentement spécifique à cette fin. Dans le texte de consentement, nous vous fournirons de plus amples informations sur le partenaire pharmaceutique spécifique dans votre pays. Nous n’utiliserons jamais les données importées d’Apple HealthKit ou de Google Fit à cette fin.
La base juridique du traitement de vos données personnelles à cette fin est votre consentement (article 6, paragraphe 1a) et article 9, paragraphe 2a) du RGPD).
a)	Recommandations personnalisées : Recommandations de services et de produits
Nous pouvons vous envoyer des recommandations personnalisées basées sur vos données de santé, par exemple vos médicaments ou votre plan de traitement ou votre utilisation de l’application. Ces recommandations personnalisées peuvent être des invitations pour des vérifications de la sécurité des médicaments, des conseils pharmaceutiques et d’autres services de la pharmacie ou du médecin, ainsi qu’un contenu éditorial de notre partenaire pharmaceutique sur les médicaments sans ordonnance et d’autres articles de pharmacie adaptés à la gestion de votre médication.
5.	Pharmacie partenaire
En fonction de votre localisation, nous pouvons collaborer avec différents partenaires pharmaceutiques, comme indiqué ci-dessous.
Shop-Apotheke B.V.
Erik de Rodeweg 11-13
NL - 5975 WD Sevenum
Pays-Bas
6.	Importation de données depuis Apple HealthKit et Google Fit
Vous pouvez importer des données de santé d’autres applications, comme le nombre de pas d’un tracker de fitness via Apple HealthKit ou Google Fit, et les ajouter à votre documentation de traitement, si vous autorisez techniquement Apple et Google. Nous utilisons les données d’Apple HealthKit ou de Google Fit uniquement à cette fin.
Apple HealthKit : Nous n’utilisons jamais vos données Apple HealthKit pour la publicité et les services similaires ou pour l’exploration de données basée sur l’utilisation. Nous ne divulguons pas les informations obtenues via Apple HealthKit à des tiers et ne les vendons pas à des plateformes publicitaires, des courtiers en données ou des revendeurs d’informations.
Google Fit : Nous n’utilisons pas le contenu accessible à partir de Google Fit dans le cadre de publicités, de parrainages ou de promotions, nous ne partageons pas et ne vendons pas ce contenu à des courtiers en données ou à des revendeurs d’informations, et nous n’autorisons pas nos utilisateurs à faire ce qui précède.
7.	Analytique
Nous analysons votre comportement d’utilisation de l’application et vos données pour améliorer MyTherapy. Vous pouvez désactiver cette fonction dans les paramètres de MyTherapy.
La base juridique est l’article 6, paragraphe 1f) du RGPD, intérêt légitime à fournir et améliorer MyTherapy.
a)	Analyse générale de l’utilisation de l’application
Lorsque vous utilisez MyTherapy, nous recueillons les données relatives à l’utilisation de votre application, par exemple les fonctionnalités utilisées, leur finalité et le moment de leur utilisation. À l’exception de l’adresse IP, nous analysons ces données d’utilisation de manière statistique afin d’améliorer MyTherapy.
b)	Enquêtes et questionnaires
Nous pouvons vous demander de participer à des enquêtes et à des questionnaires afin de mieux comprendre si vous appréciez MyTherapy et les services de nos partenaires pharmaceutiques (comme la commande de médicaments eRx), ce qui vous plaît et comment nous pourrions les améliorer.
c)	AppsFlyer
Nous utilisons AppsFlyer pour recevoir des données analytiques sur votre utilisation de MyTherapy liées aux campagnes de marketing de MyTherapy. Nous collectons des données sur l’appareil technique (type d’appareil, système et version d’exploitation, résolution d’écran, etc.), l’adresse IP anonymisée et le fournisseur d’accès à Internet, les pages visitées dans l’application et les éléments sur lesquels l’utilisateur a cliqué, l’ID de la publicité mobile. Les lieux de traitement sont les États-Unis d’Amérique et l’Union européenne. Pour plus d’informations, veuillez consulter le site https://www.appsflyer.com/services-privacy-policy/.
d)    UXCam
UXCam est une solution d’analyse qui nous permet d’obtenir des informations sur la convivialité de MyTherapy et sur la manière dont nous pouvons l’améliorer.
UXCam peut enregistrer : Les écrans visités, les modèles d’interaction (tels que les actions sur l’écran, les gestes : tapotements, défilements), et les détails du dispositif (type, version, modèle, système d’exploitation). Nous ne partageons pas de données personnelles avec UXCam. Les données personnelles sont retirées des enregistrements de manière proactive.
e)	Autres outils
Pour le suivi des applications, le signalement des erreurs et le débogage, nous utilisons Crashlytics et Sentry. Nous ne partageons aucune donnée identifiable.
8.	Analyse à l’aide de Google Analytics pour les applications mobiles et pour Firebase
Avec Google Analytics (Google LLC), nous collectons les données d’utilisation de MyTherapy, par exemple l’heure et la durée d’utilisation de l’application. Nous ne partageons aucune donnée identifiable avec Google. Google n’enregistre ni ne stocke l’adresse IP transmise par votre smartphone. Les données d’utilisation collectées sont analysées sur les serveurs de Google aux États-Unis. Pour plus d’informations, veuillez consulter le site www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/.
La base juridique du traitement de vos données personnelles à cette fin est votre consentement (article 6, paragraphe 1a) du RGPD).
9.    Envoi de notifications en utilisant Leanplum
Avec Leanplum (Leanplum Inc.), nous envoyons des rappels ou des notifications de contenu aux utilisateurs de MyTherapy. Cela peut être basé sur les données d’utilisation de MyTherapy (par exemple, l’heure de création du compte ou la date d’adhésion à un module partenaire particulier) et fait partie des fonctionnalités de base de MyTherapy. Les informations recueillies sont stockées par Leanplum aux États-Unis. L’adresse IP est ignorée. Leanplum ne peut pas attribuer les données à une personne physique. Pour plus d’informations, veuillez consulter : https://www.leanplum.com/platform/security-privacy.
10.   Événements indésirables et protection des droits
Si vous signalez un événement indésirable suspecté en contactant le service d’assistance MyTherapy, nous pouvons être obligés de signaler cet événement indésirable. smartpatient obtiendra toujours votre consentement avant de partager des informations personnelles pour signaler un événement indésirable à un partenaire ou à une autorité telle que l’Agence européenne des médicaments (EMA).
Afin de faire respecter ou de protéger les droits de smartpatient, smartpatient peut traiter vos données personnelles.
[Base juridique : Art. 6 (1) f) RGPD, respectivement Art. 9 (2) f RGPD)]
11.	Stockage des données
a)	Durée de conservation des données
Nous conservons vos données personnelles pendant une durée n’excédant pas celle nécessaire à la réalisation des objectifs pour lesquels elles sont traitées. Si vous supprimez votre Compte, nous supprimons toutes les données personnelles contenues dans le Compte. Nous supprimons également toutes les données personnelles contenues dans le Compte si vous ne vous êtes pas connecté pendant trois ans. Cette suppression ne peut pas être annulée.
b)	Lieu de stockage des données
Lorsque votre smartphone se connecte à Internet, MyTherapy transmet vos données en utilisant le cryptage des données à une base de données centralisée située dans l’Union européenne fournie par le fournisseur de services techniques Amazon Web Services, Inc. Le prestataire de services techniques peut accéder aux données pour la maintenance, l’exploitation ou l’administration de l’infrastructure technique.
12.	Prestataires de services hors UE
Nous pouvons faire appel à des prestataires de services tiers situés en dehors de l’Union européenne, mais nous prenons toutes les mesures nécessaires pour garantir que vos données sont protégées de manière adéquate conformément aux exigences des lois sur la protection des données de l’Union européenne au moyen de Clauses types de protection des données approuvées par la Commission européenne. Vous pouvez demander une copie des Clauses types de protection des données qui mettent en œuvre la protection appropriée de vos données personnelles.
13.	Droits de protection des données
Vous avez le droit de nous demander l’accès et la rectification ou l’effacement des données personnelles ou la limitation du traitement vous concernant ou de vous opposer au traitement ainsi que le droit à la portabilité des données. Nous ne traitons pas vos données personnelles à des fins de prise de décision automatisée. Vous êtes libre de retirer à tout moment le consentement que vous avez donné.
Si vous avez des questions ou si vous souhaitez exercer vos droits, veuillez nous contacter, par exemple à l’adresse mail support@mytherapyapp.com.
Le responsable de la protection des données de smartpatient et MyTherapy est le Dr Sebastian Kraska, IITR Datenschutz GmbH, Marienplatz 2, 80331 München, Allemagne, email@iitr.de.
Vous avez le droit de déposer une plainte auprès d’une autorité de surveillance.
14.	Modifications
Nous nous réservons le droit de modifier cette politique de confidentialité. Vous pouvez trouver la dernière version sur notre site web mytherapyapp.com.
Cette politique de confidentialité a été modifiée pour la dernière fois le 31.08.2023.
Política de privacidad de MyTherapy
Los servicios de MyTherapy los proporciona smartpatient GmbH, Neumarkter Str. 87, 81673 Múnich, Alemania (“smartpatient” o “nosotros”). Nosotros somos el controlador de los datos y procesamos sus datos personales a través de MyTherapy.
1.  Cuenta de usuario de MyTherapy
Puede usar MyTherapy registrando, o no, una cuenta de usuario (“Cuenta”). Si no registra una Cuenta, no tendrá que facilitar datos personales y, por tanto, no procesamos sus datos personales. Cualquier dato que facilite en MyTherapy serán datos anónimos.
No obstante, podrá usar MyTherapy sin cuenta en un solo dispositivo smartphone y, si pierde su smartphone, no podrá recuperar estos datos.
Para registrar una Cuenta, debe facilitar su dirección de correo electrónico y una contraseña. El fundamento jurídico para el procesamiento de sus datos personales se basa en su consentimiento (artículo 6 apartado 1a) y artículo 9 apartado 2a) del RGPD).
2.  Funcionalidad básica de MyTherapy
Para utilizar la funcionalidad básica de MyTherapy, como se describe más detalladamente a continuación (“Funcionalidad básica”), se requiere procesar sus datos médicos. El fundamento jurídico para el procesamiento de sus datos personales para la Funcionalidad básica se basa en su consentimiento (artículo 6 apartado 1a) y artículo 9 apartado 2a) del RGPD). No podrá usar MyTherapy si revoca este consentimiento.
a)	Funcionalidad básica: Funcionamiento de MyTherapy
Al usar MyTherapy, su smartphone nos transferirá automáticamente la fecha y hora de acceso, el sistema operativo, el tipo de smartphone, la cantidad de datos que se transfieren y la dirección IP. El procesamiento de estos datos es un requisito técnico para usar MyTherapy.
b)	Funcionalidad básica: Asistencia de su tratamiento
Puede usar MyTherapy para gestionar y documentar su tratamiento facilitando, por ejemplo, la siguiente información:
•	Pautas de medicación de un tratamiento
•	Provisión de medicamentos para crear recordatorios
•	Mediciones, como la presión arterial
•	Seguimiento de lugares de inyección
•	Bienestar o síntomas
•	Actividades como caminar, correr o nadar
•	Valores analíticos importados
•	Información como sexo, año de nacimiento, país y código postal
•	Citas médicas e información de contacto
c)	Funcionalidad básica: Selección de su medicación
Puede añadir medicamentos a su tratamiento a través de una base de datos de medicamentos. MyTherapy preselecciona la base de datos a través de los ajustes de región o idioma de su smartphone. Si esto no funciona, usamos su dirección IP para verificar su país.
d)  Funcionalidad básica: Recibir contenido personalizado
Utilizamos sus datos médicos y de uso para mostrarle contenido personalizado y le enviaremos recordatorios y notificaciones relacionados con este contenido. Este contenido puede ser contenido de smartpatient o contenido de socio. El contenido de socio incluye información sobre el socio. El contenido personalizado puede ser, por ejemplo:
•	instrucciones sobre cómo hacer el mejor uso de MyTherapy y todas sus funcionalidades
•	contenido educativo sobre la administración de determinados medicamentos para los que los pacientes pueden utilizar MyTherapy
•	información sobre posibles interacciones entre los medicamentos administrados a través de MyTherapy
•	información sobre investigaciones o encuestas en las que los usuarios pueden participar
e)  Funcionalidad básica: Compartir temporalmente el progreso con otras personas
Puede elegir compartir su progreso con una segunda persona mediante un código que se introduce una única vez en un panel web. Esta persona podrá ver su progreso durante 45 minutos. El código caduca automáticamente tras su uso. Por favor, comparta el código de un solo uso únicamente con personas de confianza.
3.  Cooperación con farmacias colaboradoras
Cooperamos con farmacias colaboradoras para que pueda acceder a servicios farmacéuticos, como la prescripción de recetas electrónicas (“eRx”), participar en programas de fidelización o recibir asesoramiento farmacéutico, tal como se explica en mayor detalle a continuación (“Funcionalidad de farmacia”). Le pediremos su consentimiento antes de usar la Funcionalidad de farmacia. En el texto del consentimiento se da más información sobre la farmacia colaboradora de su país. Cuando acepte el consentimiento de la Funcionalidad de farmacia, compartiremos su identificación de usuario y sus datos médicos con la farmacia colaboradora y esta compartirá dichos datos con nosotros, hasta donde lo permita la Funcionalidad de farmacia. Para usar la Funcionalidad de farmacia en su totalidad, es posible que tenga que emparejar su Cuenta de Usuario con la cuenta que haya creado con la farmacia colaboradora.
El fundamento jurídico para el procesamiento de sus datos personales para este fin es su consentimiento (artículo 6 apartado 1a) y artículo 9 apartado 2a) del RGPD).
a)	Funcionalidad de farmacia: Comprar medicamento sujeto a prescripción médica
Puede usar MyTherapy para adquirir su medicamento de receta electrónica (eRx) con nuestra farmacia colaboradora y crear un recordatorio para este medicamento en MyTherapy. Para este fin, intercambiamos los datos de su eRx con la farmacia colaboradora mediante los sistemas y procedimientos que se exijan en su país (p. ej., en Alemania, intercambiamos los datos de eRx cifrados que contienen p. ej., el nombre del medicamento y el doctor que lo prescribe, así como su nombre y dirección con nuestra farmacia colaboradora a través de la infraestructura Telematik), para que nuestra farmacia colaborada pueda despacharle su medicamento con receta. La farmacia colaboradora nos envía detalles sobre su medicación, como el nombre del medicamento y el tamaño del envase, para configurar de manera más fácil su recordatorio de medicación y mostrarle su historial de recetas.
b)  Funcionalidad de farmacia: Solicitar una receta a su médico
Cuando se esté agotando su medicación, podrá solicitar una nueva receta a su médico. Compartimos su nombre, la receta que se solicita con el nombre del medicamento y el tamaño del envase, así como el nombre de su médico, con nuestra farmacia colaboradora, quienes dirigirán esta solicitud a su médico.
c)  Funcionalidad de farmacia: Participar en el programa de fidelización
Puede ganar puntos de fidelización por usar MyTherapy para gestionar su tratamiento, p. ej., corroborando la toma de un medicamento o creando recordatorios para tomarse la tensión. Compartimos los puntos de fidelidad que consiga en MyTherapy con la farmacia colaborada.
d)	Funcionalidad de farmacia: Asesoramiento farmacéutico
Si necesita ayuda de una farmacia, puede usar el chat para recibir asesoramiento farmacéutico o pedir una cita a través de nuestro teléfono de ayuda con la farmacia colaborada. Compartiremos sus datos de contacto con nuestra farmacia colaborada para que contacten con usted. Para un control de seguridad de medicamentos, compartiremos la información de sus recordatorios de medicación con nuestra farmacia colaborada.
e)	Funcionalidad de farmacia: Importar compras de medicamentos
Puede importar el medicamento que haya comprado en la farmacia colaboradora en MyTherapy para facilitar la configuración de recordatorios de medicación. Importaremos la información sobre su compra de medicamentos, como el nombre del medicamento, la dosis y el tamaño del envase, desde nuestra farmacia colaboradora.
f)	Funcionalidad de farmacia: Exportar recordatorios de medicación e inventario de MyTherapy
Compartimos su información de medicamentos e inventario con nuestra farmacia colaborada. De esta forma podrá crear recordatorios para pedir recetas en MyTherapy y comprar medicamentos con bajo inventario en la página web y aplicación de la farmacia colaboradora.
g)	Controlador de datos conjuntos
Junto con la farmacia colaboradora somos “controlador de datos conjuntos” con respecto al artículo 26 del RGPD en base a la Funcionalidad de farmacia. Hemos firmado un acuerdo con la farmacia colaboradora. Le facilitaremos el acuerdo si nos lo solicita.
Si retira su consentimiento en relación con las Funcionalidades de farmacia, dejaremos de compartir sus datos personales con la farmacia colaboradora y eliminaremos cualquier dato relacionado que no necesitemos para prestarle cualquier otra funcionalidad de MyTherapy. Tenga en cuenta que la farmacia colaboradora podrá conservar y procesar los datos compartidos para otros fines, bajo la única responsabilidad de la farmacia colaboradora. Consulte la política de privacidad de la farmacia colaboradora.
4.	Recomendaciones personalizadas de la farmacia colaboradora
Podemos asociarnos con farmacias colaboradoras para ofrecer recomendaciones personalizadas sobre productos o servicios, basados en el uso que usted haga de la app y en su información personal, como los datos médicos. Le pediremos su consentimiento para este fin. En el texto del consentimiento encontrará más información sobre la farmacia colaboradora de su país. Nunca usaremos los datos importados de Apple HealthKit o Google Fit para tal fin.
El fundamento jurídico para el procesamiento de sus datos personales para este fin es su consentimiento (artículo 6 apartado 1a) y artículo 9 apartado 2a) del RGPD).
a)	Recomendaciones personalizadas: Recomendaciones de productos y servicios
Podremos enviarle recomendaciones personalizadas basadas en sus datos médicos, p. ej., sus medicamentos, plan de tratamiento o el uso que haga de la app. Estas recomendaciones personalizadas pueden ser invitaciones para un control de seguridad de medicamentos, asesoramiento u otros servicios farmacéuticos o médicos, así como contenido editorial de nuestra farmacia colaboradora sobre medicamentos sin receta y otros productos farmacéuticos adecuados para la administración de su medicamento.
5.	Farmacia colaboradora
Dependiendo de su ubicación, podremos colaborar con diferentes farmacias asociadas:
Shop-Apotheke B.V.
Erik de Rodeweg 11-13
NL - 5975 WD Sevenum
Países Bajos
6.	Importar datos de Apple HealthKit y Google Fit
Puede importar datos médicos de otras aplicaciones, como el contador de pasos de aplicaciones como Apple HealthKit o Google Fit, y añadirlos a la documentación de su tratamiento, si usted permite a Apple o a Google hacerlo. Utilizamos Apple HealthKit o Google Fit únicamente para este fin.
Apple HealthKit: Nunca usaremos sus datos de Apple HealthKit para enviarle publicidad y servicios similares ni para extraer datos. No divulgaremos información obtenida a través de Apple HealthKit a ningún tercero ni la venderemos a plataformas de publicidad, intermediarios de datos o revendedores de información.
Google Fit: No utilizaremos el contenido al que podemos acceder desde Google Fit para enviarle publicidad, patrocinios ni promociones, no compartiremos ni venderemos el contenido a ningún intermediario de datos ni revendedor de información y no permitimos a nuestros usuarios hacer nada de lo establecido anteriormente.
7.	Estadísticas
Analizamos su comportamiento en relación con el uso de la aplicación y sus datos para mejorar MyTherapy. Puede desactivar esta opción en los ajustes de MyTherapy.
El fundamento jurídico para este fin se basa en el artículo 6 apartado 1f) del RGPD, interés legítimo para prestar y mejorar MyTherapy.
a)	Estadísticas generales de uso de la app
Al usar MyTherapy recopilamos los datos de uso de la app, p. ej., qué función se utiliza, para qué y cuándo se utiliza. Excepto la dirección IP, analizamos estadísticamente estos datos de uso para mejorar MyTherapy.
b)	Encuestas y cuestionarios
Podemos pedirle participar en encuestas y cuestionarios para comprender mejor si le gusta MyTherapy y los servicios de nuestras farmacias colaboradoras (como los pedidos de medicamentos con eRx), qué le gusta y cómo podemos mejorar.
c)	AppsFlyer
Usamos AppsFlyer para recibir datos de análisis sobre el uso de MyTherapy relacionado con las campañas de marketing de MyTherapy. Recopilamos datos sobre el dispositivo técnico (tipo de dispositivo, sistema operativo y versión, resolución de pantalla, etc.), la dirección IP anonimizada y el proveedor de internet, las páginas que se visitan en la app y los productos que visita el usuario, identificador de publicidad móvil. El lugar del procesamiento son los Estados Unidos de América y la Unión Europea. Para más información, consulte https://www.appsflyer.com/services-privacy-policy/.
d)  UXCam
UXCam es una solución de análisis que nos permite obtener información sobre la utilidad de MyTherapy y cómo podemos mejorarla.
UXCam puede registrar: pantallas visitadas, patrones de interacción (como acciones en la pantalla, gestos: toques, desplazamientos) y detalles del dispositivo (tipo, versión, modelo, sistema operativo). No compartimos ningún dato personal con UXCam. Los datos personales se eliminan proactivamente de los registros.
e)	Otras herramientas
Para el seguimiento de aplicaciones, la notificación de errores y la depuración utilizamos Crashlytics y Sentry. No compartimos ningún dato que pueda servir de identificación.
8.	Estadísticas con Google Analytics para aplicaciones móviles y Firebase
A través de Google Analytics (Google LLC) recopilamos los datos de uso de MyTherapy, p. ej., hora y duración de uso de la app. No compartimos ningún dato que permita identificarle con Google. Google no registra ni almacena la dirección IP transmitida por su smartphone. Los datos de uso recopilados se analizan en los servidores de Google en Estados Unidos. Para más información, consulte www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/.
El fundamento jurídico para el procesamiento de sus datos personales para este fin es su consentimiento (artículo 6 apartado 1a) del RGPD).
9.  Envío de notificaciones mediante Leanplum
Enviaremos recordatorios o notificaciones relacionados con el contenido a los usuarios de MyTherapy mediante Leanplum (Leanplum Inc.). Podrá basarse en los datos de uso de MyTherapy (p. ej., momento de la creación de la cuenta o fecha de incorporación a un módulo de socios) y forma parte de la funcionalidad básica de MyTherapy. Leanplum almacena la información recopilada en Estados Unidos. La dirección de IP se descarta. Leanplum no atribuirá los datos a ninguna persona física. Para más información, consulte https://www.leanplum.com/platform/security-privacy.
10.  Acontecimientos adversos y protección de derechos
En caso de que notifique una sospecha de acontecimiento adverso poniéndose en contacto con el Servicio de Asistencia de MyTherapy, podemos vernos obligados a notificar dicho acontecimiento adverso. smartpatient siempre obtendrá su consentimiento antes de compartir información personal para notificar un acontecimiento adverso a un socio o autoridad como la Agencia Europea de Medicamentos (EMA).
Para hacer cumplir o proteger los derechos de smartpatient, este último puede procesar sus datos personales.
[Base legal: artículo 6, apartado 1, letra f), del RGPD, respectivamente artículo 9, apartado 2, letra d), del RGPD)]
.
11.  Almacenamiento de los datos
a)	Duración del almacenamiento de los datos
Conservamos sus datos personales durante el tiempo que sea necesario para los fines para los que se procesan sus datos personales. Si usted elimina su Cuenta, eliminaremos los datos personales que se incluyen en la Cuenta. También eliminaremos los datos personales que se incluyen en la Cuenta si no inicia sesión durante un periodo de 3 años. Esto no podrá revertirse.
b)	Ubicación del almacenamiento de los datos
Cuando su smartphone se conecta a internet, MyTherapy transfiere sus datos, mediante el cifrado de datos, a una base de datos centralizada en la Unión Europea que proporciona el proveedor de servicios Amazon Web Services, Inc. El proveedor de servicios puede acceder a los datos por razones de mantenimiento, funcionalidad o gestión de la infraestructura técnica.
12.  Proveedores de servicios fuera de la UE
Podemos depender de proveedores de servicios de terceros fuera de la Unión Europea, pero contamos con todas las medidas necesarias para garantizar la protección adecuada de sus datos, de acuerdo con las leyes de protección de datos de la Unión Europea, por medio de las Cláusulas Tipo de Protección de Datos aprobadas por la Comisión Europea. Podrá solicitar una copia de las Cláusulas Tipo de Protección de Datos mediante la cual se lleva a cabo la protección adecuada de sus datos personales.
13.  Derechos de protección de datos
Tiene derecho a solicitarnos acceder y rectificar o eliminar los datos personales o limitar el procesamiento relativo a sus datos o para objetar el procesamiento así como el derecho a la portabilidad de sus datos. No procesamos sus datos personales para tomas de decisión automatizadas. Usted es libre de retirar cualquier consentimiento que nos haya concedido en cualquier momento.
Si tiene alguna pregunta o quiere ejercer sus derechos, contacte con nosotros en support@mytherapyapp.com.
La oficina responsable de la protección de datos para smartpatient y MyTherapy es Dr. Sebastian Kraska, IITR Datenschutz GmbH, Marienplatz 2, 80331 Múnich, Alemania, email@iitr.de.
Tiene derecho a presentar una reclamación ante una autoridad supervisora.
14.  Modificaciones
Nos reservamos el derecho a modificar la presente Política de privacidad. Encontrará la última versión en nuestra página web mytherapyapp.com.
La presenta política de privacidad fue modificada por última vez el 31/08/2023.
Privacybeleid voor MyTherapy
MyTherapy wordt aangeboden door smartpatient GmbH, Neumarkter Str. 87, 81673 München, Duitsland (“smartpatient” of “we”). We zijn de verwerkingsverantwoordelijke voor het verwerken van uw persoonlijke gegevens via MyTherapy.
1.	Gebruikersaccount MyTherapy
U kunt MyTherapy gebruiken met of zonder registratie van een gebruikersaccount (“account”). Als u geen account registreert, hoeft u uw persoonlijke gegevens niet in te voeren en zullen wij uw persoonlijke gegevens dus niet verwerken. De gegevens die u invoert in MyTherapy zijn anoniem.
Zonder een account kunt u MyTherapy slechts op één smartphone gebruiken, en als u uw smartphone verliest, kunt u deze gegevens niet meer herstellen.
U dient uw e-mailadres en een wachtwoord in te voeren om een account te kunnen registreren. De wettelijke grondslag voor het verwerken van uw persoonlijke gegevens is uw toestemming (artikel 6 paragraaf 1a en artikel 9 paragraaf 2a van de AVG).
2.	De basisfunctionaliteit van MyTherapy
Voor het gebruiken van de basisfunctionaliteit van MyTherapy zoals hieronder nader uiteengezet (“basisfunctionaliteit”) moeten uw gezondheidsgegevens verwerkt worden. De wettelijke grondslag voor het verwerken van uw persoonlijke gegevens voor de basisfunctionaliteit is uw toestemming (artikel 6 paragraaf 1a en artikel 9 paragraaf 2a van de AVG). Als u uw toestemming intrekt, kunt u MyTherapy niet meer gebruiken.
a)	Basisfunctionaliteit: MyTherapy gebruiken
Wanneer u MyTherapy gebruikt, geeft uw smartphone automatisch de datum en tijd van toegang, het besturingssysteem, type smartphone, hoeveelheid verzonden gegevens en IP-adres aan ons door. Het verwerken van deze gegevens is technisch vereist voor het gebruiken van MyTherapy.
b)	Basisfunctionaliteit: Uw behandeling beheren
U kunt MyTherapy gebruiken om uw behandeling te beheren en vast te leggen door o.a. het volgende in te voeren:
•	Behandelschema’s voor medicatie
•	Medicatievoorraad voor herinneringen voor herhaalrecepten
•	Metingen zoals bloeddruk
•	Volgen van de injectieplaats
•	Welzijn en symptomen
•	Activiteiten zoals wandelen, hardlopen en zwemmen
•	Geïmporteerde laboratoriumwaarden
•	Informatie zoals geslacht, geboortejaar, land en postcode
•	Doktersafspraken en contactgegevens
c)	Basisfunctionaliteit: Uw medicatie toevoegen
U kunt medicatie toevoegen aan uw behandeling met behulp van een medicatiedatabase. MyTherapy selecteert vooraf de database aan de hand van de regio of taalinstellingen van uw smartphone. Als dit mislukt, gebruiken wij u IP-adres om uw land te bepalen.
d)	Basisfunctionaliteit: Gepersonaliseerde inhoud ontvangen
We gebruiken uw gebruiks- en gezondheidsgegevens om u gepersonaliseerde inhoud te tonen en herinneringen en meldingen te sturen voor deze inhoud. Deze inhoud kan zowel inhoud van smartpatient zijn als inhoud van partners. Partnerinhoud bevat informatie over de partner. De gepersonaliseerde inhoud kan bijv. zijn:
•	instructies voor optimaal gebruik van MyTherapy en al haar functionaliteiten
•	educatieve inhoud over het toedienen van bepaalde medicijnen waarvoor patiënten MyTherapy kunnen gebruiken
•	informatie over mogelijke interacties tussen geneesmiddelen die via MyTherapy worden toegediend
•	informatie over onderzoek of enquêtes waarvoor gebruikers in aanmerking kunnen komen om deel te nemen
e)    Basisfunctionaliteit: Tijdelijk delen van vorderingen met anderen
U kunt ervoor kiezen uw vorderingen te delen met een tweede persoon met behulp van een eenmalige code die kan worden ingevoerd in een webdashboard. Deze persoon kan uw vorderingen gedurende 45 minuten bekijken. De code vervalt automatisch na gebruik. Deel de eenmalige code alleen met vertrouwde personen.
3.	Samenwerking met apotheekpartner
We werken samen met apotheekpartners om u toegang te geven tot apotheekdiensten zoals het invullen van uw digitale recepten (“eRx”), deelname aan loyaliteitsprogramma’s en het ontvangen van farmaceutisch advies zoals hieronder uiteengezet (“apotheekfunctionaliteit”). We zullen u om uw specifieke toestemming vragen voordat u de apotheekfunctionaliteit kunt gebruiken. De toestemmingsverklaring geeft u meer informatie over de specifieke apotheekpartner in uw land. Wanneer u toestemming geeft voor de apotheekfunctionaliteit, delen wij uw gebruikers-ID en persoonlijke gezondheidsgegevens met de apotheekpartner en de apotheekpartner deelt de gegevens met ons voor nodig om de apotheekfunctionaliteit te kunnen aanbieden. Om de apotheekfunctionaliteit volledig te kunnen gebruiken moet u mogelijk uw gebruikersaccount koppelen met de account die u heeft aangemaakt bij de apotheekpartner.
De wettelijke grondslag voor het verwerken van uw persoonlijke gegevens voor dit doeleinde is uw toestemming (artikel 6 paragraaf 1a en artikel 9 paragraaf 2a van de AVG).
a)	Apotheekfunctionaliteit: Voorgeschreven medicatie bestellen
U kunt MyTherapy gebruiken om uw digitale recept (eRx) in te vullen bij onze apotheekpartner en om een medicatieherinnering in te stellen voor deze medicatie in MyTherapy. Voor dit doeleinde wisselen wij uw eRx-gegevens uit met onze apotheekpartner met behulp van de systemen en procedures zoals vereist in uw land (in Duitsland wisselen we de gecodeerde eRx-gegevenscodes die de naam van de medicatie en de voorschrijvende arts en uw naam en adres bevatten uit met onze apotheekpartner via de Telematik) zodat onze apotheekpartner uw medicatie bij u kan bezorgen. Van onze apotheekpartner ontvangen we gegevens over uw medicatie zoals de naam van de medicatie en de grootte van de verpakking zodat het gemakkelijker is om een medicatieherinnering in te stellen en om u de geschiedenis van de voorgeschreven medicatie te kunnen tonen.
b)	Apotheekfunctionaliteit: Een recept aanvragen bij uw arts
Als uw medicatie bijna op is, kunt u een herhaalrecept aanvragen bij uw behandelend arts. We delen uw naam, het benodigde recept (waaronder de naam van de medicatie) en grootte van de verpakking, evenals de naam van uw arts, met onze apotheekpartner, die dit verzoek doorstuurt naar uw arts.
c)	Apotheekfunctionaliteit: Deelname aan loyaliteitsprogramma’s
U kunt loyaliteitspunten van apotheekpartners verzamelen door MyTherapy te gebruiken voor het beheren van uw behandeling, bijvoorbeeld voor het bevestigen van het innemen van medicatie of voor het instellen van een herinnering om uw bloeddruk te meten. We delen de loyaliteitspunten die u verzamelt op MyTherapy met onze apotheekpartner.
d)	Apotheekfunctionaliteit: Farmaceutisch advies
Als u hulp nodig heeft van een apotheek, kunt u de chat voor farmaceutisch advies gebruiken of u kunt afspraken maken met de hotline van onze apotheekpartner voor farmaceutisch advies. We delen uw contactgegevens met onze apotheekpartner zodat onze apotheekpartner contact met u op kan nemen. Voor de veiligheidscontrole van de medicatie delen wij uw informatie voor de medicatieherinnering met onze apotheekpartner.
e)	Apotheekfunctionaliteit: Aankopen van partnermedicatie importeren
U kunt de medicatie die u heeft besteld bij de apotheekpartner importeren in MyTherapy zodat u uw medicatieherinneringen eenvoudiger kunt instellen. We importeren de aankoopgegevens van uw medicatie zoals de naam van de medicatie, dosering, en grootte van de verpakking van onze apotheekpartner.
f)	Apotheekfunctionaliteit: MyTherapy medicatieherinneringen en voorraad exporteren
We delen uw medicatie- en voorraadgegevens met onze apotheekpartner. Hiermee kunt u herinneringen voor herhaalrecepten in MyTherapy activeren en medicijnen die bijna op zijn kopen bij onze apotheekpartner. Hiermee kunt u mogelijk ook uw medicatievoorraad volgen op de website en app van onze apotheekpartner.
g)	Gezamenlijke verwerkingsverantwoordelijkheid
Samen met de apotheekpartner kunnen wij aangemerkt worden als de “gezamenlijke verwerkingsverantwoordelijke” in de zin van artikel 26 van de AVG met betrekking tot één apotheekfunctionaliteit. Hiertoe hebben we een overeenkomst afgesloten met de apotheekpartner. Op uw verzoek stellen we u de essentie van de overeenkomst ter beschikking.
Als u uw toestemming met betrekking tot de apotheekfunctionaliteiten intrekt, zullen we uw persoonlijke gegevens niet langer delen met de apotheekpartner en alle gerelateerde gegevens die wij niet nodig hebben voor het aanbieden van andere functionaliteit in MyTherapy verwijderen. Houd er rekening mee dat de apotheekpartner de gedeelde gegevens nog steeds voor andere doeleinden kan bewaren en verwerken, uitsluitend onder de verantwoordelijkheid van de apotheekpartner. Raadpleeg het privacybeleid van de apotheekpartner.
4.	Gepersonaliseerde aanbevelingen van de apotheekpartner
We kunnen samenwerken met apotheekpartners om gepersonaliseerde aanbevelingen voor producten en diensten aan te bieden op basis van uw gebruik van de app en persoonlijke informatie, waaronder gezondheidsgegevens. Voor dat doeleinde zullen wij u om uw specifieke toestemming vragen. In de toestemmingsverklaring vindt u meer informatie over de specifieke apotheekpartner in uw land. We zullen voor dit doeleinde nooit gegevens gebruiken die zijn geïmporteerd uit Apple HealthKit of Google Fit.
De wettelijke grondslag voor het verwerken van uw persoonlijke gegevens voor dit doeleinde is uw toestemming (artikel 6 paragraaf 1a en artikel 9 paragraaf 2a van de AVG).
a)	Gepersonaliseerde aanbevelingen: aanbevelingen voor diensten en producten
We kunnen uw gepersonaliseerde aanbevelingen sturen op basis van uw gezondheidsgegevens, uw medicatie, uw behandelplan of uw gebruik van de app. Deze gepersonaliseerde aanbevelingen kunnen uitnodigingen zijn voor veiligheidscontroles van medicatie, farmaceutisch advies of andere apotheek- of doktersdiensten, evenals content van onze apotheekpartner over medicatie zonder recept en andere apotheekprodukten die geschikt zijn voor u.
5.	Apotheekpartner
Afhankelijk van uw locatie kunnen we samenwerken met verschillende apotheekpartners die hieronder vermeld worden.
Shop-Apotheke B.V.
Erik de Rodeweg 11-13
NL - 5975 WD Sevenum
Nederland
6.	Gegevens importeren van Apple HealthKit en Google Fit
U kunt gezondheidsgegevens importeren van andere applicaties, zoals een stappenteller van een fitnessvolger via Apple HealthKit of Google Fit en deze toevoegen aan uw behandelingsdocumentatie als u Apple en Google technisch toestaat dit te doen. We gebruiken gegevens uit Apple HealthKit of Google Fit alleen voor dit doeleinde.
Apple HealthKit: We gebruiken uw Apple HealthKit-gegevens nooit voor advertenties of vergelijkbare diensten of voor datamining op basis van gebruik. We stellen geen informatie die via Apple HealthKit is verkregen beschikbaar aan derden en verkopen deze niet aan advertentieplatforms, gegevensmakelaars of informatieverkopers.
Google Fit: We gebruiken de inhoud die toegankelijk is via Google Fit niet voor advertenties, sponsoring of promoties, we delen of verkopen die inhoud niet aan gegevensmakelaars of informatieverkopers en we staan niet toe dat onze gebruikers een van de bovenstaande dingen doen.
7.	Analyses
We analyseren uw gebruiksgedrag van de app en uw gegevens om MyTherapy te verbeteren. U kunt dit uitzetten in de instelling van MyTherapy.
De wettelijke grondslag hiervoor is artikel 6 paragraaf 1f van de AVG, legitiem belang in het aanbieden en verbeteren van MyTherapy.
a)	Analyse van het gebruik van de app
Wanneer u MyTherapy gebruikt, verzamelen wij uw verbruiksgegevens van de app, bijvoorbeeld welke functionaliteit u gebruikt, wanneer en met welk doel. Behalve het IP-adres analyseren we deze gebruiksgegevens statistisch om MyTherapy te verbeteren.
b)	Enquêtes en vragenlijsten
We kunnen u vragen om deel te nemen aan enquêtes of vragenlijsten in te vullen om inzicht te krijgen in of u MyTherapy en de diensten van onze apotheekpartners (zoals het bestellen van medicatie via eRx) leuk vindt, wat u er leuk aan vindt en hoe we ze kunnen verbeteren.
c)	AppsFlyer
We gebruiken AppsFlyer om analytische gegevens te ontvangen over uw gebruik van MyTherapy gekoppeld aan marketingcampagnes van MyTherapy. We verzamelen technische gegevens over het apparaat (zoals type apparaat, besturingssysteem en versie, schermresolutie), het geanonimiseerde IP-adres en de internetprovider, bezochte pagina’s in de app en items waarop de gebruiker heeft geklikt, en mobiel advertentie-ID. Deze gegevens worden verwerkt in de Verenigde Staten en in de Europese Unie. Ga voor meer informatie naar https://www.appsflyer.com/services-privacy-policy/.
d)    UXCam
UXCam is een analytische oplossing die ons in staat stelt inzicht te krijgen in de bruikbaarheid van MyTherapy en hoe we dit kunnen verbeteren.
UXCam kan het volgende opnemen: Bezochte schermen, Interactiepatronen (zoals schermacties, gebaren: tikken, scrollen), en gegevens over het apparaat (type, versie, model, besturingssysteem). Wij delen geen persoonsgegevens met UXCam. Persoonsgegevens worden proactief uit opnamen verwijderd.
e)	Andere hulpmiddelen
Voor het volgen van toepassingen, foutrapportage en foutopsporing gebruiken wij Crashlytics en Sentry. Wij delen geen identificeerbare gegevens.
8.	Analyses met behulp van Google Analytics voor mobiele apps en voor Firebase
Met Google Analytics (Google LLC) verzamelen we gebruiksgegevens van MyTherapy, bijvoorbeeld het tijdstip en duur van het gebruik van de app. Wij delen geen identificeerbare gegevens met Google. Google registreert of bewaart het IP-adres dat door uw smartphone wordt verzonden niet. De verzamelde gebruiksgegevens worden geanalyseerd op servers van Google in de Verenigde Staten. Ga voor meer informatie naar www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/.
De wettelijke grondslag voor het verwerken van uw persoonlijke gegevens voor dit doeleinde is uw toestemming (artikel 6 paragraaf 1a van de AVG).
9.    Het versturen van meldingen met behulp van Leanplum
Met Leanplum (Leanplum Inc.) sturen we herinneringen of inhoudsmeldingen naar MyTherapy-gebruikers. Dit kan gebaseerd zijn op MyTherapy-gebruiksgegevens (bijv. tijdstip waarop een account is aangemaakt of datum van deelname aan een bepaalde partnermodule) en maakt deel uit van de basisfunctionaliteit van MyTherapy. De verzamelde informatie wordt opgeslagen door Leanplum in de Verenigde Staten. Het IP-adres wordt weggegooid. Leanplum kan de gegevens niet koppelen aan een natuurlijk persoon. Raadpleeg voor meer informatie https://www.leanplum.com/platform/security-privacy.
10.   Ongewenste voorvallen en bescherming van rechten
Indien u een vermoedelijk ongewenst voorval rapporteert door contact op te nemen met de MyTherapy Support, kunnen wij verplicht zijn om een dergelijk ongewenst voorval te rapporteren. smartpatient zal altijd uw toestemming vragen vooraleer persoonlijke informatie te delen voor het rapporteren van een ongewenst voorval aan een Partner of autoriteit zoals het Europees Geneesmiddelenbureau (EMA).
Om de rechten van smartpatient af te dwingen of te beschermen, kan smartpatient uw persoonsgegevens verwerken.
[Rechtsgrondslag: Art. 6 (1) f) GDPR, respectievelijk Art. 9 (2) f GDPR]
.
11.	Het opslaan van gegevens
a)	Duur opslag gegevens
Wij bewaren uw persoonsgegevens niet langer dan nodig is voor de doeleinden waarvoor uw persoonsgegevens worden verwerkt. Als u uw account verwijdert, verwijderen we alle persoonlijke gegevens in het account. We verwijderen ook alle persoonlijke gegevens in het account als u 3 jaar niet heeft ingelogd. Dit kan niet ongedaan gemaakt worden.
b)	Locatie opslag gegevens
Als uw smartphone verbinding maakt met het internet, verzendt MyTherapy uw gegevens met behulp van gegevenscodering naar een gecentraliseerde database in de Europese Unie die wordt aangeboden door de technische serviceprovider Amazon Web Services, Inc. De technische serviceprovider kan toegang hebben tot de gegevens voor het onderhoud, de werking of het beheer van de technische infrastructuur.
12.	Serviceproviders buiten de EU
We kunnen gebruik maken van externe serviceproviders van buiten de Europese Unie, maar we zullen voorzorgsmaatregelen nemen om ervoor te zorgen dat uw gegevens worden beschermd in overeenstemming met de vereisten van de gegevensbeschermingswetgeving van de Europese Unie. U kunt een kopie van de standaardbepalingen voor gegevensbescherming aanvragen.
13.	Rechten inzake gegevensbescherming
U heeft het recht om ons te vragen om toegang tot en rectificatie of verwijdering van persoonlijke gegevens of de verwerking die op u betrekking heeft, te beperken of om bezwaar te maken tegen het verwerken, evenals het recht op gegevensoverdraagbaarheid. Wij verwerken uw persoonsgegevens niet voor geautomatiseerde besluitvorming. U heeft het recht om uw toestemming op elk gewenst moment in te trekken.
Als u vragen heeft of uw rechten wilt uitoefenen, neem dan contact met ons op via support@mytherapyapp.com.
De functionaris voor gegevensbescherming die verantwoordelijk is voor smartpatient en MyTherapy is Dr. Sebastian Kraska, IITR Datenschutz GmbH, Marienplatz 2, 80331 München, Duitsland, email@iitr.de.
U heeft het recht om een klacht in te dienen bij een toezichthoudende instantie.
14.	Wijzigingen
We behouden ons het recht voor om dit privacybeleid te wijzigen. Op onze website mytherapyapp.com kunt u de laatste versie vinden.
Dit privacybeleid is voor het laatst gewijzigd op 31-08-2023.
MyTherapyn tietosuojakäytäntö
MyTherapy-palvelun tarjoaa smartpatient GmbH, Neumarkter Str. 87, 81673 München, Saksa (“smartpatient” tai “me”). Me olemme rekisterinpitäjä tietojesi käsittelyssä MyTherapy-palvelun kautta.
1.	MyTherapy-käyttäjätili
Voit käyttää MyTherapy-palvelua joko luomatta tai luomalla käyttäjätilin (“Tili”). Mikäli et luo Tiliä, sinun ei tarvitse syöttää henkilötietojasi, emmekä näin ollen käsittele mitään henkilötietojasi. Kaikki MyTherapy-palveluun syöttämäsi tiedot pidetään anonyymina.
Ilman tiliä voit kuitenkin käyttää MyTherapy-palvelua vain yhdellä älypuhelimella, ja jos kadotat sen, et voi palauttaa näitä tietoja.
Tilin luomiseksi sinun täytyy syöttää sähköpostiosoitteesi ja salasana. Henkilötietojesi käsittely perustuu lain mukaan suostumukseesi (GDPR, kappale 6 pykälä 1a ja kappale 9 pykälä 2a).
2.	MyTherapy-palvelun perustoiminnot
MyTherapy-palvelun perustoimintojen käyttäminen alla olevien tietojen mukaisesti (“Perustoiminnot”) vaatii terveystietojesi käsittelyä. Perustoimintoja varten tehtävä henkilötietojesi käsittely perustuu lain mukaan suostumukseesi (GDPR, kappale 6 pykälä 1a ja kappale 9 pykälä 2a). Mikäli peruutat suostumuksesi, et voi enää käyttää MyTherapy-palvelua.
a)	Perustoiminto: MyTherapy-sovelluksen käyttö
Kun käytät MyTherapy-sovellusta, älypuhelimesi lähettää tiedot päivämäärästä ja ajasta, käyttöjärjestelmästä, älypuhelimen tyypistä, siirretyn datan määrästä sekä IP-osoitteen meille automaattisesti. Näiden tietojen käsittely on MyTherapy-sovelluksen käytön tekninen vaatimus.
b)	Perustoiminto: Hoidon tukeminen
Voit käyttää MyTherapy-palvelua hoitosi hallintaan ja dokumentointiin syöttämällä esimerkiksi:
•	lääkkeenottoaikataulut
•	reseptin uusintamuistutukset
•	mittaukset, kuten verenpaine
•	rokotusalueen seuranta
•	hyvinvointi tai oireet
•	aktiviteetit, kuten kävely, juoksu tai uinti
•	muualta tuodut laboratoriotulokset
•	tiedot, kuten sukupuoli, syntymävuosi, maa ja postinumero
•	lääkärin ajanvaraukset ja yhteystiedot.
c)	Perustoiminto: Lääkityksen valinta
Voit lisätä lääkityksiä hoitoosi lääkintätietokantamme kautta. MyTherapy valitsee tietokannan automaattisesti älypuhelimesi alue- tai kielivalinnan mukaan. Jos tämä ei onnistu, määritämme asuinmaasi IP-osoitteesi perusteella.
d)	Perustoiminto: Räätälöity sisältö
Käytämme käyttö- ja terveystietojasi räätälöidyn sisällön tarjoamiseen ja lähettääksemme muistutuksia ja ilmoituksia sisällöstä. Tämä sisältö voi olla smartpatient-sisältöä tai kumppaneiden sisältöä. Kumppaneiden sisältö sisältää tietoa kumppanista. Räätälöity sisältö voi olla esimerkiksi
•	ohjeita MyTherapy-palvelun ja kaikkien sen toimintojen käyttöön
•	koulutussisältöä sellaisten lääkkeiden annosteluun, joihin potilaat voivat käyttää MyTherapy-palvelua
•	tietoa MyTherapy-palvelun avulla annosteltujen lääkkeiden yhteisvaikutuksista
•	tietoa tutkimuksista ja kyselytutkimuksista, joihin käyttäjät saattavat soveltua osallistumaan.
e)    Perustoiminto: Edistyksen jakaminen tilapäisesti muille henkilöille
Voit jakaa edistyksesi toisen henkilön kanssa käyttämällä kertakäyttöistä koodia, joka syötetään hallintapaneeliin verkossa. Kyseinen henkilö näkee edistyksesi 45 minuutin ajan. Koodi vanhenee automaattisesti käytön jälkeen. Anna kertakäyttöinen koodi vain luotettaville henkilöille.
3.	Yhteistyö apteekkikumppanien kanssa
Me teemme yhteistyötä apteekkien kanssa, jotta voit hyödyntää apteekkipalveluita, kuten e-reseptejä, apteekkien kanta-asiakasohjelmia tai farmaseuttineuvontaa. Näistä on lisätietoa alla (”Apteekkitoiminnot”). Pyydämme tähän erillisen suostumuksen ennen kuin voit käyttää Apteekkitoimintoja. Suostumusta pyydettäessä saat lisää tietoa maassasi toimivasta apteekkikumppanista. Kun annat suostumuksen Apteekkitoimintojen käyttöön, jaamme käyttäjätunnuksesi ja terveystietosi apteekkikumppanillemme, joka jakaa vastaavia tietoja meille siinä määrin kuin on tarpeen Apteekkitoimintojen tarjoamiseksi. Jotta voit käyttää Apteekkitoimintojen kaikkia ominaisuuksia, voit joutua liittämään käyttäjätilisi apteekin kanssa luomaasi tiliin.
Henkilötietojesi käsittely tähän tarkoitukseen perustuu lain mukaan suostumukseesi (GDPR, kappale 6 pykälä 1a ja kappale 9 pykälä 2a).
a)	Apteekkitoiminto: Reseptilääkkeiden tilaaminen
Voit käyttää MyTherapy-palvelua e-reseptien lääkkeiden tilaamiseen apteekista ja lääkemuistutuksen asettamiseen MyTherapy-palvelussa. Tätä tarkoitusta varten jaamme e-reseptisi tiedot apteekkikumppanillemme maassasi vaadituilla järjestelmillä ja menetelmillä (esim. Saksassa jaamme lääkkeen nimen ja reseptin myöntäneen lääkärin sekä sinun nimesi ja osoitteesi sisältävät salatut e-reseptin tiedot apteekkikumppanillemme Telematik-infrastruktuurin kautta), jotta apteekki voi toimittaa reseptilääkkeesi sinulle. Apteekkikumppanimme jakaa meille tietoja lääkityksestäsi, kuten lääkkeen nimen ja pakkauskoon, jotta voimme asettaa sinulle lääkemuistutuksen ja näyttää reseptihistoriasi sinulle.
b)	Apteekkitoiminto: Reseptin pyytäminen lääkäriltä
Kun reseptilääkkeesi on lopussa, voit pyytää lääkäriäsi uusimaan reseptin. Jaamme apteekille nimesi, reseptin tiedot, kuten lääkkeen nimen ja pakkauskoon, sekä lääkärisi nimen. Apteekki välittää nämä tiedot lääkärillesi.
c)	Apteekkitoiminto: Kanta-asiakasohjelmiin osallistuminen
Voit kerätä apteekkikumppanin kanta-asiakasohjelmaan pisteitä hallitsemalla hoitoasi MyTherapy-palvelussa, esim. vahvistamalla lääkkeenoton tai asettamalla muistutuksen verenpainemittauksesta. Jaamme tiedot MyTherapy-palvelussa keräämistäsi kanta-asiakaspisteistä apteekille.
d)	Apteekkitoiminto: Farmaseuttineuvonta
Mikäli tarvitset apua apteekilta, voit käyttää farmaseuttineuvonnan chat-palvelua tai varata ajan apteekkikumppanille farmaseuttineuvonnan puhelinpalveluun. Jaamme yhteystietosi apteekkikumppanillemme, jotta he voivat olla sinuun yhteydessä. Varmistaaksemme lääketurvallisuuden, jaamme lääkemuistutuksesi tiedot apteekkikumppanillemme.
e)	Apteekkitoiminto: Lääkeostosten tietojen tuonti
Voit tuoda tiedot apteekkikumppaniltamme tilaamistasi lääkkeistä MyTherapy-palveluun, joka helpottaa lääkemuistutusten asettamista. Tuomme apteekkikumppaniltamme tiedot lääkeostoksista, kuten lääkkeen nimen, annostuksen ja pakkauskoon.
f)	Apteekkitoiminto: MyTherapy-lääkemuistutusten ja inventaarion vienti
Jaamme tiedot lääkkeistäsi ja inventaariostasi apteekkikumppanillemme. Tämän avulla voit saada uusimismuistutuksia MyTherapy-palvelussa ja ostaa lääkkeitä apteekkikumppanilta inventaariosi ollessa vähissä. Näin voit mahdollisesti myös seurata lääkeinventaariotasi apteekkikumppanimme verkkosivuston ja sovelluksen kautta.
g)	Yhteisrekisterinpitäjä
Meitä yhdessä apteekkikumppanimme kanssa voidaan pitää yksittäisen Apteekkitoiminnon osalta ”yhteisrekisterinpitäjänä” GDPR:n 26. kappaleen mukaisesti. Olemme tehneet yhteisen sopimuksen apteekkikumppanimme kanssa. Toimitamme järjestelyn perusteet saatavillesi pyydettäessä.
Mikäli peruutat Apteekkitoimintoja koskevan suostumuksesi, emme enää jaa henkilötietojasi apteekkikumppanillemme, ja poistamme kaikki sellaiset tiedot, joita emme tarvitse muiden MyTherapy-palvelun toimintojen tarjoamiseen. Huomaathan, että apteekkikumppani voi silti säilyttää ja käsitellä jaettuja tietoja muihin tarkoituksiin heidän omalla vastuullaan. Luethan apteekkikumppanimme tietosuojaselosteen.
4.	Apteekkikumppaneiden räätälöidyt suositukset
Saatamme tehdä kumppanuussopimuksia apteekkien kanssa tarjotaksemme räätälöityjä tuote- tai palvelusuosituksia sovelluksen käyttötietojen tai henkilötietojen, mukaan lukien terveystiedot, perusteella. Pyydämme sinulta erillisen suostumuksen tähän tarkoitukseen. Suostumusta pyydettäessä saat lisää tietoja maassasi toimivasta apteekkikumppanista. Emme koskaan käytä Apple HealthKit- tai Google Fit -palveluista tuotuja tietoja tähän tarkoitukseen.
Henkilötietojesi käsittely tähän tarkoitukseen perustuu lain mukaan suostumukseesi (GDPR, kappale 6 pykälä 1a ja kappale 9 pykälä 2a).
a)	Räätälöidyt suositukset: Palvelu- ja tuotesuositukset
Saatamme lähettää sinulle räätälöityjä suosituksia terveystietojesi, kuten hoitosuunnitelmasi lääkitysten tai sovelluksen käytön, perusteella. Näitä räätälöityjä suosituksia voivat olla kutsut lääketestauksiin, farmaseuttineuvontaan tai muihin apteekki- tai lääkäripalveluihin, tai apteekkikumppanimme julkaisusisältöä reseptivapaista lääkkeistä ja muista apteekkituotteista, jotka sopivat lääkitykseesi.
5.	Apteekkikumppani
Sijainnistasi riippuen saatamme tehdä yhteistyötä eri apteekkikumppaneiden kanssa alla olevan luettelon mukaisesti.
Shop-Apotheke B.V.
Erik de Rodeweg 11-13
NL - 5975 WD Sevenum
Alankomaat
6.	Tietojen tuominen Apple HealthKit- ja Google Fit -palveluista
Voit tuoda terveystietoja muista sovelluksista, kuten askelmäärät Apple HealthKit- tai Google Fit -palveluista, ja lisätä ne hoitotietoihisi, jos sallit sen Applen ja Googlen sovelluksista. Käytämme Apple HealthKit- ja Google Fit -palveluiden tietoja ainoastaan tähän tarkoitukseen.
Apple HealthKit: Emme koskaan käytä Apple HealthKit -tietojasi mainontaan tai vastaaviin palveluihin tai käyttöön perustuvaan tiedonlouhintaan. Emme jaa Apple HealthKit -palvelun kautta saamiamme tietoja kolmansille osapuolille tai myy sitä mainonta-alustoille, tietovälittäjille tai -myyjille.
Google Fit: Emme käytä Google Fit -palvelusta saamaamme sisältöä yhteydessä mihinkään mainontaan, sponsorointiin tai promootioon, emmekä jaa tai myy sisältöä millekään tietovälittäjille tai -myyjille. Emme myöskään salli käyttäjiemme tehdä näin.
7.	Analytiikka
Analysoimme sinun sovelluskäyttäytymistä ja tietojasi parantaaksemme MyTherapy-palvelua. Voit poistaa tämän käytöstä MyTherapy-asetuksista.
Oikeusperusta on GDPR:n kappale 6, pykälä 1f, oikeutettu etu MyTherapy-palvelun tarjoamiseen ja parantamiseen.
a)	Sovelluksen käyttöön liittyvä yleinen analytiikka
Kun käytät MyTherapy-palvelua, keräämme tietoja sovelluksen käytöstä, kuten sitä, mitä toimintoja käytät, mihin niitä käytät ja milloin. Pois lukien IP-osoite, analysoimme nämä tiedot tilastollisesti parantaaksemme MyTherapy-palvelua.
b)	Kyselyt
Saatamme pyytää sinua osallistumaan erilaisiin kyselyihin ymmärtääksemme paremmin, pidätkö MyTherapy-palvelusta ja apteekkikumppaneidemme palveluista (kuten e-reseptilääkkeiden tilaus), mistä niissä pidät ja miten niitä voisi parantaa.
c)	AppsFlyer
Käytämme AppsFlyer-sivustoa saadaksemme analyyttisia tietoja MyTherapy-palvelun käytöstä liittyen MyTherapy-markkinointikampanjoihin. Keräämme tietoja teknisestä laitteesta (laitetyyppi, käyttöjärjestelmä ja versio, näytön resoluutio jne.), anonymisoidun IP-osoitteen ja internet-palveluntarjoajan, sovelluksessa selatut sivut ja käyttäjän klikkaamat kohteet sekä mobiilimainontatunnuksen. Tietojenkäsittely tapahtuu Yhdysvalloissa ja Euroopan unionissa. Saat lisätietoja sivustolta https://www.appsflyer.com/services-privacy-policy/.
d)    UXCam
UXCam on analytiikkaratkaisu, jonka avulla saamme tietoa MyTherapyn käytettävyydestä ja siitä, miten voimme parantaa sitä.
UXCam voi tallentaa: vieraillut näytöt, vuorovaikutusmallit (kuten näytön toiminnot, eleet, napautukset, selaukset) ja laitteen tiedot (tyyppi, versio, malli, käyttöjärjestelmä). Emme jaa henkilötietoja UXCamille. Henkilötiedot poistetaan tallenteista ennakoivasti.
e)	Muut työkalut
Käytämme sovelluksen seurantaaan, virheistä ilmoittamiseen ja niiden korjaamiseen Crashlytics- ja Sentry-palveluita. Emme luovuta mitään tunnistettavia tietoja.
8.	Analytiikka Google Analytics for Mobile Apps- ja Firebase -ohjelmien avulla
Google Analytics (Google LLC) -ohjelman kautta keräämme MyTherapy-palvelun käyttötietoja, kuten sovelluksen käyttöajan ja keston. Emme luovuta Googlelle mitään tunnistettavia tietoja. Google ei rekisteröi tai tallenna älypuhelimesi IP-osoitetta. Kerätyt käyttötiedot analysoidaan Googlen palvelimilla Yhdysvalloissa. Saat lisätietoa sivustolta www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/.
Henkilötietojesi käsittely tähän tarkoitukseen perustuu lain mukaan suostumukseesi (GDPR, kappale 6 pykälä 1a).
9.    Ilmoitusten lähettäminen Leanplumin kautta
Leanplumin (Leanplum Inc.) kautta lähetämme muistutuksia tai sisältöä koskevia ilmoituksia MyTherapyn käyttäjille. Tämä voi perustua MyTherapyn käyttötietoihin (esim. tilin luomisaikaan tai tiettyyn kumppanuusmoduuliin liittymisen päivämäärään) ja on osa MyTherapyn perustoimintoja. Kerätyt tiedot säilytetään Leanplumilla Yhdysvalloissa. IP-osoitetta ei säilytetä. Leanplum ei pysty yhdistämään tietoja yksittäiseen luonnolliseen henkilöön. Lisätietoja saat sivustolta https://www.leanplum.com/platform/security-privacy.
10.   Haittatapahtumat ja oikeuksien suojaaminen
Jos ilmoitat epäillystä haittatapahtumasta ottamalla yhteyden MyTherapy-tukeen, voimme joutua ilmoittamaan kyseisestä haittatapahtumasta. smartpatient pyytää aina suostumuksesi ennen henkilötietojen luovuttamista haittatapauksesta ilmoittamiseksi kumppanille tai viranomaiselle, kuten Euroopan lääkevirastolle (EMA).
smartPatient voi käsitellä henkilötietojasi smartpatient-sovelluksen oikeuksien ajamiseksi tai suojaamiseksi.
[Oikeudellinen peruste: GDPR, kappale 6 pykälä 1f ja kappale 9 pykälä 2f]
11.	Tietojen säilytys
a)	Tietojen säilytyksen kesto
Emme säilytä henkilötietojasi pidempään kuin on tarpeen henkilötietojesi käsittelyä vaativaan tarkoitukseen. Mikäli poistat Tilisi, poistamme kaikki Tiliin liittyvät henkilötiedot. Poistamme myös kaikki henkilötiedot, mikäli et ole kirjautunut tilillesi 3 vuoteen. Tätä ei voi peruuttaa.
b)	Tietojen säilytyksen sijainti
Kun älypuhelimesi yhdistyy internetiin, MyTherapy siirtää tietojasi Euroopan unionissa sijaitsevan keskitetyn salaustietokannan kautta, jonka tarjoaa Amazon Web Services, Inc. Tekninen palveluntarjoaja voi päästä käsiksi tietoihin huoltoa, korjausta tai teknisen infrastruktuurin hallintaa varten.
12.	EU:n ulkopuoliset palveluntarjoajat
Saatamme käyttää Euroopan unionin ulkopuolisia kolmannen osapuolen palveluntarjoajia, mutta teemme kaikkemme varmistaaksemme, että tietosi on asianmukaisesti suojattu Euroopan unionin tietosuojalakien vaatimusten ja EU-komission tietosuoja-asetuksen mukaisesti. Voit pyytää kopiota näistä tietosuojalausekkeista, jotka määrittelevät henkilötietojesi suojaamista koskevat säännökset.
13.	Tietosuojaoikeudet
Sinulla on oikeus nähdä, korjata tai poistaa henkilötietojasi tai rajoittaa tai vastustaa niiden käsittelyä. Sinulla on myös oikeus saada tiedot itsellesi. Emme käytä henkilötietojasi automatisoituun päätöksentekoon. Voit peruuttaa suostumuksesi milloin tahansa.
Mikäli sinulla on kysyttävää tai haluat käyttää oikeuksiasi, voit ottaa yhteyttä meihin esimerkiksi osoitteeseen support@mytherapyapp.com.
smartpatient- ja MyTherapy-palveluista vastaava tietosuojavaltuutettu on Dr. Sebastian Kraska, IITR Datenschutz GmbH, Marienplatz 2, 80331 München, Saksa, email@iitr.de.
Sinulla on oikeus tehdä valitus ylemmälle tietosuojataholle.
14.	Muutokset
Pidätämme oikeuden tehdä muutoksia tähän tietosuojaselosteeseen. Löydät uusimman version sivustoltamme mytherapyapp.com.
Tämä tietosuojaseloste on päivitetty viimeksi 31.08.2023.
Personvernerklæring for MyTherapy
MyTherapy leveres av smartpatient GmbH, Neumarkter Str. 87, 81673 München, Tyskland (“smartpatient” eller “vi”). Vi er ansvarlig for behandlingen av dine personopplysninger via MyTherapy.
1.	MyTherapy-brukerkonto
Du kan bruke MyTherapy med eller uten å registrere en brukerkonto (“konto”). Hvis du ikke registrerer en konto, trenger du ikke å oppgi personopplysninger, og vi vil dermed ikke behandle noen av dine personopplysninger. Alle data du oppgir til MyTherapy vil være anonyme data.
Uten en konto kan du imidlertid bare bruke MyTherapy på en smarttelefon, og hvis du mister smarttelefonen, vil du ikke kunne gjenopprette disse dataene.
Hvis du vil registrere en konto må du oppgi e-postadressen din og et passord. Det juridiske grunnlaget for behandling av dine personopplysninger er ditt samtykke (artikkel 6 paragraf 1a) og artikkel 9 paragraf 2a) GDPR).
2.	MyTherapys grunnleggende funksjonalitet
Bruk av den grunnleggende funksjonaliteten til MyTherapy, slik beskrevet mer detaljert nedenfor (“grunnleggende funksjonalitet”), krever behandling av helsedataene dine. Det juridiske grunnlaget for behandling av dine personopplysninger for grunnleggende funksjonalitet er ditt samtykke (artikkel 6 paragraf 1a) og artikkel 9 paragraf 2a) GDPR). Du vil ikke lenger kunne bruke MyTherapy hvis du trekker tilbake dette samtykket.
a)	Grunnleggende funksjonalitet: Kjøre MyTherapy
Når du bruker MyTherapy overfører smarttelefonen din automatisk dato og klokkeslett for tilgang, operativsystem, type smarttelefon, mengde data som overføres og IP-adresse til oss. Behandling av disse dataene er et teknisk krav for bruk av MyTherapy.
b)	Grunnleggende funksjonalitet: Støtte behandlingen din
Du kan bruke MyTherapy til å administrere og dokumentere behandlingen din ved å skrive inn for eksempel:
•	Behandlingsplaner for medisinering
•	Påminnelser om påfylling av medisiner
•	Målinger som blodtrykk
•	Sporing av injeksjonssted
•	Helsetilstand eller symptomer
•	Aktiviteter som å gå, løpe eller svømme
•	Importerte labverdier
•	Informasjon som kjønn, fødselsår, land og postnummer
•	Legeavtaler og kontaktinformasjon
c)	Grunnleggende funksjonalitet: Velge medisinering
Du kan legge til medisiner i behandlingen din ved hjelp av en medisindatabase. MyTherapy forhåndsvelger databasen ved hjelp av region- eller språkinnstillingene på smarttelefonen din. Hvis dette mislykkes, bruker vi IP-adressen din til å bestemme landet ditt.
d)	Grunnleggende funksjonalitet: Motta personlig innhold
Vi bruker dine bruks- og helsedata for å vise deg personlig innhold og sende deg påminnelser og varsler for dette innholdet. Dette innholdet kan enten være smartpatient-innhold eller Partnerinnhold. Partnerinnhold vil inkludere informasjon om Partneren. Det personlig tilpassede innholdet kan være f.eks. være:
•	instruksjoner om hvordan du best benytter deg av MyTherapy og alle dens funksjoner
•	pedagogisk innhold gjeldende administreringen av visse medisiner som pasienter kan bruke MyTherapy for
•	informasjon om potensielle interaksjoner mellom legemidler som administreres gjennom MyTherapy
•	informasjon gjeldende forskning eller undersøkelser som brukere kan være kvalifisert til å delta i
e)    Grunnleggende funksjonalitet: Midlertidig deling av fremdrift med andre
Du kan velge å dele fremdriften din med en annen person med en éngangskode som kan legges inn i et dashbord på nett. Denne personen kan se fremdriften din i 45 minuntter. Koden utløper automatisk etter bruk. Del bare éngangskoden med personer du stoler på.
3.	Samarbeid med apotekpartner
Vi samarbeider med apotekpartnere for å gi deg tilgang til apotektjenester som å fylle ut dine digitale resepter (“eRx”), delta i apoteklojalitetsprogrammer eller motta farmasøytisk rådgivning som beskrevet mer detaljert nedenfor (“apotekfunksjonalitet”). Vi vil be deg om ditt spesifikke samtykke før du kan bruke apotekfunksjonaliteten. Samtykketeksten vil gi deg mer informasjon om den spesifikke apotekpartneren i ditt land. Når du samtykker til apotekfunksjonaliteten, vil vi dele bruker-ID-en din og dine personlige helseopplysninger med apotekpartneren, og apotekpartneren vil dele slike opplysninger med oss, i den grad dette er nødvendig for å kunne tilby apotekfunksjonaliteten. Hvis du vil bruke apotekfunksjonaliteten i full grad, kan det være nødvendig å koble brukerkontoen din til kontoen du har opprettet med apotekpartneren.
Det juridiske grunnlaget for behandling av dine personopplysninger for dette formålet er ditt samtykke (artikkel 6 paragraf 1a) og artikkel 9 paragraf 2a) GDPR).
a)	Apotekfunksjonalitet: Bestilling av reseptbelagte medisiner
Du kan bruke MyTherapy til å fylle din digitale resept (eRx) med vår apotekpartner og til å sette opp en påminnelse om medisinering for denne medisinen i MyTherapy. Til dette formålet utveksler vi eRx-dataene dine med apotekpartneren vår ved hjelp av systemene og prosedyrene som kreves i ditt land (f.eks. i Tyskland utveksler vi de kodede eRx-datakodene som inneholder for eksempel legemiddelnavn og utstedende lege og ditt navn og adresse med apotekpartneren vår via Telematik-infrastrukturen), slik at apotekpartneren vår kan levere reseptbelagte medisiner til deg. Fra vår apotekpartner mottar vi detaljer om medisinen din, som legemiddelnavn og pakkestørrelse, som gjør det lettere å sette opp medisineringspåminnelsen din og vise deg historikken din om reseptbelagte medisiner.
b)	Apotekfunksjonalitet: Be om resept fra legen din
Når du har lite igjen av dine reseptbelagte medisiner, kan du be om påfyllingsresept fra din rådgivende lege. Vi deler navnet ditt, nødvendig resept inkludert legemiddelnavn og pakkestørrelse, samt navnet på legen din med vår apotekpartner, som vil videresende denne forespørselen til legen din.
c)	Apotekfunksjonalitet: Delta i lojalitetsprogram
Du kan samle inn lojalitetspoeng for apotekpartneren for å bruke MyTherapy til å administrere behandlingen din, for eksempel for å bekrefte et legemiddelinntak eller for å sette opp en påminnelse om å måle blodtrykket ditt. Vi deler lojalitetspoengene du samler på MyTherapy med vår apotekpartner.
d)	Apotekfunksjonalitet: Farmasøytisk rådgivning
Hvis du trenger hjelp fra et apotek, kan du bruke chat-basert farmasøytisk rådgivning, eller du kan planlegge avtaler med apotekpartnerens farmasøytiske rådgivningstjenester over telefon. Vi deler kontaktinformasjonen din med apotekpartneren vår for å la apotekpartneren vår kontakte deg. For legemiddelsikkerhetskontrollen deler vi informasjon om medisinpåminnelse med apotekpartneren vår.
e)	Apotekfunksjonalitet: Importere kjøp av partnermedisiner
Du kan importere medisinen du har bestilt fra apotekpartneren til MyTherapy, som lar deg forenkle oppsettet av medisinpåminnelsene dine. Vi importerer informasjon om kjøp av medisiner som legemiddelnavn, dosering og pakkestørrelse fra apotekpartneren vår.
f)	Apotekfunksjonalitet: Eksportere MyTherapy medisinpåminnelser og -beholdning
Vi deler din medisin- og beholdningsinformasjon med vår apotekpartner. Dette vil tillate deg å utløse påfyllingspåminnelser i MyTherapy og kjøpe medisiner du har lite av fra vår apotekpartner. Dette kan også tillate deg å overvåke legemiddelbeholdningen din på apotekpartnerens nettsted og app.
g)	Felles dataansvar
Vi kan sammen med apotekpartneren kvalifiseres som “felles dataansvarlig” når det gjelder artikkel 26 i GDPR med hensyn til enkel apotekfunksjonalitet. Vi har inngått en respektiv ordning med apotekpartneren. Vi vil gjøre essensen av ordningen tilgjengelig for deg på din forespørsel.
Hvis du trekker tilbake samtykket ditt med hensyn til apotekfunksjonene, vil vi ikke lenger dele personopplysninger med apotekpartneren og sletter eventuelle relaterte data som vi ikke trenger for å tilby annen funksjonalitet i MyTherapy. Vær oppmerksom på at apotekpartneren fortsatt kan beholde og behandle de delte dataene til andre formål på apotekpartnerens eget ansvar. Vennligst se apotekpartnerens personvernerklæring.
4.	Personlige anbefalinger fra apotekpartner
Vi kan samarbeide med apotekpartnere for å gi personlige produkt- eller tjenesteanbefalinger basert på din appbruk og personopplysninger, inkludert helsedata. Vi vil be deg om ditt spesifikke samtykke for det formålet. I samtykketeksten vil vi gi deg mer informasjon om den spesifikke apotekpartneren i ditt land. Vi vil aldri bruke data importert fra Apple HealthKit eller Google Fit for dette formålet.
Det juridiske grunnlaget for behandling av dine personopplysninger for dette formålet er ditt samtykke (artikkel 6 paragraf 1a) og artikkel 9 paragraf 2a) GDPR).
a)	Personlige anbefalinger: Tjeneste- og produktanbefalinger
Vi kan sende deg personlige anbefalinger basert på helsedataene dine, for eksempel medisinene dine, behandlingsplanen eller appbruken din. Disse personlige anbefalingene kan være invitasjoner til legemiddelsikkerhetskontroller, farmasøytisk rådgivning og andre apotek- eller legetjenester, samt redaksjonelt innhold av vår apotekpartner angående reseptfrie medisiner og andre apotekvarer som passer din legemiddelhåndtering.
5.	Apotekpartner
Vi samarbeider med forskjellige apotekpartnere som er oppført nedenfor, avhengig av hvor du befinner deg.
Shop-Apotheke B.V.
Erik de Rodeweg 11-13
NL - 5975 WD Sevenum
Nederland
6.	Importere data fra Apple HealthKit og Google Fit
Du kan importere helsedata fra andre programmer, for eksempel skritteller fra en treningssporer via Apple HealthKit eller Google Fit, og legge dem til i behandlingsdokumentasjonen din, hvis du teknisk sett tillater Apple og Google å gjøre det. Vi bruker kun Apple HealthKit- eller Google Fit-data til dette formålet.
Apple HealthKit: Vi bruker aldri Apple HealthKit-dataene dine til annonsering og lignende tjenester eller til bruksbasert datautvinning. Vi utleverer ikke informasjon som er samlet gjennom Apple HealthKit til noen tredjepart eller selger den til annonseringsplattformer, datameglere eller informasjonsforhandlere.
Google Fit: Vi bruker ikke innholdet som er tilgjengelig fra Google Fit i forbindelse med annonsering, sponsing eller kampanjer, vi deler eller selger ikke dette innholdet til noen datamegler eller informasjonsforhandler, og vi tillater ikke brukerne våre å gjøre noe av det ovennevnte.
7.	Analyser
Vi analyserer din appbruksatferd og dine data for å forbedre MyTherapy. Du kan deaktivere dette i MyTherapy-innstillingene.
Det juridiske grunnlaget er artikkel 6 paragraf 1f) GDPR, legitim interesse i å tilby og forbedre MyTherapy.
a)	Generell analyse av appbruk
Når du bruker MyTherapy samler vi inn appbruksdataene dine, for eksempel hvilken funksjonalitet som brukes, hva den brukes til og når den brukes. Bortsett fra IP-adressen analyserer vi disse bruksdataene statistisk for å forbedre MyTherapy.
b)	Undersøkelser og spørreskjemaer
Vi kan be deg om å delta i undersøkelser og fylle ut spørreskjemaer for å bedre forstå om du liker MyTherapy og våre apotekpartnertjenester (som eRx-medisinbestilling), hva du liker med det og hvordan vi kan forbedre det.
c)	AppsFlyer
Vi bruker AppsFlyer til å motta analysedata om MyTherapy-bruken din, knyttet til MyTherapy-markedsføringskampanjer. Vi samler inn data om den tekniske enheten (enhetstype, operativsystem og versjon, skjermoppløsning, o.l.), den anonymiserte IP-adressen og internettleverandøren, sider som er besøkt i appen og elementer som klikkes av brukeren, mobilannonserings-ID. Behandlingssted er USA og EU. Hvis du vil ha mer informasjon, kan du se https://www.appsflyer.com/services-privacy-policy/.
d)    UXCam
UXCam er en analyseløsning som gjør oss i stand til å få innsikt i brukervennligheten til MyTherapy og hvordan vi kan forbedre den.
UXCam kan ta opp: Besøkte skjermer, interaksjonsmønstre (som skjermhandlinger, bevegelser: trykk, scrolling) og enhetsdetaljer (type, versjon, modell, operativsystem). Vi deler ingen personopplysninger med UXCam. Personopplysninger fjernes proaktivt fra opptak.
e)	Andre verktøy
For applikasjonssporing, feilrapportering og feilsøking bruker vi Crashlytics og Sentry. Vi deler ingen identifiserbar data med andre.
8.	Analyse ved hjelp av Google Analytics for mobilapper og for Firebase
Med Google Analytics (Google LLC) samler vi inn bruksdata for MyTherapy, for eksempel tid og varighet for appbruk. Vi deler ingen identifiserbare data med Google. Google logger eller lagrer ikke IP-adressen som smarttelefonen din sender ut. De innsamlede bruksdataene analyseres på Googles servere i USA. Hvis du vil ha mer informasjon, kan du se www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/.
Det juridiske grunnlaget for behandling av dine personopplysninger for dette formålet er ditt samtykke (artikkel 6 paragraf 1a) GDPR).
9.    Sende varsler ved bruk av LeanPlum
Med LeanPlum (LeanPlum Inc.) sender vi påminnelser eller innholdsvarsler til MyTherapy-brukere. Dette kan baseres på bruksdata fra MyTherapy (f.eks. tidspunkt for opprettelse av konto eller dato for å bli med i en bestemt partnermodul) og er en del av den grunnleggende funksjonaliteten til MyTherapy. Den innsamlede informasjonen lagres av LeanPlum i USA. IP-adressen er fjernet. LeanPlum kan ikke tilskrive dataene til en fysisk person. For ytterligere informasjon, besøk https://www.leanplum.com/platform/security-privacy.
10.   Uønskede hendelser og beskyttelsen av rettighetene dine
I tilfelle du rapporterer inn en mistenkt bivirkning ved å ta kontakt med MyTherapy Support, kan vi være forpliktet til å videre rapportere en slik bivirkning. smartpatient vil alltid be om ditt samtykke før deling av personlig informasjon for innrapportering av en uønsket hendelse til en partner eller myndigheter slik som European Medicines Agency (EMA).
For å håndheve eller beskytte rettighetene til smartpatient, vil smartpatient muligens behandle personopplysningene dine for dette formålet.
[Juridisk grunnlag: Art. 6 (1) f) GDPR, henholdsvis art. 9 (2) f GDPR)]
11.	Datalagring
a)	Varighet av datalagring
Vi oppbevarer ikke personopplysningene dine lenger enn det som er nødvendig for formålene som personopplysningene dine behandles for. Hvis du sletter kontoen din, sletter vi alle personopplysninger i kontoen. Vi sletter også alle personopplysninger i kontoen hvis du ikke har logget inn på 3 år. Dette kan ikke reverseres.
b)	Plassering av datalagring
Når smarttelefonen kobler til internett, overfører MyTherapy dataene dine ved hjelp av datakryptering til en sentralisert database i EU levert av den tekniske tjenesteleverandøren Amazon Web Services, Inc. Den tekniske tjenesteleverandøren kan få tilgang til dataene for vedlikehold, drift eller administrasjon av den tekniske infrastrukturen.
12.	Tjenesteleverandører utenfor EU
Vi kan være avhengig av tredjeparts tjenesteleverandører fra utenfor EU, men vi tar alle steg for å sikre at dataene dine er tilstrekkelig beskyttet i henhold til kravene i databeskyttelseslovene i EU ved hjelp av standard databeskyttelsesklausuler godkjent av EU-kommisjonen. Du kan be om en kopi av standard databeskyttelsesklausuler som implementerer riktig beskyttelse av dine personopplysninger.
13.	Databeskyttelsesrettigheter
Du har rett til å be oss om tilgang til og korrigering eller sletting av personopplysninger, eller begrensning av behandling angående deg, eller til å protestere mot behandling samt retten til dataportabilitet. Vi behandler ikke personopplysningene dine for automatisert beslutningstaking. Du står fritt til å trekke tilbake ethvert samtykke du har gitt når som helst.
Hvis du har spørsmål eller ønsker å utøve dine rettigheter, vennligst kontakt oss på f.eks support@mytherapyapp.com.
Databeskyttelsesombudet som er ansvarlig for smartpatient og MyTherapy er dr. Sebastian Kraska, IITR Datenschutz GmbH, Marienplatz 2, 80331 München, Tyskland, email@iitr.de.
Du har rett til å sende inn en klage til en tilsynsmyndighet.
14.	Endringer
Vi forbeholder oss retten til å endre denne personvernerklæringen. Du finner den nyeste versjonen på vår hjemmeside mytherapyapp.com.
Denne personvernerklæringen ble sist endret 31.08.2023.
Integritetspolicy för MyTherapy
MyTherapy tillhandahålls av smartpatient GmbH, Neumarkter Str. 87, 81673 München, Tyskland (“smartpatient” eller “vi”). Vi är personuppgiftsansvariga för behandlingen av dina personuppgifter via MyTherapy.
1.	MyTherapy användarkonto
Du kan använda MyTherapy med eller utan ett registrerat användarkonto (“Konto”). Om du inte registrerar ett Konto behöver du inte ange några personuppgifter och, således, kommer vi inte behandla några av dina personuppgifter. Alla uppgifter du uppger till MyTherapy kommer vara anonyma uppgifter.
Däremot, kan du endast använda MyTherapy på en smartphone utan ett Konto och om du tappar bort den telefonen kommer du inte kunna återskapa dessa uppgifter.
För att registrera ett Konto måste du ange din e-postadress och ett lösenord. Den lagliga grunden för att behandla dina personuppgifter är ditt godkännande (artikel 6 § 1a) och artikel 9 § 2a) GDPR).
2.	MyTherapys grundfunktioner
För att använda grundfunktionerna i MyTherapy, som detaljeras nedan (“grundfunktion”) krävs en behandling av dina hälsouppgifter. Den lagliga grunden för att behandla dina hälsouppgifter är ditt godkännande (artikel 6 § 1a) och artikel 9 § 2a) GDPR). Du kommer inte längre kunna använda MyTherapy om du återkallar detta godkännande.
a)	Grundfunktion: Användning av MyTherapy
När du använder MyTherapy kommer din smartphone automatiskt att skicka datum och tid för användning, operativsystem, typ av smartphone, kvantitet av data som skickas och IP adress till oss. Behandlingen av dessa uppgifter är ett tekniskt krav för att använda MyTherapy.
b)	Grundfunktion: Stötta din behandling
Du kan använda MyTherapy för att sköta och dokumentera din behandling genom att t.ex. ange:
•	Behandlingsschema för mediciner
•	Påminnelser om när medicin behöver fyllas på
•	Mätningar som blodtryck
•	Spårande av injektionsställe
•	Välmående eller symptom
•	Aktiviteter som promenader, löpturer eller simning
•	Importerade labbresultat
•	Information som kön, födelseår, land och postnummer
•	Läkarbesök och kontaktinformation
c)	Grundfunktion: Val av mediciner
Du kan lägga till mediciner till din behandling med hjälp av medicindatabasen. MyTherapy väljer databas med hjälp av regionen eller språkinställningen på din smartphone. Om det inte fungerar, används din IP adress för att fastställa ditt land.
d)	Grundfunktion: Motta personligt innehåll
Vi använder dina användnings- och hälsodata för att visa dig personligt innehåll och skickar påminnelser och aviseringar för detta innehåll. Detta innehåll kan vara smartpatient-innehåll eller partnerinnehåll. Partnerinnehåll inkluderar information om partnern. Det personliga innehållet kan vara t.ex.
•	instruktioner om hur man på bästa sätt använder MyTherapy och alla dess funktioner
•	pedagogiskt innehåll om administrering av särskilda läkemedel som patienterna kan använda MyTherapy för
•	information om potentiella interaktioner mellan läkemedel som administreras genom MyTherapy
•	information om forskning eller undersökningar som användarna kan vara kvalificerade att delta i
e)    Grundfunktion: Dela dina framsteg med andra tillfälligt
Du kan välja att dela med dig av dina framsteg med någon annan med hjälp av en engångskod som kan anges i en webbaserad instrumentpanel. Personen kan se dina framsteg i 45 minuter. Koden upphör att gälla automatiskt när den har använts. Dela bara engångskoden med betrodda personer.
3.    Samarbete med apotekspartner
Vi samarbetar med apotek för att ge dig tillgång till apotekstjänster såsom att lägga in dina digitala recept (“eRx”), delta i apoteks medlemsprogram eller få läkemedelsrådgivning som detaljeras nedan (“Apoteksfunktion”). Vi kommer att be dig om specifit godkännande innan du kan använda Apoteksfunktionen. Godkännande texten kommer ge dig mer information om den specifika apotekspartnern i ditt land. När du godkänner Apoteksfunktionen kommer vi dela ditt användar-ID och personuppgifter med apotekspartnern och apotekspartnern kommer dela liknande uppgifter med oss, till den utsträckning det är nödvändigt för att ge dig Apoteksfunktionen. För att använda Apoteksfunktionen till fullo kan det vara nödvändigt att para ihop ditt Användarkonto med de konto du skapat med apotekspartnern.
Den lagliga grunden för att behandla dina personuppgifter för detta ändamål är ditt godkännande (artikel 6 § 1a) och artikel 9 § 2a) GDPR).
a)	Apoteksfunktion: Beställ receptbelagd medicin
Du kan använda MyTherapy för att hämta ut dina digitala recept (eRx) hos vår apotekspartner och ställa in en påminnelse för den medicinen i MyTherapy. För detta ändamål delar vi dina eRx uppgifter med vår apotekspartner via de system och processer som krävs för ditt land (dvs. i Tyskland delar vi de krypterade eRx datakoderna som innehåller bland annat namn på medicinen, utskrivande läkare och ditt namn och din adress med vår apotekspartner via Telematik infrastrukturen) så vår apotekspartner kan leverera din receptbelagda medicin till dig. Vi får detaljer om din medicin såsom namnet på medicinen och förpackningsstorlek från vår apotekspartner, vilket tillåter enklare påminelseinställningar samt visar dig din medicinska recepthistorik.
b)	Apoteksfunktion: Be om ett recept från din läkare
När du börjar få slut på din receptbelagda medicin kan du be om påfyllnad av ditt recept från din läkare. Vi delar ditt namn, receptet som behövs vilket inkluderar namnet på medicinen och förpackningsstorlek, samt namnet på din läkare med vår apotekspartner, som kommer vidarebefordra denna begäran till din läkare.
c)	Apoteksfunktion: Delta i medlemsprogram
Du kan samla in medlemspoäng från vår apotekspartner när du använder MyTherapy för att hantera din behandling, dvs. när du bekräftar ditt intag av mediciner eller när du ställer in en påminnelse att ta ditt blodtryck. Vi delar de medlemspoäng du samlar ihop på MyTherapy med vår apotekspartner.
d)	Läkemedelsrådgivning
Om du behöver hjälp från ett apotek kan du använda den chattbaserade farmaceutiska rådgivningen eller så kan du boka in en tid med vår apotekspartners farmaceutiska rådgivningslinje. Vi delar dina kontaktuppgifter med vår apotekspartner så vår apotekspartner kan kontakta dig. För en säkerhetskontroll av mediciner delar vi dina påminnelser för medicin med vår apotekspartner.
e)	Apoteksfunktion: Importering av köp av medicin via vår partner
Du kan importera medicinen du har beställt från vår apotekspartner till MyTherapy vilket tillåter dig att förenkla inställningen av påminnelser för medicin. Vi importerar information om ditt köp av medicin såsom namn på medicinen, dos och förpackningsstorlek från vår apotekspartner.
f)	Apoteksfunktion: Exportera MyTherapys påminnelser för medicin och inventarie
Vi delar din medicinerings- och inventarieinformation med vår apotekspartner. Detta låter dig utlösa påminnelser för påfyllning av läkemedel i MyTherapy och köpa den medicin du behöver från vår apotekspartner innan den tar slut Detta låter dig även kontrollera din inventarielista över mediciner på vår apotekspartners hemsida och i deras app.
g)	Enad uppgiftskontroll
Tillsammans med apotekspartner kan vi kvalificeras som “enade uppgiftskontrollanter” beträffande artikel 26 GDPR angående den fristående Apoteksfunktionen. Vi har ingått i ett respektive arrangemang med apotekspartnern. Vi gör huvuddelen av det arrangemanget tillgängligt vid förfrågan. 
Om du drar tillbaka ditt godkännande angående Apoteksfunktionerna delar vi inte längre dina personuppgifter med apotekspartnern och raderar alla relaterade uppgifter som inte behövs för att ge dig annan funktionalitet i MyTherapy. Notera att apotekspartnern fortfarande kan behålla och behandla de delade uppgifterna för andra orsaker i apotekspartners fulla ansvar. Vänligen hänvisa till vår apotekspartners integritetspolicy.
4.    Personliga rekommendationer från apotekspartner
Vi kan samarbeta med apotekspartners för att ge dig personliga produkt- och tjänsterekommendationer baserade på din app-användning, personuppgifter inkluderat hälsouppgifter. Vi kommer be om specifikt godkännande för detta ändamål. I godkännande texten kommer vi ge dig ytterligare information angående den specifika apotekspartnern i ditt land. Vi använder aldrig uppgifter som är importerade från Apple HealthKit eller Google Fit för detta ändamål.
Den lagliga grunden för att behandla dina personuppgifter för detta ändamål är ditt godkännande (artikel 6 § 1a) och artikel 9 § 2a) GDPR).
a)	Personliga rekommendationer: Tjänst- och produktrekommendationer
Vi kan skicka dig personliga rekommendationer baserade på dina hälsouppgifter, dvs. dina mediciner eller din behandlingsplan eller din app-användning. Dessa personliga rekommendationer kan vara inbjudningar för säkerhetskontroller av mediciner, farmaceutisk rådgivning och andra apotek- och läkartjänster så väl som redaktionellt innehåll från vår apotekspartner angående icke receptbelagd medicin och andra apoteksvaror som är lämpliga för din medicinhantering.
5.    Apotekspartner
Beroende på var du befinner dig kan vi samarbeta med olika apotekspartners som listas nedan.
Shop-Apotheke B.V.
Erik de Rodeweg 11-13
NL - 5975 WD Sevenum
Nederländerna
6.    Import av uppgifter från Apple HealthKit och Google Fit
Du kan importera hälsouppgifter från andra applikationer såsom stegräknare från en fitness tracker via Apple HealthKit eller Google Fit och lägga till det till din behandlingsdokumentation, om du tekniskt tillåter Apple och Google att göra det. Vi använder uppgifter från Apple HealthKit och Google Fit enbart i detta syfte.
Apple HealthKit: Vi använder aldrig dina uppgifter från Apple HealthKit för marknadsföring och andra liknande tjänster eller för användarbaserad datautvinning. Vi ger inte ut information vi får från Apple HealthKit till någon tredje part eller säljer den till plattformar för marknadsföring, datamäklare eller återförsäljare av information.
Google Fit: Vi använder inte de uppgifter vi tar del av från Google Fit i samband med marknadsföring, sponsorer eller kampanjer, vi delar eller säljer inte dina uppgifter till någon datamäklare eller återförsäljare av information och vi tillåter inte våra användare att göra någonting nämnt ovan.
7.    Analyser
Vi analyserar ditt appanvändningsbeteende och dina uppgifter för att förbättra MyTherapy. Du kan avaktivera detta i inställningarna i MyTherapy.
Den lagliga grunden är artikel 6 § 1f) GDPR, legitimt intresse att tillhandahålla och förbättra MyTherapy.
a)    Generell analys av appanvändning
När du använder MyTherapy samlar vi in din app-användning dvs. vilken funktion som används, vad den används för och när den används. Förutom IP adressen, analyserar vi dessa användningsuppgifter statistiskt för att förbättra MyTherapy.
b)    Undersökningar och frågeformulär
Vi kan be dig ta del av undersökningar eller frågeformulär för att bättre förstå om du gillar MyTherapy och vår apotekspartnerstjänster (som eRx beställning av medicin), vad du gillar med dem och hur de kan förbättras.
c)    AppsFlyer
Vi använder Appsflyer för att ta emot analysdata om din användning av MyTherapy som länkas till MyTherapys marknadsföringskampanjer. Vi samlar in uppgifter angående den tekniska enheten (typ av enhet, operativsystem och version, skärmupplösning etc.), den anonymiserade IP-adressen och internetleverantören, sidor som besökts i appen och objekt användaren klickade på, mobilt marknadsförings-ID. Platserna detta behandlas är USA och inom EU. För mer information, besök https://www.appsflyer.com/services-privacy-policy/.
d)    UXCam
UXCam är en analyslösning som gör det möjligt för oss att få insikter om användbarheten av MyTherapy och hur vi kan förbättra den.
UXCam kan spela in: Besökta skärmar, interaktionsmönster (som skärmaktiviteter, gester: tryck, rullning) och enhetsdetaljer (typ, version, modell, operativsystem). Vi delar inga personuppgifter med UXCam. Personuppgifter tas proaktivt bort från inspelningar.
e)    Andra verktyg
För spårning, felrapportering och felkorrigering för applikationen använder vi Crashlytics och Sentry. Vi delar inte med oss av några identifierbara data.
8.    Analyser med hjälp av Google Analytics för mobila appar och för Firebase
Med Google Analytics (Google LLC) samlar vi ihop användaruppgifter från MyTherapy, dvs. tid och längd av app-användning. Vi delar inte med oss av några identifierbara data med Google. Google loggar inte och lagrar inte den IP-adress som överförs från din smartphone. Insamlade användningsdata analyseras på Googles servrar i USA. För ytterligare information, hänvisa till www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/.
Den lagliga grunden för att behandla dina personuppgifter för detta ändamål är ditt godkännande (artikel 6 § 1a) GDPR).
9.    Skicka notiser med hjälp av Leanplum
Med Leanplum (Leanplum Inc.) skickar vi påminnelser eller meddelanden till MyTherapy-användare. Detta kan baseras på MyTherapy-användningsdata (t.ex. tidpunkt då kontot skapades eller datum för att gå med i en viss partnermodul) och är en del av MyTherapys grundläggande funktionalitet. Den insamlade informationen lagras av Leanplum i USA. IP-adressen kasseras. Leanplum kan inte tillskriva uppgifterna till en fysisk person. För ytterligare information, se https://www.leanplum.com/platform/security-privacy.
10.   Ogynnsamma händelser och skydd av rättigheter
Om du rapporterar en misstänkt ogynnsam händelse genom att kontakta MyTherapy-supporten kan det hända att vi blir förpliktigade att rapportera denna ogynnsamma händelse. smartpatient inhämtar alltid ditt medgivande innan vi delar med oss av personlig information för att rapportera en ogynnsam händelse till en partner eller en myndighet såsom Europeiska läkemedelsmyndigheten (EMA).
För att upprätthålla eller skydda smartpatients rättigheter kan smartpatient komma att behandla dina personuppgifter.
[Rättslig grund: artikel 6 § 1f GDPR respektive artikel 9 § 2f GDPR]
11.   Lagring av uppgifter
a)	Varaktighet av sparande av uppgifter
Vi behåller inte dina personuppgifter längre än vad som är nödvändigt för de ändamål för vilka dina personuppgifter behandlas. Om du avslutar ditt Konto raderar vi alla personuppgifter som finns på Kontot. Vi kommer också radera alla personuppgifter som finns på Kontot om du inte har loggat in på 3 år. Detta kan inte återskapas.
b)    Plats för lagring av uppgifter
När din smartphone kopplas till internet skickar MyTherapy dina uppgifter via kryptering till en central databas som är lokaliserad inom den Europeiska Unionen försedd av den tekniska tjänsteleverantören Amazon Web Services, Inc. Den tekniska tjänsteleverantören kan ha tillgång till uppgifterna för underhåll, drift eller administration av den tekniska infrastrukturen.
12.   Tjänsteleverantörer utanför EU
Vi kan använda tredje parts tjänsteleverantörer utanför den Europeiska Unionen, men vi tar alla nödvändiga steg för att försäkra att dina uppgifter är skyddade enligt de krav från dataskyddslagarna i den Europeiska Unionen med hjälp av standarddataskyddsklausuler godkända av EU-kommissionen. Du kan be om en kopia av de standarddataskyddsklausuler som avser det lämpliga skyddet av dina personuppgifter.
13.   Rättigheter för skydd av uppgifter
Du har rätten att be oss om tillgång och rättelse eller radering av personuppgifter eller, restriktioner på behandlandet angående dig eller, att invända på behandlingen samt rätten till dataportabilitet. Vi behandlar inte dina personuppgifter för automatiserad beslutstagning. Du kan dra tillbaka ditt godkännande när du vill.
Om du har några frågor eller önskar att utöva dina rättigheter, vänligen kontakta oss på support@mytherapyapp.com.
Det dataskyddsombud som är ansvarig för smartpatient och MyTherapy är Dr. Sebastian Kraska, IITR Datenschutz GmbH, Marienplatz 2, 80331 München, Tyskland, email@iitr.de.
Du har rätten att lämna in ett klagomål till en tillsynsmyndighet.
14.   Tillägg
Vi reserverar rätten att uppdatera denna integritetspolicy. Du kan hitta den senaste versionen på vår hemsida mytherapyapp.com.
Denna integritetspolicy uppdaterades senast 31-08-2023.
Privatlivspolitik for MyTherapy
MyTherapy leveres af smartpatient GmbH, Neumarkter Str. 87, 81673 München, Tyskland (“smartpatient” eller “vi”). Vi er den dataansvarlige for behandlingen af dine personlige data via MyTherapy.
1.	MyTherapy-brugerkonto
Du kan bruge MyTherapy ved eller uden at oprette en brugerkonto (“Konto”). Hvis du ikke opretter en konto, behøver du ikke at indtaste personlige oplysninger, og vi behandler derfor ingen af dine personlige oplysninger. Alle data, som du indtaster i MyTherapy, vil være anonyme data.
Uden en konto kan du dog kun bruge MyTherapy på én smartphone, og hvis du mister din smartphone, vil du ikke kunne gendanne disse data.
For at oprette en konto skal du indtaste din e-mailadresse og en adgangskode. Retsgrundlaget for behandling af dine personoplysninger er dit samtykke (artikel 6, stk. 1a) og artikel 9, stk. 2a) GDPR).
2.	MyTherapys grundlæggende funktionalitet
Brug af MyTherapys grundlæggende funktionalitet som beskrevet mere detaljeret nedenfor (“Grundlæggende funktionalitet”) kræver behandling af dine sundhedsoplysninger. Retsgrundlaget for behandling af dine personoplysninger til den grundlæggende funktionalitet er dit samtykke (artikel 6, stk. 1a) og artikel 9, stk. 2a) i GDPR). Du vil ikke længere kunne bruge MyTherapy, hvis du trækker dette samtykke tilbage.
a)	Grundlæggende funktionalitet: Brug af MyTherapy
Når du bruger MyTherapy, overfører din smartphone automatisk dato og klokkeslæt for adgangen, operativsystem, smartphone-type, mængden af overførte data og IP-adresse til os. Behandling af disse data er et teknisk krav for at kunne bruge MyTherapy.
b)	Grundlæggende funktionalitet: Støtte til din behandling
Du kan bruge MyTherapy til at administrere og dokumentere din behandling ved at indtaste f.eks.:
•	Behandlingsplaner for medicin
•	Medicinforsyning til påmindelser om genopfyldning
•	Målinger som blodtryk
•	Sporing af injektionssted
•	Velbefindende eller symptomer
•	Aktiviteter som at gå, løbe eller svømme
•	Importerede laboratorieværdier
•	Oplysninger som køn, fødselsår, land og postnummer
•	Lægeaftaler og kontaktoplysninger
c)	Grundlæggende funktionalitet: Valg af medicin
Du kan tilføje medicin til din behandling ved hjælp af en medicindatabase. MyTherapy vælger databasen på forhånd ved hjælp af din smartphones regions- eller sprogindstillinger. Hvis dette ikke virker, bruger vi din IP-adresse til at bestemme dit land.
d)	Grundlæggende funktionalitet: Modtagelse af personaliseret indhold
Vi bruger dine brugs- og sundhedsdata til at vise dig personaliseret indhold, og sende dig påmindelser og notifikationer om dette indhold. Dette indhold kan være indhold fra smartpatient eller partnerindhold. Partnerindhold inkluderer oplysninger om partneren. Det personlige indhold kan f.eks. være:
•	Vejledning i, hvordan man bedst udnytter MyTherapy og alle dets funktioner
•	Uddannelsesindhold om at dosere bestemt medicin, som patienter kan bruge MyTherapy til
•	Oplysninger om potentielle interaktioner mellem medicin doseret gennem MyTherapy
•	Oplysninger om research eller undersøgelser, som brugeren kan være berettiget at deltage i
e)    Grundlæggende funktionalitet: Midlertidig deling af fremskridt med andre
Du kan vælge at dele dine fremskridt med en anden person ved at anvende en engangskode, som kan indtastes i et web dashboard. Denne person kan se dine fremskridt i 45 minutter. Koden udløber automatisk efter anvendelse. Del kun engangskoden med personer, som du har tillid til.
3.	Samarbejde med apotekspartner
Vi samarbejder med apotekspartnere for at give dig adgang til apotekstjenester som f.eks. at udfylde dine digitale recepter (“eRx”), deltage i loyalitetsprogrammer for apoteker eller modtage farmaceutisk rådgivning som beskrevet mere detaljeret nedenfor (“apoteksfunktionalitet”). Vi vil bede dig om dit specifikke samtykke, før du kan bruge apoteks funktionaliteten. Samtykketeksten vil give dig flere oplysninger om den specifikke apotekspartner i dit land. Når du giver dit samtykke til apoteksfunktionaliteten, deler vi dit bruger-id og dine personlige sundhedsoplysninger med apotekspartneren, og apotekspartneren deler sådanne data med os i det omfang, det er nødvendigt for at levere apoteksfunktionaliteten. For at kunne bruge apoteksfunktionaliteten i fuldt omfang kan det være nødvendigt at forbinde din brugerkonto med den konto, du har oprettet hos apotekspartneren.
Retsgrundlaget for behandling af dine personoplysninger til dette formål er dit samtykke (artikel 6, stk. 1a) og artikel 9, stk. 2a) i GDPR).
a)	Apotekets funktionalitet: Bestilling af receptpligtig medicin
Du kan bruge MyTherapy til at udfylde din digitale recept (eRx) hos vores apotekspartner og til at oprette en påmindelse om medicinering for denne medicin i MyTherapy. Til dette formål udveksler vi dine eRx-data med vores apotekspartner ved hjælp af de systemer og procedurer, der kræves i dit land (i Tyskland udveksler vi f.eks. de kodede eRx-datakoder, der f.eks. indeholder lægemidlets navn og den udstedende læge samt dit navn og din adresse med vores apotekspartner via Telematik-infrastrukturen), så vores apotekspartner kan levere din receptpligtige medicin til dig. Fra vores apotekspartner modtager vi oplysninger om din medicin, f.eks. medicinens navn og pakningsstørrelse, som gør det nemmere at oprette en påmindelse om din medicinering og vise dig din historik over medicinordination.
b)	Apotekets funktionalitet: Anmodning om en recept fra din læge
Når du er ved at løbe tør for receptpligtig medicin, kan du hos din praktiserende læge anmode om en ny recept. Vi deler dit navn, den nødvendige recept, herunder medicinens navn og pakningsstørrelse, samt navnet på din læge med vores apotekspartner, som videresender denne anmodning til din læge.
c)	Apotekets funktionalitet: Deltagelse i loyalitetsprogram
Du kan samle loyalitetspoint fra apotekspartnere for at bruge MyTherapy til at administrere din behandling, f.eks. for at bekræfte en medicinindtagelse eller for at oprette en påmindelse om at tage dit blodtryk. Vi deler de loyalitetspoint, som du indsamler på MyTherapy, med vores apotekspartner.
d)	Apotekets funktionalitet: Lægemiddelrådgivning
Hvis du har brug for hjælp fra et apotek, kan du bruge den chatbaserede lægemiddelrådgivning, eller du kan bestille tid hos vores apotekspartners hotline for lægemiddel rådgivningstjenester. Vi deler dine kontaktoplysninger med vores apotekspartner for at give vores apotekspartner mulighed for at kontakte dig. Til kontrol af lægemiddelsikkerheden deler vi dine oplysninger om påmindelse om medicinering med vores apotekspartner.
e)	Apotekets funktionalitet: Import af køb af medicin fra partner
Du kan importere den medicin, du har bestilt fra apotekspartneren, til MyTherapy, hvilket gør det nemmere for dig at oprette dine medicinpåmindelser. Vi importerer dine oplysninger om køb af medicin som f.eks. medicinnavn, dosering og pakningsstørrelse fra vores apotekspartner.
f)	Apotekets funktionalitet: Eksport af påmindelser om medicinering og mængden af medicin du har tilbage fra MyTherapy
Vi deler oplysninger om din medicin samt mængden af medicin med vores apotekspartner. Dette giver dig mulighed for at modtage påmindelser om opfyldning i MyTherapy og købe medicin, som du er ved at løbe tør for, fra vores apotekspartner. Det kan også give dig mulighed for at overvåge mængden af medicin du har tilbage på vores apotekspartners websted og app.
g)	Fælles dataansvarlighed
Vi kan sammen med apotekspartneren kvalificere os som “fælles dataansvarlig” i henhold til art. 26 GDPR med hensyn til simpel apoteksfunktionalitet. Vi har indgået en aftale med apotekspartneren. På din anmodning kan vi stille oplysningerne af arrangementet til rådighed for dig.
Hvis du trækker dit samtykke tilbage med hensyn til Apotekets funktioner, deler vi ikke længere personoplysninger med apotekspartneren og sletter alle relaterede data, som vi ikke har brug for til at levere anden funktionalitet i MyTherapy. Bemærk venligst, at apotekspartneren stadig kan opbevare og behandle de delte data til andre formål på apotekspartnerens eneansvar. Se venligst apotekspartnerens privatlivspolitik.
4.	Personlige anbefalinger fra apotekspartneren
Vi kan indgå partnerskab med apotekspartnere for at give personlige produkt- eller tjenesteanbefalinger baseret på din brug af appen, personlige oplysninger, herunder sundhedsdata. Vi vil bede dig om dit specifikke samtykke til dette formål. I samtykketeksten vil vi give dig flere oplysninger om den specifikke apotekspartner i dit land. Vi vil aldrig bruge data importeret fra Apple HealthKit eller Google Fit til dette formål.
Retsgrundlaget for behandling af dine personoplysninger til dette formål er dit samtykke (artikel 6, stk. 1a) og artikel 9, stk. 2a) i GDPR).
a)	Personaliserede anbefalinger: Tjeneste- og produktanbefalinger
Vi kan sende dig personlige anbefalinger baseret på dine sundhedsdata, f.eks. din medicin, din behandlingsplan eller din brug af appen. Disse personlige anbefalinger kan være invitationer til kontrol af lægemiddelsikkerhed, farmaceutisk rådgivning og andre apoteks- eller lægetjenester samt redaktionelt indhold fra vores apotekspartner om ikke-receptpligtig medicin og andre apoteksvarer, der er velegnede til din medicinhåndtering.
5.	Apotekspartnere
Afhængigt af hvor du befinder dig, kan vi samarbejde med forskellige apotekspartnere som anført nedenfor.
Shop-Apotheke B.V.
Erik de Rodeweg 11-13
NL - 5975 WD Sevenum
Holland
6.	Import af data fra Apple HealthKit og Google Fit
Du kan importere sundhedsdata fra andre programmer, f.eks. antal skridt fra en fitness-tracker via Apple HealthKit eller Google Fit, og tilføje dem til din behandlingsdokumentation, hvis du giver Apple og Google tilladelse til det. Vi bruger kun Apple HealthKit- eller Google Fit-data til dette formål.
Apple HealthKit: Vi bruger aldrig dine Apple HealthKit-data til reklamer og lignende tjenester eller til brugsbaseret datamining. Vi videregiver ikke oplysninger, som vi får via Apple HealthKit, til tredjeparter og sælger dem ikke til reklameplatforme, datamæglere eller virksomheder der videresælger oplysninger.
Google Fit: Vi bruger ikke indholdet fra Google Fit i forbindelse med reklamer, sponsorater eller kampagner, vi deler eller sælger ikke dette indhold til datamæglere eller virksomheder der videresælger oplysninger, og vi tillader ikke vores brugere at gøre noget af det ovennævnte.
7.	Analyse
Vi analyserer din brugsadfærd af appen og dine data for at forbedre MyTherapy. Du kan deaktivere dette i MyTherapy-indstillingerne.
Retsgrundlaget er artikel 6 stk. 1f) GDPR, legitim interesse i at levere og forbedre MyTherapy.
a)	Generel analyse af app-brug
Når du bruger MyTherapy, indsamler vi data om din brug af appen, f.eks. hvilke funktioner der bruges, hvad de bruges til, og hvornår de bruges. Bortset fra IP-adressen analyserer vi disse brugsdata statistisk for at forbedre MyTherapy.
b)	Undersøgelser og spørgeskemaer
Vi kan bede dig om at deltage i undersøgelser og spørgeskemaer for bedre at forstå, om du kan lide MyTherapy og vores apotekspartner-tjenester (som f.eks. eRx-medicinbestilling), hvad du kan lide ved dem, og hvordan vi kan forbedre dem.
c)	AppsFlyer
Vi bruger AppsFlyer til at modtage analysedata om din brug af MyTherapy i forbindelse med MyTherapy-markedsføringskampagner. Vi indsamler data om den tekniske enhed (enhedstype, operativsystem og version, skærmopløsning osv.), den anonymiserede IP-adresse og internetudbyder, sider, der er besøgt i appen, og elementer, som brugeren har klikket på, samt mobil reklame-ID. Behandlingsstedet er USA og EU. For yderligere oplysninger, se https://www.appsflyer.com/services-privacy-policy/.
d)    UXCam
UXCam er en analyseløsning, der gør os i stand til at få indsigt i anvendeligheden af MyTherapy, og hvordan vi kan forbedre den.
UXCam kan optage: Besøgte skærme, interaktionsmønstre (såsom skærmhandlinger, bevægelser: tryk, rulninger) og enhedsdetaljer (type, version, model, operativsystem). Vi deler ingen personlige oplysninger med UXCam. Personlige oplysninger fjernes proaktivt fra optagelser.
e)	Andre værktøjer
Vi bruger Crashlytics og Sentry til applikationssporing, fejlrapportering og fejlfinding. Vi deler ingen identificerbare data.
8.	Analyse ved hjælp af Google Analytics for Mobile Apps og for Firebase
Med Google Analytics (Google LLC) indsamler vi MyTherapy-brugsdata, f.eks. tid og varighed af app-brug. Vi deler ikke identificerbare data med Google. Google lagrer ikke IP-adresser overført af din smartphone. De indsamlede brugsdata analyseres på Googles servere i USA. For yderligere oplysninger henvises til www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/.
Retsgrundlaget for behandling af dine personoplysninger til dette formål er dit samtykke (artikel 6, stk. 1a) i GDPR).
9.    Brug af Leanplu til at sende meddelelser
Med Leanplum (Leanplum Inc.) sender vi påmindelser eller meddelelser om indhold til MyTherapy-brugere. Dette kan være baseret på MyTherapy-brugerdata (f.eks. tidspunktet for oprettelse af kontoen eller datoen for tilmelding til en bestemt partnermodul), og det er en del af MyTherapy’s grundlæggende funktion. De indsamlede oplysninger opbevares af Leanplum i USA. IP-adressen kasseres. Leanplum kan ikke henføre oplysningerne til en fysisk person. For yderligere oplysninger henvises til https://www.leanplum.com/platform/security-privacy.
10. Bivirkninger og håndhævelse af rettigheder
Hvis du har rapporteret en mistænkt bivirkning ved at kontakte MyTherapy Support, kan vi være forpligtet til at rapportere sådanne bivirkninger. smartpatient vil altid indhente dit samtykke, inden persondata deles med henblik på rapportering af en bivirkning til en partner eller en myndighed såsom Det Europæiske Lægemiddelagentur (EMA).
For at håndhæve eller beskytte smartpatients rettigheder kan smartpatient behandle dine persondata.
[Juridisk grundlag: henholdsvis art. 6, stk. 1, litra f) i GDPR og art. 9, stk. 2, litra f) i GDPR]
.
11.	Opbevaring af data
a)	Varigheden af opbevaringen af data
Vi opbevarer ikke dine personoplysninger i længere tid, end det er nødvendigt for de formål, som dine personoplysninger behandles til. Hvis du sletter din konto, sletter vi alle personoplysninger, der er indeholdt i kontoen. Vi sletter også alle personoplysninger, der er indeholdt i kontoen, hvis du ikke har logget ind i 3 år. Dette kan ikke fortrydes.
b)	Placering af datalagring
Når din smartphone opretter forbindelse til internettet, overfører MyTherapy dine data ved hjælp af datakryptering til en centraliseret database i EU, som leveres af den tekniske tjenesteudbyder Amazon Web Services, Inc. Den tekniske tjenesteudbyder kan få adgang til dataene med henblik på vedligeholdelse, drift eller administration af den tekniske infrastruktur.
12.	Tjenesteydere fra lande uden for EU
Vi kan være afhængige af tredjepartstjenesteudbydere fra lande uden for EU, men vi træffer alle foranstaltninger for at sikre, at dine data er tilstrækkeligt beskyttet i henhold til kravene i EU’s databeskyttelseslovgivning ved hjælp af standarddatabeskyttelsesklausuler, der er godkendt af EU-Kommissionen. Du kan anmode om en kopi af de standardiserede databeskyttelsesklausuler, der implementerer den passende beskyttelse af dine personoplysninger.
13.	Databeskyttelsesrettigheder
Du har ret til at anmode os om adgang til og berigtigelse eller sletning af personoplysninger eller begrænsning af behandlingen af dine personoplysninger eller til at gøre indsigelse mod behandlingen samt ret til dataportabilitet. Vi behandler ikke dine personoplysninger med henblik på automatiseret beslutningstagning. Du kan til enhver tid tilbagekalde ethvert samtykke, du har givet.
Hvis du har spørgsmål eller ønsker at udøve dine rettigheder, bedes du kontakte os f.eks. på support@mytherapyapp.com.
Den ansvarlige databeskyttelsesrådgiver for smartpatient og MyTherapy er Dr. Sebastian Kraska, IITR Datenschutz GmbH, Marienplatz 2, 80331 München, Tyskland, email@iitr.de.
Du har ret til at indgive en klage til en tilsynsmyndighed.
14.	Ændringer
Vi forbeholder os retten til at ændre denne privatlivspolitik. Du kan finde den seneste version på vores websted mytherapyapp.com.
Denne privatlivspolitik blev senest ændret den 31.08.2023.
MyTherapyプライバシーポリシー
MyTherapyは、〒81673 ドイツ・ミュンヘン市ノイマルクテル通り87号 に本社を置くsmartpatient GmbH（以下、「smartpatient」または「当社」といいます）により提供されます。当社は、MyTherapyを介してお客様の個人情報を処理するデータ管理者です。
1.	MyTherapyユーザーアカウント
MyTherapyは、ユーザーアカウント（以下、「アカウント」といいます。）の登録の有無に関わらずご利用いただけます。アカウントを登録しない場合、個人情報を入力する必要はありません。従って、当社はお客様の個人情報を処理しません。お客様がMyTherapyに入力するデータは全て匿名の情報となります。
ただし、アカウントがない場合、1台のスマートフォンでのみMyTherapyをご利用いただけます。お客様がスマートフォンを紛失した場合、このデータを復元することはできません。
アカウントを登録するには、メールアドレスとパスワードを入力する必要があります。お客様の個人情報を処理する法的根拠はお客様の同意（GDPR第6条第1a項および第9条第2a項）となります。
2.	MyTherapyの基本機能
以下で詳しく説明するMyTherapyの基本機能（以下、「基本機能」といいます。）を使用するには、お客様の健康情報を処理する必要があります。基本機能のために個人情報を処理する法的根拠は、お客様の同意（GDPR第6条第1a項および第9条第2a項）に基づきます。この同意を取り消した場合、お客様はMyTherapyをご利用いただけなくなります。
a)	基本機能： MyTherapyの実行
MyTherapyを使用中、お客様のスマートフォンは、アクセス日時、オペレーティングシステム、スマートフォンの種類、送信データ量、IPアドレスを自動的に当社まで送信します。このデータの処理は、MyTherapyを使用するための技術的要件となります。
b)	基本機能：お客様の治療のサポート
次のような内容の入力により、お客様の治療を管理・記録し、MyTherapyを使用することが可能です。
•	服薬に関する治療スケジュール
•	薬の補充リマインダー
•	血圧などの測定
•	注射部位の追跡
•	健康や病状
•	ウォーキング、ランニング、水泳などのアクティビティ
•	インポートされた臨床検査値
•	性別、生年、国、郵便番号などの情報 
•	医師の予約と連絡先情報
c)	基本機能：薬の選択
お客様は薬のデータベースを使用して、お客様の治療に薬を追加することができます。MyTherapyは、スマートフォンの地域や言語設定を使用して、データベースをあらかじめ選択します。これに失敗した場合、当社はお客様の国を特定するためにお客様のIPアドレスを使用します。
d)	基本機能：パーソナライズされたコンテンツの受信
当社は、お客様の使用状況と健康情報を使用して、お客様にパーソナライズされたコンテンツを表示し、このコンテンツに関するリマインダーおよび通知を送信します。このコンテンツは、smartpatientまたはパートナーのコンテンツです。パートナーのコンテンツには、パートナーに関する情報が含まれます。パーソナライズされたコンテンツには、以下のようなものがあります。
•   MyTherapyおよびMyTherapyのすべての機能を最大限に活用する方法に関する説明
•	患者がMyTherapyを使用する可能性のある特定の薬剤の投与に関する教育コンテンツ
•	MyTherapyを通じて投与される薬剤間の相互作用の可能性に関する情報
•	ユーザーが参加できる可能性のある研究または調査に関する情報
e)    基本機能： 他人との進捗状況の一時的共有
ワンタイムコードをウェブダッシュボードに入力すると、他の人との進捗状況の共有を選択ことができます。この人は、お客様の進捗状況を15分間閲覧できます。コードは使用後に自動消滅します。ワンタイムコードは、信頼できる方のみと共有するようにしてください。
3.	薬局パートナーとの連携
当社は、薬局パートナーと協力して、デジタル処方箋（以下、「eRx」といいます。）の記入、薬局ロイヤルティプログラムへの参加、または以下で詳しく説明する薬剤管理指導（以下、「薬局機能」といいます。）などの薬局機能へのアクセスを提供します。薬局機能を使用する前に、当社はお客様に明確な同意を求めます。同意書には、お客様のお住まいの国にある指定の薬局パートナーに関する詳細情報が記載されています。お客様が薬局機能に同意した場合、当社は薬局機能を提供するために必要な範囲で、ユーザーIDと個人の健康情報を薬局パートナーと共有し、薬局パートナーは当該データを当社と共有します。薬局機能を最大限に活用するには、ユーザーアカウントと薬局パートナーで作成したアカウントをペアリングする必要がある可能性があります。
この目的のためにお客様の個人情報を処理する法的根拠は、お客様の同意（GDPR第6条第1a項および第9条第2a項）となります。
a)	薬局機能：処方薬の注文
お客様は、MyTherapyを使用して、当社の薬局パートナーとデジタル処方箋（eRx）を記入し、MyTherapyで服薬リマインダーを設定することができます。この目的のために、お客様の国で必要なシステムと手順を使用して、eRxデータを薬局パートナーと共有します。（例：ドイツでは、Telematikインフラストラクチャを使用して、薬名、発行医師、名前と住所などを含む符号化されたeRxデータコードを薬局パートナーと共有します。）これにより、当社の薬局パートナーがお客様に処方薬を提供できるようにします。当社は、当社の薬局パートナーから、医薬品名や包装数量などのお医薬品の詳細を受け取ります。これにより、服薬リマインダーを簡単に設定したり、処方薬の履歴を表示したりできるようになります。
b)	薬局機能：医師に処方箋をもらう
処方薬が不足している場合は、かかりつけ医に補充処方を依頼することができます。当社は、お客様の名前、医薬品名や医薬品の包装数量などを含む必要な処方箋、およびお客様の担当医の名前を薬局パートナーと共有します。薬局パートナーは、この依頼をお客様の担当医に転送します。
c)	薬局機能：ロイヤルティプログラムへの参加
お客様は、MyTherapyを使用して服薬を確認したり、血圧測定リマインダーを設定したり治療を管理することで、薬局パートナーのロイヤルティポイントを収集できます。当社は、お客様がMyTherapyで集めたポイントを薬局パートナーと共有します。
d)	薬局機能：薬剤管理指導
お客様が、薬局からの助けが必要な場合、チャットの薬剤管理指導を使用するか、薬局パートナーの薬剤管理指導サービスホットラインで予約を取ることができます。当社は、薬局パートナーがお客様に連絡できるように、薬局パートナーと連絡席情報を共有しています。医薬品の安全性の確認のために、当社は薬局パートナーとお客様の薬のリマインダー情報を共有します。
e)	薬局機能：薬の購入情報のインポート
お客様が薬局パートナーに注文した薬をMyTherapyにインポートすることで、薬のリマインダー設定が容易になります。当社は、薬局パートナーから、医薬品名、投与量、包装数量などの医薬品ご購入情報をインポートします。
f)	薬局機能：MyTherapy の服薬リマインダーと在庫のエクスポート
当社は、お客様の服薬と在庫情報を薬局パートナーと共有します。これにより、MyTherapyで補充リマインダーを起動させ、お客様は薬局パートナーから在庫の少ない医薬品を購入できるようになります。また、これにより、薬局パートナーのウェブサイトやアプリで医薬品の在庫状況を確認できる場合があります。
g)	共同データ管理
当社は、薬局のパートナーと協力して、薬局機能に関してGDPR第26条の観点から「共同データ管理者」としての資格を得る場合があります。当社は、薬局のパートナーとそれぞれで合意に達しています。お客様のご要望に応じて、合意の重要な部分を開示致します。
お客様が薬局機能に関する同意を取り消した場合、当社は薬局パートナーと個人情報をこれ以上共有することはなく、MyTherapyで他の機能を提供するために必要のない関連データを削除します。薬局パートナーが、単独の責任において、他の目的のために共有データを保持および処理する可能性があることにご注意ください。薬局パートナーのプライバシーポリシーを参照してください。
4.	薬局パートナーからのパーソナライズされた推奨事項
当社は、薬局パートナーと提携して、お客様のアプリの使用状況、健康情報などの個人情報に基づいて、パーソナライズされた製品またはサービスの推奨事項を提供する場合があります。当社は、この目的のためにお客様に明確な同意を求めます。同意書では、お客様の国の特定の薬局パートナーに関する詳細情報を提供します。当社は、Apple HealthKitまたはGoogle Fitからインポートしたデータをこの目的で使用することはありません。
この目的でお客様の個人情報を処理する法的根拠は、お客様の同意（GDPR第6条第1a項および第9条第2a項）となります。
a)	パーソナライズされた推奨事項：サービスと製品の推奨事項
当社は、お客様の健康情報に基づいてお客様にパーソナライズされた推奨事項を送信する場合があります（例：お客様の薬、治療計画、アプリの使用状況）。これらのパーソナライズされた推奨事項は、医薬品の安全性確認、薬剤管理指導、その他の薬局サービスまたは医師向けサービスへの招待、および非処方薬やその他の医薬品管理に適した薬局商品に関する薬局パートナーによるコンテンツです。
5.	薬局パートナー
お客様のお住まいの地域によって、以下に示す薬局パートナーと提携する場合があります。
Shop-Apotheke B.V.
Erik de Rodeweg 11-13
NL - 5975 WD Sevenum
オランダ
6.	Apple HealthKitとGoogle Fitからのデータのインポート
AppleとGoogleに技術的に許可されている場合は、Apple HealthKitまたはGoogle Fitを介してフィットネストラッカーからの歩数など、他のアプリケーションから健康データをインポートし、治療ドキュメントに追加することができます。 当社は、この目的でのみApple HealthKitまたはGoogle Fitのデータを使用します。
Apple HealthKit: 当社は、Apple HealthKitデータを、広告や同様のサービス、または使用ベースのデータマイニングに使用することはありません。 当社は、Apple HealthKitを介して取得した情報を第三者に開示したり、広告プラットフォーム、データブローカー、または情報再販業者に販売したりすることはありません。
Google Fit: 当社は、Google Fitからアクセスしたコンテンツを広告、スポンサーシップ、プロモーションに関連して使用したり、そのコンテンツをデータブローカーや情報再販業者に共有または販売したりすることはありません。また、当社は当社のユーザーが上記のいずれを行うことも許可していません。
7.	分析
当社は、MyTherapyを改善するために、お客様のアプリの使用行動とデータを分析します。お客様は、MyTherapyの設定でこれを無効にすることができます。
この法的根拠は、GDPR第6条第1f項となり、MyTherapyの提供と改善に対する正当な利益となります。
a)	アプリの使用状況の一般的な分析
MyTherapyを使用すると、当社はお客様の使用状況データを収集します（例：使用機能、使用目的、使用期間など）。IPアドレスを除き、当社はMyTherapyを改善するために、この使用状況データを統計的に分析します。
b)	調査とアンケート
当社は、MyTherapyと薬局パートナーサービス（eRx薬の注文など）への満足度、満足できる点、および改善点をより深く理解するために、お客様に調査とアンケートへの参加をお願いする場合があります。
c)	AppsFlyer
当社は、AppsFlyerを使用して、MyTherapyマーケティングキャンペーンにリンクされたMyTherapyの使用状況に関する分析データを受信します。当社は、技術デバイス（デバイスの種類、オペレーティングシステムとバージョン、画面解像度など）、匿名化されたIPアドレスとインターネットサービスプロバイダー、アプリでアクセスしたページとユーザーがクリックしたアイテム、モバイル広告IDに関するデータを収集します。データの処理地は、アメリカ合衆国と欧州連合です。詳細は https://www.appsflyer.com/services-privacy-policy/ をご覧ください。
d)    UXCam
UXCamは、MyTherapyのユーザビリティとその改善方法について洞察を得ることを可能にする分析ソリューションです。
UXCamは、訪問した画面、インタラクションのパターン（画面操作、ジェスチャー：タップ、スクロールなど）、およびデバイスの詳細（タイプ、バージョン、モデル、オペレーティングシステム）を記録する場合があります。当社は、個人データをUXCamと共有することはありません。個人データは積極的に記録から削除されます。
e)	その他のツール
アプリケーションのトラッキング、エラーレポート、デバッグには、CrashlyticsとSentryを使用しています。個人を特定できるデータを共有することはありません。
8.	モバイルアプリとFirebase向けのGoogle Analyticsを使用した分析
当社は、Google Analytics（Google LLC）を使用して、MyTherapyの使用状況データ（アプリの使用時間と期間など）を収集します。個人を特定できるデータをGoogleと共有することはありません。Googleはお客様のスマートフォンから送信されたIPアドレスを記録または保存しません。収集された利用データは米国のGoogleサーバーで分析されます。詳細については、www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/ をご覧ください。
この目的におけるお客様の個人情報処理の法的根拠は、お客様の同意（GDPR第6条第1a項）となります。
9.    Leanplumを使った通知の送信
Leanplum (Leanplum Inc.) を使用して、MyTherapyユーザーにリマインダーやコンテンツ通知を送信します。これは、MyTherapyの利用データ（例：アカウント作成日や特定のパートナーモジュールに参加した日など）に基づいて行われることがあり、MyTherapyの基本機能の一部となっています。収集された情報は、米国のLeanplumによって保存されます。IPアドレスは破棄されます。Leanplumは、データを自然人に帰属させることはできません。詳細については、https://www.leanplum.com/platform/security-privacy を参照してください。
10.   有害事象と権利の保護
有害事象が疑われる場合、MyTherapy Supportにご連絡いただければ、有害事象を報告する義務が生じる場合があります。smartpatientは、欧州医薬品庁（EMA）などのパートナーまたは当局に有害事象を報告するために個人情報を共有する前に、必ずお客様の同意を得ます。
smartpatientの権利を行使または保護するために、smartpatientはユーザーの個人情報を処理することがあります。
[法的根拠：GDPR第6条(1)f)、それぞれGDPR第9条(2)f)]
11.	データ保管
a)	データ保管期間
当社は、お客様の個人情報が処理される目的に必要な期間を超えて、お客様の個人情報を保持します。お客様がアカウントを削除した場合、当社はアカウントに含まれる個人情報を全て削除します。また、お客様が3年間アカウントにログインしていない場合にも、アカウントに含まれる個人情報が削除されます。削除された個人情報を復元することはできません。
b)	データ保管の場所
お客様のスマートフォンがインターネットに接続すると、MyTherapyは、データ暗号化を使用して、テクニカルサービスプロバイダーであるAmazon Web Services, Inc.が提供する、欧州連合にある一元化されたデータベースにデータを送信します。テクニカルサービスプロバイダーは、メンテナンス、運用、または技術インフラストラクチャの管理のためにデータにアクセスする場合があります。
12.	欧州連合以外のサービスプロバイダー
当社は、欧州連合外の第三者団体のサービスプロバイダーに依存する場合がありますが、欧州連合のデータ保護法の要件に従って、欧州連合委員会に承認された標準データ保護条項により、お客様のデータが適切に保護されるようにあらゆる措置を講じます。お客様は、個人情報の適切な保護を実装する標準データ保護条項のコピーを要求することができます。
13.	データ保護権
お客様には、個人情報へのアクセスおよび修正または消去、またはお客様に関する処理の制限を要求する権利、または処理に異議を唱える権利、ならびにデータポータビリティーに対する権利があります。自動化された意思決定のために、当社がお客様の個人データを処理することはありません。お客様はいつでもお客様の同意を自由に撤回することができます。
ご不明な点がある場合、または権利を行使したい場合は、当社までお問い合わせください：support@mytherapyapp.com.
smartpatientおよびMyTherapyを担当するデータ保護責任者の連絡先情報は次の通りです：Dr. Sebastian Kraska, IITR Datenschutz GmbH, Marienplatz 2, 80331 München, Germany, email@iitr.de.
お客様には監督当局に苦情を申し立てる権利があります。
14.	改正
当社は、本プライバシーポリシーを修正する権利を留保します。お客様は、当社のウェブサイトmytherapyapp.comで本プライバシーポリシーの最新バージョンをご覧いただけます。
本プライバシーポリシーはは2023年8月31日に最後に変更されました。
MyTherapy Gizlilik Politikası
MyTherapy, smartpatient GmbH, Neumarkter Str. 87, 81673 Münih, Almanya (“smartpatient” veya “biz”) tarafından sağlanmaktadır. Kişisel verilerinizin MyTherapy aracılığıyla işlenmesi ile ilgili veri denetleyicisiyiz.
1.	MyTherapy kullanıcı hesabı
MyTherapy’yi bir kullanıcı hesabı (“Hesap”) oluşturarak veya hiç hesap oluşturmadan kullanabilirsiniz. Bir hesap oluşturmazsanız, kişisel verilerinizi girmeniz gerekmez, dolayısıyla, size ait hiçbir kişisel veriyi işlemeyiz. MyTherapy’ye gireceğiniz tüm veriler anonim veriler olacaktır.
Ancak, bir Hesap oluşturmazsanız MyTherapy’yi yalnızca bir akıllı telefon üzerinde kullanabilirsiniz ve akıllı telefonunuzu kaybederseniz söz konusu verileri geri yükleyemezsiniz.
Bir Hesap oluşturmak için e-posta adresinizi ve şifrenizi girmelisiniz. Kişisel verilerinizin işlenmesinde yasal dayanak sizin onayınızdır (GDPR- Avrupa Birliği Genel Veri Koruma Yönetmeliği Madde 6, paragraf 1a) ve Madde 9, paragraf 2a).
2.	MyTherapy’nin Temel Özellikleri
MyTherapy’nin aşağıda daha ayrıntılı olarak açıklanan temel özelliklerini kullanabilmeniz (“Temel Özellik”) için sağlık verilerinizin işlenmesi gereklidir. Temel Özellik için kişisel verilerinizin işlenmesinin yasal dayanağı sizin onayınızdır (GDPR- Avrupa Birliği Genel Veri Koruma Yönetmeliği Madde 6, paragraf 1a) ve Madde 9, paragraf 2a)). Bu onayı geri çekerseniz, MyTherapy’yi kullanmaya devam edemezsiniz.
a)	Temel Özellik: MyTherapy’nin Çalıştırılması
MyTherapy’yi kullanırken akıllı telefonunuz otomatik olarak erişim tarihini ve saatini, işletim sistemini, akıllı telefon tipini, aktarılan veri miktarını ve IP adresini bize iletir. Bu verilerin işlenmesi, MyTherapy’yi kullanmak için teknik bir gerekliliktir.
b)	Temel Özellik: Tedavinizi destekleme
Aşağıda belirtilen verileri girerek MyTherapy’yi tedavinizi yönetmek ve belgelemek için kullanabilirsiniz.
•	İlaç tedavi programları
•	Yenileme hatırlatıcıları için ilaç temini
•	Kan basıncı gibi değerler
•	Enjeksiyon yeri takibi
•	Sağlık durumu veya semptomlar
•	Yürüme, koşma veya yüzme gibi aktiviteler
•	Aktarılan laboratuvar değerleri
•	Cinsiyet, doğum yılı, ülke ve posta kodu gibi bilgiler
•	Doktor randevuları ve iletişim bilgileri
c)	Temel Özellik: İlaçlarınızı seçme
İlaç veri tabanlarını kullanarak tedavinize ilaç ekleyebilirsiniz. MyTherapy, akıllı telefonunuzun bölge veya dil ayarlarını kullanarak veri tabanını önceden seçer. Bu yapılamazsa, bulunduğunuz ülkeyi belirlemek için IP adresinizi kullanırız.
d)	Temel Özellik: Kişiselleştirilmiş içerik alma
Size kişiselleştirilmiş içerikler göstermek ve bu içeriklerle ilgili olarak size hatırlatıcılar ve bildirimler göndermek için sizin kullanım ve sağlık verilerinizi kullanırız. Sözü edilen içerik smartpatient içeriği veya iş ortağı içeriği olabilir. İş ortağı içeriği iş ortağıyla ilgili bilgi içerir. Kişiselleştirilmiş içerik örneğin şunlar olabilir:
•	MyTherapy’nin ve tüm işlevlerinin en iyi şekilde kullanılmasına yönelik talimatlar
•	Hastaların MyTherapy’yi kullanarak erişebileceği belirli ilaçların uygulamasına ilişkin eğitim içeriği
•	MyTherapy aracılığıyla kullanılan ilaçların birbiriyle potansiyel etkileşimine dair bilgi
•	Kullanıcıların katılabileceği araştırma veya anketler hakkında bilgi
e)    Temel İşlevsellik: İlerlemeyi başkalarıyla geçici olarak paylaşmak
Bir web panosuna girilebilen tek seferlik kod kullanarak ilerlemenizi ikinci bir kişiyle paylaşmayı seçebilirsiniz. Bu kişi ilerlemenizi 45 dakika boyunca görüntüleyebilir. Kodun süresi kullanımdan sonra otomatik olarak sona erer. Lütfen tek seferlik kodu yalnızca güvenilir kişilerle paylaşın.
3.	İş ortağı eczanelerle iş birliği
Dijital reçetelerinizdeki (“eRx”) ilaçların alınması, eczane sadakat programlarına katılım veya aşağıda daha ayrıntılı olarak belirtilen farmasötik danışmanlık alma (“Eczane Özelliği”) gibi eczane hizmetlerine erişmenizi sağlamak için eczane iş ortaklarıyla iş birliği yapıyoruz. Eczane Özelliğini kullanmadan önce sizden özel bir onay isteyeceğiz. Onay metninde, ülkenizde bulunan belirli bir eczane iş ortağı hakkında size daha fazla bilgi verilecektir. Eczane Özelliğini kabul ettiğinizde, Eczane Özelliğinin sağlanması için gerekli olduğu ölçüde, kullanıcı kimliğinizi ve kişisel sağlık verilerinizi eczane iş ortağıyla paylaşacağız ve eczane iş ortağı da bu verileri bizimle paylaşacaktır. Eczane Özelliğini tam olarak kullanmak için, Kullanıcı Hesabınızı eczane iş ortağı ile oluşturduğunuz hesapla eşleştirmeniz gerekebilir.
Kişisel verilerinizin işlenmesinde yasal dayanak sizin onayınızdır (GDPR- Avrupa Birliği Genel Veri Koruma Yönetmeliği, Madde 6, paragraf 1a) ve Madde 9, paragraf 2a)).
a)	Eczane Özelliği: Reçeteli ilaç siparişi
Dijital reçetenizdeki (eRx) ilacı Eczane iş ortağımızdan almak ve MyTherapy’de bu ilaç için bir ilaç hatırlatıcısı ayarlamak için MyTherapy’yi kullanabilirsiniz. Bu amaçla, eczane iş ortağımızın reçeteli ilacınızı size teslim edebilmesi için ülkenizde zorunlu olan sistem ve prosedürleri kullanarak eczane iş ortağımızla eRx verilerinizi paylaşıyoruz (örnek: Almanya’da, ilacın adını, ilacı yazan doktoru, sizin adınızı ve adresinizi ve benzeri bilgileri içeren şifreli eRx veri kodlarını Telematik altyapısı üzerinden eczane iş ortağımızla paylaşıyoruz). ilaç hatırlatıcınızı ayarlamanızı ve geçmiş reçetelerinizi görüntülemenizi kolaylaştıran, ilacın adı ve ambalajın boyutu gibi, ilaçla ilgili ayrıntılı bilgileri eczane iş ortağımızdan alırız.
b)	Eczane Özelliği: Doktorunuzdan reçete isteme
Reçeteli ilacınız azaldığında, danışman doktorunuzdan yeni reçete talep edebilirsiniz. Adınızı, ilaç adı ve ambalaj boyutu dahil olmak üzere talep edilen reçeteyi ve doktorunuzun adını söz konusu talebi doktorunuza iletecek olan eczane iş ortağımızla paylaşıyoruz.
c)	Eczane Özelliği: Sadakat Programına Katılma
MyTherapy’yi tedavinizi yönetmek için kullandığınızda, örneğin bir ilaç alımını onayladığınızda veya kan basıncınızı ölçmek için bir hatırlatıcı ayarladığınızda, eczane iş ortağı sadakat puanları toplayabilirsiniz. MyTherapy’de topladığınız sadakat puanlarını eczane iş ortağımızla paylaşıyoruz.
d)	Eczane Özelliği: İlaç danışmanlığı
Eczaneden yardım almanız gerekiyorsa, sohbete dayalı farmasötik danışmanlığı kullanabilir veya eczane iş ortağımızın farmasötik danışmanlık hizmetleri acil hattından randevu alabilirsiniz. Eczane iş ortağımızın sizinle iletişime geçmesini sağlamak için iletişim bilgilerinizi eczane iş ortağımızla paylaşıyoruz. İlaç güvenliği kontrolü için ilaç hatırlatma bilgilerinizi eczane iş ortağımız ile paylaşıyoruz.
e)	Eczane Özelliği: İş ortağı ilaç alımları verilerini içe aktarma
Eczane iş ortağınızdan sipariş ettiğiniz ilaçları MyTherapy’ye aktararak ilaç hatırlatıcılarınızı daha kolay ayarlayabilirsiniz. İlaç adı, dozu ve ambalaj boyutu gibi ilaç satın alma bilgilerinizi eczane iş ortağımızdan kendi sistemimize aktarıyoruz.
f)	Eczane Özelliği: MyTherapy ilaç hatırlatıcılarını ve envanterini dışa aktarma
İlaç ve envanter bilgilerinizi eczane iş ortağımız ile paylaşıyoruz. Bu, MyTherapy’de reçete yenileme hatırlatıcılarını tetiklemenize ve eczane ortağımızdan düşük envanterli ilaç satın almanıza olanak tanır. Ayrıca bu, ilaç envanterinizi eczane ortağımızın internet sitesinden ve uygulamasından izlemenize olanak sağlayabilir.
g)	Ortak veri denetleyicisi
Biz, eczane iş ortağıyla birlikte, Tek Eczane Özelliği bağlamında, GDPR- Avrupa Birliği Genel Veri Koruma Yönetmeliği’nin 26’ncı Maddesine göre “ortak veri denetleyicisi” olarak nitelendirilebiliriz. Eczane iş ortağı ile bu konuyla ilgili bir düzenleme yaptık. Talep etmeniz durumunda düzenlemenin mahiyetini size açıklayacağız.
Eczane Özelliklerine ilişkin onayınızı geri çekmeniz halinde, kişisel verilerinizi eczane iş ortağıyla paylaşmayı durdururuz ve MyTherapy’de diğer özellikleri sağlamak için gerekli olmayan verileri sileriz. Eczane iş ortağının paylaşılan verileri tüm sorumluluğu sadece eczane iş ortağına ait olan başka amaçlar için saklamaya ve işlemeye devam edebileceğini lütfen unutmayın. Lütfen eczane ortağının gizlilik politikasını inceleyin.
4.	Eczane iş ortağından kişiselleştirilmiş öneriler
Uygulama kullanımınıza, sağlık verileri de dahil olmak üzere kişisel bilgilerinize dayalı olarak kişiselleştirilmiş ürün veya hizmet önerileri sunmak için eczane iş ortaklarıyla ortaklık kurabiliriz. Bu amaçla sizden özel bir onay isteyeceğiz. Onay metninde, ülkenizde bulunan belirli bir eczane ortağı hakkında size daha fazla bilgi sağlayacağız. Apple HealthKit veya Google Fit’ten içe aktarılan verileri asla bu amaç için kullanmayacağız.
Kişisel verilerinizin işlenmesinde yasal dayanak sizin onayınızdır (GDPR- Avrupa Birliği Genel Veri Koruma Yönetmeliği Madde 6, paragraf 1a) ve Madde 9, paragraf 2a)).
a)	Kişiselleştirilmiş öneriler: Hizmet ve ürün önerileri
İlaçlarınız, tedavi planınız veya uygulama kullanımınız gibi sağlık verilerinize dayalı olarak size kişiselleştirilmiş öneriler gönderebiliriz. Bu kişiselleştirilmiş öneriler, ilaç güvenliği kontrolleri, ilaç danışmanlığı ve diğer eczane veya doktor hizmetlerine davetler olabileceği gibi, reçetesiz ilaçlar ve ilaç yönetiminize uygun diğer eczane ürünleri hakkında eczane iş ortağımız tarafından hazırlanan yazılı içerikler olabilir.
5.	Eczane iş ortağı
Bulunduğunuz yere bağlı olarak, aşağıda listelenen farklı eczane iş ortaklarıyla iş birliği yapabiliriz.
Shop-Apotheke B.V.
Erik de Rodeweg 11-13
NL - 5975 WD Sevenum
Hollanda
6.	Apple HealthKit ve Google Fit’ten içe veri aktarma
Apple ve Google’a teknik olarak izin veriyorsanız, diğer uygulamalardaki sağlık verilerinizi, örneğin fitness takip cihazındaki adım sayısını, Apple HealthKit veya Google Fit aracılığıyla içe aktarabilir ve bunları tedavi belgelerinize ekleyebilirsiniz. Biz, Apple HealthKit veya Google Fit verilerini yalnızca bu amaçla kullanmaktayız.
Apple HealthKit: Apple HealthKit verilerinizi asla reklam ve benzeri hizmetler veya kullanıma dayalı veri madenciliği için kullanmayız. Apple HealthKit aracılığıyla elde edilen bilgileri herhangi bir üçüncü tarafa ifşa etmeyiz veya bunları reklam platformlarına, veri komisyoncularına veya bilgi satıcılarına satmayız.
Google Fit: Google Fit’ten erişilen içeriği herhangi bir reklam, sponsorluk veya promosyonla bağlantılı olarak kullanmıyoruz, söz konusu içeriği herhangi bir veri komisyoncusu veya bilgi satıcısıyla paylaşmıyoruz veya satmıyoruz ve kullanıcılarımızın yukarıdakilerin hiçbirini yapmasına izin vermiyoruz.
7.	Analitikler
MyTherapy’yi geliştirmek için sizin uygulama kullanım davranışınızı ve verilerinizi analiz ederiz. Bu işlevi MyTherapy ayarlarından devre dışı bırakabilirsiniz.
Yasal dayanak, Avrupa Birliği Genel Veri Koruma Yönetmeliği (GDPR) Madde 6, paragraf 1f), MyTherapy’yi sağlamaya ve geliştirmeye yönelik meşru menfaat.
a)	Uygulama kullanımı genel analizi
MyTherapy’yi kullandığınızda, örneğin hangi işlevin kullanıldığı, söz konusu işlevin ne için ve ne zaman kullanıldığı gibi uygulama kullanım verilerinizi toplarız. Bu kullanım verilerini, IP adresi hariç, MyTherapy’yi iyileştirmek için istatistiksel olarak analiz ederiz.
b)	Araştırmalar ve Anket Formları
MyTherapy’yi ve eczane iş ortağı hizmetlerimizi (eRx ilaç siparişi gibi) beğenip beğenmediğinizi, söz konusu hizmetlerin beğendiniz taraflarını ve nasıl geliştirebileceğimizi daha iyi anlamak için araştırma ve anketlere katılmanızı isteyebiliriz.
c)	AppsFlyer
MyTherapy pazarlama kampanyalarıyla bağlantılı MyTherapy kullanımınız hakkında analitik verileri almak için AppsFlyer kullanıyoruz. Teknik cihaz (cihaz tipi, işletim sistemi ve versiyonu, ekran çözünürlüğü vb.), anonimleştirilmiş IP adresi ve internet servis sağlayıcısı, uygulamada ziyaret edilen sayfalar, kullanıcının tıkladığı öğeler ve mobil reklam kimliği hakkında veri topluyoruz. Veri işleme yeri Amerika Birleşik Devletleri ve Avrupa Birliği’dir. Daha fazla bilgi için https://www.appsflyer.com/services-privacy-policy/ adresini ziyaret edebilirsiniz.
d)    UXCam
UXCam, MyTherapy’nin kullanılabilirliği ve onu nasıl geliştirebileceğimiz hakkında derinlemesine fikir edinmemizi sağlayan bir analitik çözümüdür.
UXCam’le kaydedilebilen veriler: Ziyaret edilen ekranlar, Etkileşim desenleri (ekran eylemleri, hareketler: dokunmalar, kaydırmalar gibi) ve Cihaz ayrıntıları (Tür, Sürüm, Model, İşletim Sistemi). UXCam ile herhangi bir kişisel veri paylaşmayız. Kişisel veriler kayıtlardan proaktif olarak kaldırılır.
e)	Diğer araçlar
Uygulama izleme, hata raporlama ve ayıklama için Crashlytics ve Sentry kullanırız. Tanımlayıcı hiçbir veri paylaşmayız.
8.	Mobil Uygulamalar ve Firebase’e yönelik Google Analytics’in kullanıldığı analizler
Google Analytics (Google LLC) ile uygulama kullanım süresi ve tarihi gibi MyTherapy kullanım verilerini topluyoruz. Google ile tanımlayıcı hiçbir veri paylaşmayız. Google, akıllı cihazınız tarafından gönderilen IP adresinizi günlüğe kaydetmez veya saklı tutmaz. Toplanan kullanım verileri Birleşik Devletler’deki Google sunucularında analiz edilir. Daha fazla bilgi için lütfen www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/ adresini ziyaret edin.
Kişisel verilerinizin işlenmesinde yasal dayanak sizin onayınızdır (GDPR- Avrupa Birliği Genel Veri Koruma Yönetmeliği Madde 6, paragraf 1a)).
9.    Leanplum kanalıyla Bildirim Gönderme
Leanplum (Leanplum Inc.) ile, MyTherapy kullanıcılarına hatırlatma veya içerik bildirimleri gönderiyoruz. Bunlar, MyTherapy kullanım verileri (hesap oluşturma zamanı veya herhangi bir ortak modülüne katılım tarihi gibi) baz alınarak oluşturulabilir ve MyTherapy’nin Temel Özelliklerinden biridir.  Toplanan veriler Leanplum tarafından Amerika Birleşik Devletleri’nde saklanır. IP adresleri saklanmaz. Leanplum, verileri gerçek bir kişiye isnat edemez. Daha fazla bilgi için lütfen aşağıda linki verilen sayfayı ziyaret edin : https://www.leanplum.com/platform/security-privacy.
10.   Yan etkiler ve hakların korunması
MyTherapy Destek hattına ulaşarak yan etki bildirmeniz durumunda, söz konusu yan etkiyi rapor etmek durumunda kalabiliriz. smartpatient, bir İş Ortağı veya Avrupa İlaç Kurumu (EMA) gibi bir yetki makamla kişisel verilerinizi paylaşmadan önce daima rızanızı alır.
smartpatient, smartpatient’a ait hakları uygulamak veya korumak için kişisel verilerinizi işleyebilir.
[Yasal dayanak: GDPR Madde 6, Paragraf 1), sırayla GDPR Madde 9 (2)]
11.	Veri depolama
a)	Veri depolama süresi
Kişisel verilerinizi, kişisel verilerinizin işlenme amacının gerektirdiğinden daha uzun süre saklamıyoruz. Hesabınızı sildiğinizde, Hesabınızda bulunan tüm kişisel verileri de siliyoruz. 3 yıl süreyle giriş yapmamanız durumunda ise Hesapta bulunan tüm kişisel veriler silinir ve söz konusu veriler geri yüklenemez.
b)	Veri depolama yeri
Akıllı telefonunuz internete bağlandığında, MyTherapy, teknik servis sağlayıcı Amazon Web Services, Inc., tarafından sağlanan Avrupa Birliği’nde bulunan merkezi bir veri tabanına veri şifreleme kullanarak, verilerinizi iletir. Teknik hizmet sağlayıcı, teknik altyapının bakımı, işletilmesi veya yönetimi için verilere erişebilir.
12.	AB dışı hizmet sağlayıcılar
Avrupa Birliği dışından üçüncü taraf hizmet sağlayıcılarını kullanabiliriz, ancak verilerinizin AB Komisyonu tarafından onaylanan Standart Veri Koruma Maddeleri çerçevesinde Avrupa Birliği’nin veri koruma yasalarının gerektirdiği şekilde korunmasını sağlamak için tüm adımları atıyoruz. Kişisel verilerinizin uygun şekilde korunmasını sağlayan Standart Veri Koruma Maddelerinin bir kopyasını talep edebilirsiniz.
13.	Veri koruma hakları
Bizden, kişisel verilere erişme ve söz konusu verilerin düzeltilmesini veya silinmesini veya sizinle ilgili verilerin işlenmesinin kısıtlanmasını talep etme veya söz konusu verilerin işlenmesine itiraz etme hakkına sahip olduğunuz gibi veri taşıma hakkına da sahipsiniz. Kişisel verilerinizi otomatik karar verme amacıyla işlemiyoruz. Verdiğiniz her türlü onayı istediğiniz zaman geri çekmekte özgürsünüz.
Sorularınız veya haklarınızı kullanmak için lütfen bizimle support@mytherapyapp.com adresinden iletişime geçin.
smartpatient ve MyTherapy’den sorumlu veri koruma görevlisi Dr. Sebastian Kraska’dır. Dr. Sebastian Kraska’nın iletişim bilgileri aşağıda yer almaktadır: IITR Datenschutz GmbH, Marienplatz 2, 80331 Münih, Almanya, email@iitr.de.
Bir denetleme kurumuna şikâyette bulunma hakkına sahipsiniz.
14.	Değişiklikler
Bu Gizlilik Politikasını değiştirme hakkımız saklıdır. Gizlilik Politikasının en son sürümünü mytherapyapp.com adresindeki web sitemizde bulabilirsiniz.
Bu Gizlilik Politikası en son 31.08.2023 tarihinde güncellenmiştir.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://policies.google.com/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 1
https://www.appsflyer.com/services-privacy-policy/:
Platform
Measure
Measurement suite
Measure every action on mobile, web and CTV
ROI measurement
Understand your true mobile marketing ROI
Creative Optimization
Unlock creative performance with the power of AI
Analyze
Marketing analytics
Turn insights on campaign performance into action
Incrementality
Prove the real value of your marketing campaigns
Engage
CX & deep linking
Boost revenue with exceptional customer experience
Audience segmentation
Create meaningful conversations with your customers
Protect
Fraud protection
Protect your marketing budget from mobile ad fraud
Collaborate
Privacy Cloud
Collaborate with your partners in a privacy-centric way
AppsFlyer Data Collaboration Platform
First-party data monetization that fuels retail media growth
Partner marketplace
Connect to over 10,000 tech and media partners
Interactive product tours
iOS 14+ solutions
Data feeds & APIs
Solutions
Team
Marketing
Product
Data & Analytics
R&D
Goal
Regain iOS visibility
Kickstart app growth
Scale user acquisition
Increase engagement & LTV
Maximize ROAS
Industry
Gaming
Shopping
Finance
Food & drink
Health & fitness
Travel
Platform
iOS
Android
PC & console
CTV & OTT
Web
Mobile
Web3
Partnerships
Tech and media partners
Agency partners
Partner Program
Interactive product tours
Customer stories
The AppsFlyer difference
Learn
Resources
Stay informed with industry insights, the latest trends, original content, and all things AppsFlyer
Ecosystem
Blog
Reports & guides
Events & webinars
Tools & templates
Industry benchmarks
Videos
Podcasts
Glossary
Metrics comparison
Customers
Customer stories
Product news
Use cases
Help center
Developer Hub
AppsFlyer Learning
Come to MAMA
Company
Who we are
Find out more about our history, our team, what we stand for, and why we do what we do
About us
Newsroom
CEO blog spot
Trust hub
Careers
Social impact
Contact
From our CEO
The future of our ecosystem and web
On privacy and user experience
Aggregated advanced privacy
Pricing
Login
Sign up free
Contact sales
Legal hub
MSA
Site Terms
Website Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
DPA
Opt Out
Processing Customer Data
Supplier Portal
Subprocessors
Modern Slavery Statement
Documentation
MSA
Site Terms
Website Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
DPA
Opt Out
Processing Customer Data
Supplier Portal
Subprocessors
Modern Slavery Statement
Services Privacy Policy
Last updated August 6, 2021
Introduction
AppsFlyer provides attribution and marketing analytics services (“
Services
“) that enable advertisers and developers (collectively, “
Customer(s)
“) to: (i) measure and analyze the effectiveness of their marketing campaigns by understanding which marketing campaigns contributed to the download/installation of their mobile applications (“
Applications
“) or such other conversion metric (e.g. relaunch of Application); and (ii) measure and analyze certain events and actions within their Application or websites, such as in-app purchases made by End Users (as defined below). The Services also help our Customers identify and protect against fraudulent behavior related to their marketing campaigns.
This Services Privacy Policy describes AppsFlyer’s privacy practices in relation to the information collected from Customers and End Users and received by AppsFlyer when Customers use our Services. This Services Privacy Policy does not apply to information collected through use of AppsFlyer’s publicly accessible website or marketing activities, which is described under our Privacy Policy. To view the Privacy Policy, please
click here
. Furthermore, AppsFlyer and its Customers have entered into an agreement that governs the provision of Services by AppsFlyer and their use by Customers (“
Agreement(s)
“). Such Agreements may contain additional obligations on the parties with respect to the handling of information. Nothing in this Services Privacy Policy derogates from such additional obligations.
For the purpose of this Services Privacy Policy: (i) any reference to “
End User(s)
” means end users who have interacted with, or viewed, Customer’s advertising and marketing materials, or use or have used Customer’s Applications, websites, products and services; and (ii) any reference to “
AppsFlyer
” “
we
” “
us
” or “
our
” shall mean AppsFlyer Ltd. and its affiliates.
End User Data Received and Processed by AppsFlyer
When a Customer uses the Services, the following End User information may be received and processed by AppsFlyer (collectively, “
End User Data
”).
“
Technical Information
”: this refers to technical information related to an End User’s mobile device or computer, such as: browser type, device type and model, CPU, system language, memory, OS version, Wi-Fi status, time stamp and zone, device motion parameters and carrier.
“
Technical Identifiers
”: this refers to various unique identifiers that generally only identify a computer, device, browser or Application. For example, IP address (which may also provide general location information), User agent, IDFA (identifier for advertisers), Android ID (in Android devices); Google Advertiser ID, Customer issued user ID and other similar unique identifiers.
“
Engagement Information
”: this refers to information relating to the Customer’s ad campaigns and End User actions, such as: clicks on Customer ads, ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, the type of ads and the webpage or Application from which such ads were displayed, the webpages on Customer’s website visited by an End User, the URL from the referring website, downloads and installations of Applications, and other interactions, events and actions Customers choose to measure and analyze within their Application or website (e.g. add to cart, in-app purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
While End User Data does not generally contain any information that directly identifies an individual, such as names, addresses, credit cards or other similarly regulated financial information, health information, or any other type of sensitive personal information (“
PII
“), we acknowledge that under certain jurisdictions the End User Data we do receive when a Customer uses the Services may be deemed personal data and therefore, where applicable, will be treated as such. Within the scope of the engagement between Customers and AppsFlyer, Customers are contractually prohibited from collecting PII, unless otherwise agreed by AppsFlyer. However, Customers have sole control over their properties (including their websites and Application) and configuration of the Services and thus Customers have the technical ability to configure the Services to collect PII. This includes, for example, a Customer using an End User’s email address as a Customer issued user ID Technical Identifier. If a Customer has configured the Services to collect PII then we may receive and process such data.
Registration Information Received and Processed by AppsFlyer
When a Customer registers to use the Services, we may collect certain information related to such Customer (“
Registration Information
” and together with the End User Data, “
Customer Data
”), including Customer name and Customer details, billing information and names and contact details of Customer employees and representatives who are using the Services (e.g. email, phone number and address). When a Customer uses the Services, AppsFlyer may also collect certain log data, such as IP address from which a Customer is connecting to the Services, information related to the device being used to connect to the Services (e.g. browser type, device type, OS version) and the features and functions of the Services used by the Customer (“
Log Data
”).
How Data is Collected
Customer Data may be collected through various methods, including:
When provided voluntarily (e.g. Customer’s Registration Information).
When the Customer integrates AppsFlyer’s SDK’s, API’s, pixels, redirect links, JavaScript tags, cookies or similar data collection technologies into their Applications, websites and/or ads (“
Collection Technologies
”). For explanations on cookies and similar technologies, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
From the various advertising networks and third parties that are used by the Customer in connection with the measurement and analysis of Customer’s marketing campaigns and that have partnered with AppsFlyer (“
Partners
”).
How Data is Used by AppsFlyer
When AppsFlyer receives End User Data from a Customer, it uses such End User Data as follows:
to provide such Customer with the Services they have subscribed for. Such services may include, without limitation, attribution, analytics and ad fraud protection services. Please visit
https://www.appsflyer.com
for more information regarding the Services.
to establish: (i) matches between devices used by an End User; and (ii) to detect fraud (such matched data and fraud data, collectively, the, “
Platform Data
”) in order to ensure more accurate attribution measurement and ad fraud protection for Customers using the Services. Platform Data does not contain PII such as End User names, physical addresses, phone numbers or other similar personal data that can directly identify an individual.
With regards to Registration Information and Log Data, we use such information to authenticate login to the Services, to communicate with the Customer and to process any payments in connection with the Services. Additionally, we may use: (i) Registration Information to inform Customers of any updates to the Services, including new features and functionalities; and (ii) Log Data to understand how Customers are using the Services so that we may efficiently audit, maintain and improve the Services provided to Customers.
AppsFlyer may use information derived from the aggregation of End User Data and/or Log Data with other data for research and analytics purposes and improvement and marketing of the Services (“
Aggregated Data
”). Aggregated Data shall be anonymous and in no way reveal the identity of the Customer or any End User.
Sharing Data
AppsFlyer does not share or disclose Customer Data with any third party, except:
Upon our Customer’s request– (e.g. to Partners);
To our subsidiaries and global branches as necessary to help us support and maintain the Services provided to Customers;
To our service providers who help to support our Services – such as data hosting providers and payment processors; Transfers to subsequent third parties are covered by the service agreements with our Customers. These companies are authorized to use your personal information only as necessary to provide these services to us.
When legally required (e.g. court orders or other lawful requests by public authorities), including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements;
To respond to, or prevent, fraud or to protect the safety of AppsFlyer, its Customers, End Users or the public;
As part of any merger or acquisition of AppsFlyer, in which case End User Data may be transferred to the surviving or acquiring entity.
Cross Border Data Transfers
AppsFlyer may need to transfer Customer Data to countries other than the country from which the Data originated. Any such transfer shall be done in compliance with all applicable laws. With regards to the collection, use and retention of personal data transferred from the European Economic Area to the United States, please be assured that AppsFlyer continues to comply with all applicable laws in respect of such transfers and any data transfers to the United States will be governed by the Standard Contractual Clauses as set forth in our DPA with the relevant service provider.
Protecting Data and Retention
AppsFlyer implements appropriate technical and organizational measures designed to protect against unauthorized access, accidental loss, destruction or damage of Customer Data. For more information on our security controls, please see
https://www.appsflyer.com/trust/security/
. If you have questions about the security of your personal information, or if you have reason to believe that the personal information that we hold about you is no longer secure, please contact us immediately as described in this Services Privacy Policy.
AppsFlyer will not retain: (i) End User Data for more than twenty-four months except where otherwise directed by Customers or required or allowed by law; and (ii) Registration Information, Log Data or Platform Data for more time than is needed to serve the legitimate business need for which it was collected.
Relationship, Lawful Basis and End User Choices
Under the laws of certain jurisdictions, when processing End User Data in connection with the provision of Services to a Customer, AppsFlyer is deemed a ‘data processor’ while its Customers are deemed ‘data controllers’.
Therefore, End Users should closely review the Privacy Policies of the Applications and websites they use in order to learn about the privacy practices of our Customers.
Where AppsFlyer may be deemed a data controller under the laws of certain jurisdictions (e.g. in connection with its processing of Log Data or Registration Information), AppsFlyer shall comply with all applicable laws related to its status as a data controller and shall only use the data as described in this Services Privacy Policy. With regards to Registration Information and Log Data, the lawful basis AppsFlyer relies on is its need to perform its obligations under the Agreement between AppsFlyer and Customer and on its legitimate interests to maintain, analyze and improve the Services. The laws of certain jurisdictions may provide End Users with various rights in connection with the processing of End User Data, including:
The right to withdraw any previously provided consent;
The right to access certain information about you that we process;
The right to have us correct or update any Personal Information;
The right to have certain Information erased;
The right to have us temporarily block our processing of certain Information;
The right to have Information exported into common machine-readable format;
The right to object to our processing of Information in cases of direct marketing, or when we rely on legitimate interests as our lawful basis to process your information; and
The right to lodge a complaint with the appropriate data protection authority.
Where AppsFlyer is deemed a data processor, End Users should contact our Customers to pursue any such legal data subject rights. AppsFlyer will cooperate with its Customers to support and comply with any such data subject rights requests.
Where AppsFlyer is deemed a data controller, End Users may exercise their rights by contacting AppsFlyer at:
privacy@appsflyer.com
. We will respond to your requests within a reasonable timeframe. Please note these rights may be limited in certain circumstances as provided by applicable law. In any event, AppsFlyer provides End Users with the ability to opt-out of being measured by the Services by emailing a request to
privacy@appsflyer.com
or by completing the form
here
. You may also send any question regarding your exercise of data subject rights to
privacy@appsflyer.com
.
If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
Updates and Questions
We may update this Services Privacy Policy from time to time. Any material changes will be notified to the Customer either through the Services, email or as otherwise agreed by the parties in the Agreement. We will also indicate that an update has occurred on the top of this page so Customers and End Users are encouraged to review this Services Privacy Policy from time to time. For any questions relating to this Services Privacy Policy or to contact our data protection officer please send us a mail to:
privacy@appsflyer.com
. You may also send us or our data protection officer regular mail:
AppsFlyer – Attn: Legal Team/Data Protection Officer,
14 Maskit St.
Herzliya, Israel
4673314
For the purposes of Article 27 of the General Data Protection Regulation, the representative within the EU of AppsFlyer is AppsFlyer Germany GmbH Kurfürstendamm 11, c/o WeWork, 10719 Berlin, Germany (contact
privacy@appsflyer.com
; +49-30-3119-9129)
Our Cookies Policy
AppsFlyer respects your privacy as our website user. We use cookies to improve your user experience and for remarketing. Some of this data may be shared with select partners. See our
cookies policy
for more information.
Reject all cookies
Accept all cookies
Customize
Cookie Preference Center
AppsFlyer uses Cookies to provide, maintain, and improve our websites, to optimize our offerings and marketing activities, and to provide our visitors and users with a better experience, for example, in order to maintain your preferences, to better secure our websites, to identify technical issues, and to monitor and improve the overall performance of our websites.
More information
Allow All
Please select which Cookies you approve, you may choose all options.
Always Active
Necessary Cookies are enabled for the assurance and function of a properly run website, and they cannot be disabled. They are usually only set in response to actions permitted by you, such as, enabling functions like navigation and access to secure areas of the website. These Cookies do not store personal information that will be used for other purposes.
Performance Cookies
These Cookies provide us with aggregated (anonymous) insights into website enhancement and performance improvement. These cookies allow us to measure and improve the performance of our Sites. They help us know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the website.
Marketing Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Functional Cookies
These Cookies enable us to provide enhanced functionality and personalization through our Sites and allow for a better user experience. These may be set by us (first-party Cookies) or by third-party providers who work with us (third-party Cookies).
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label